 
 
A wish and a prayer for the Ukrainian democrats, please
 
 
Last year's Revolution of the Roses in Georgia would be nothing compared to the impact of a kindred revolution in the Ukraine now...

Hundreds of thousands are in the streets of Kiev now, waving their orange and yellow/blue flags and peacefully demanding that Yushchenko's election victory will be recognized and the fraudulent declaration of Yanushenko as winner annulled... it was the same combination of massive voter fraud against a backdrop of an escalating history of corruption, clampdown of free media and physical violence against independent journalists and opposition activists, not to mention the impoverishment of commonfolk, that led to the uprisings in both Georgia and earlier in Serbia.. The same actors are pushing forward, the young, the Western-oriented, the exasperated new generation that sees its opportunities systematically wasted by an authoritarian, nepotistic power clan...

Unfortunately, the Ukrainian democrats also face much larger stumbleblocks. The Ukraine is so big, so much bigger than Georgia or Serbia, rousing even 200,000 in Kiev is not enough... and the pro-Russian east of the country, where the fraudulent official vote tallies have registered turnouts of up to 96% and even, oops, over 100%, will resist the change... and there's Putin of course, who has already demonstratively recognized Yanukovich's "victory" and who would very much appreciate a continued Russia-friendly, obedient and none too strong neighbour state (rather than an independent-minded, democratic and pro-Western state)...

Current President Kuchma, whose protege Yanukovich is, has very skilfully manouvred various tools of repression and cooptation before to dismantle and defuse previous, lengthy mass protest movements when students and others camped outside in Kiev for weeks... and to unnerve the protest after the mysterious beheading of a journalist researching corruption, whose murder Kuchma was heard ordering on a tape, for example... but then, Milosevic (and to a lesser extent, Shevardnadze) had also been a supremely skillful operator, it took two failed popular uprisings before Milosevic was turned out as well... this is independent Ukraine's second mass uprising, could this be the time? Or will Kuchma, the Ukrainian security forces, the ethnic Russians in the East and of course, Putin, prevail and safeguard a continuation of the era of that particular brand of post- or neo-communist corrupt authoritarianism?

If you're religious, spare a prayer for the Ukrainian democrats tonight, and if you're not, just wish them success and safety... oh, and write your President or Senator or something, to tell him to keep pressuring both Kuchma and Putin, and dont let "strategic interests" override!

 

 

 

 

 

 
 
 
I have spared a thought (& more) for them, nimh. It's a disaster for democracy, a sham. (And being of Ukrainian descent myself, I understand this longing for independence & justice.) Good luck to them in their quest, but the situation does look potentially explosive....
 
 
 
Kiev Post:  Opposition approaches showdown with militia; soldiers being tranferred into Kyiv 
 

 
Moscow Times:  Protesters March on President's Office 

By Anatoly Medetsky
Staff Writer
Wednesday, November 24, 2004. Page 1.

KIEV -- Opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko declared victory and led a march of hundreds of thousands of his supporters to the president's office Tuesday night in an effort to stage a velvet revolution.

Protesters were meters away from the presidential administration building at 11:15 p.m. Moscow time, and opposition leaders assured riot police that they would not storm the building.

Yushchenko earlier in the day announced a campaign of civil disobedience and warned that the country was on the verge of civil conflict.

More than 150 Ukrainian diplomats posted around the world denounced the way the vote was handled and said they stood by the protesters.

The western regions of Lviv, Ivano-Frankivsk and Vinnytsa followed the lead of their regional capitals and swore their allegiance to Yushchenko. The eastern region of Donetsk countered by swearing allegiance to Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych, its former governor.

The United States and the European Union stepped up pressure on outgoing President Leonid Kuchma to order a recount or risk making the country a pariah in the West. (Story, Page 3.)

President Vladimir Putin -- who put himself on a collision course with the West on Monday by congratulating Yanukovych, his favored candidate, even though no victor has been declared -- effectively retracted his congratulations.

Parliament convened for an emergency session to discuss the unfolding crisis and consider an opposition request to annul the election results.

"Ukraine is on the threshold of a civil conflict," Yushchenko told the lawmakers. "We have two choices: either the answer will be given by the parliament, or the streets will give an answer."

But after two hours of debates, Speaker Volodymyr Lytvyn abruptly adjourned the session when Deputy Ihor Yukhnovsky called on Yushchenko to take the presidential oath of office.

Yushchenko read the oath with a hand on a 300-year-old Bible as lawmakers chanted "Bravo, Mr. President!" Under the Ukrainian Constitution, however, the president has to pledge allegiance on a copy of the Constitution.

Official election results give Yanukovych an insurmountable lead of 49.39 percent to Yushchenko's 46.71 percent, with more than 99.48 percent of precincts counted. Exit polls, however, showed Yushchenko with a significant lead.

About 200,000 protesters rallied in the park and streets around the parliament throughout the day, waving yellow-and-blue national flags and orange Yushchenko campaign banners. Many blew plastic horns.

"You are the heroes of Ukraine," Yushchenko told the crowd. "I believe that our deeds will lead us to political success." He called for a campaign of civil disobedience but cautioned that all protests must be peaceful and law-abiding.

A member of his campaign team urged protesters to be friendly. "Smile at Kiev residents, the police and guests because we have won," he said. "The Ukrainian presidential administration and all of Ukraine will be ours."

People marched in a 3-kilometer column through central Kiev, blocking much of the traffic on the main streets. The marchers chanted "Yushchenko!" and "Down with the convict!" -- a reference to Yanukovych's convictions for robbery and battery in the late 1960s.

Shopkeepers and construction workers along the street waved encouragingly at the marchers, and many residents flew orange flags from their balconies. The few cars that managed to get onto the street tooted their horns in support.

The marchers passed by the Central Elections Commission, but pop music from loudspeakers on top of the building muffled their chanting.

Scores of police officers surrounded the building, but the police were a rare sight elsewhere in the city. A traffic police officer near the building said military units had been deployed outside Kiev. His claim could not be verified.

Some protesters blamed Putin for the scandalous vote. "This wouldn't have happened if it hadn't been for Putin," said a woman protester, nodding at the huge rally.

The Kremlin made clear its support for Yanukovych ahead of the vote, sending its best spin-doctors to work on his campaign, and Putin paid two visits to Ukraine.

Speaking to reporters during a visit to Portugal, Putin said Russia will not "recognize or reject the Ukrainian election results until they are officially made public," Interfax reported.

Putin also criticized the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe, which helped monitor the election and said it found extensive indications of voting fraud. He said the OSCE monitors needed to work "more carefully and thoroughly."

Putin called for a peaceful resolution to the crisis. "Ukraine is a large European state with a developed legal system. You don't have to teach it, it can teach itself."

The group of 150 Ukrainian diplomats released a statement backing the protesters.

"We cannot remain silent and observe a situation that could call into doubt Ukraine's democratic development and destroy the efforts of many years to return our country to Europe," said the statement issued in the name of diplomatic service officials, Reuters reported.

"A nation should be headed by a leader who enjoys the real trust of the Ukrainian people and whose personal moral authority will be decisive in strengthening Ukraine's authority," it said.

Earlier in the day, about 20 mid-ranking diplomats based in the United States, Israel, Germany, Austria and Malaysia signed a statement saying: "The people of Ukraine, represented by a small portion freezing in Kiev's Independence Square, deserve a different government than the one currently asserting itself."

Although parliament was dismissed early, it would not have been able to pass a no-confidence vote on the election after only 191 lawmakers -- less than the 226 required to have a quorum -- showed up. While such a vote would have carried political significance, it would have been nonbinding because under the law a no-confidence vote must be initiated by the president. Kuchma staunchly supports Yanukovych.

Yanukovych made no public comments Tuesday, but independent Channel 5 television reported that he was preparing to declare himself president.

One television station, Novy Kanal, went off the air, while others allowed broadcasters to wear orange armbands during news programming, Bloomberg reported. It was unclear why Novy Kanal went black. The OSCE said after the first-round presidential vote on Oct. 31 that its programming was pro-Yanukovych.

Elsewhere in Ukraine, about 100,000 people marched through the streets of Lviv, Yushchenko's western stronghold.

In Kiev, many protesters said they had been on the streets since the election Sunday and had no intention of leaving any time soon.

"I have slept for just 10 of the 72 hours, but I am full of energy, enthusiasm and vigor," said Vitaly Rogatyuk, a 23-year-old reporter from Svitlovodsk.

He said he was ready to use force to bring Yushchenko to power.

Others, however, were more reserved as to how far they would go. "I don't feel like going to war," said Serhiy Sokurenko, 23, a radio technology student. "If there is a victory, it should only be peaceful."
Channel 5 and other media are reporting that bloodshed could occur in the city in the near future as the mass of opposition protesters - which Post reporters downtown have estimated at almost a million - meet the militiamen and "tourists" mobilized by the government.

Sources report that Kyiv's Borispyl airport has played host to a continuous stream of air troop convoys from Ukraine's east, in particular Donetsk and Dnipropetrovsk. Both city's are part of the core of Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych's support.

Sources report that a column of about 20 to 30 trucks are moving along Solomenska toward the city center; and that along Krasnozvezdnaya a "huge column of cars full of soldiers" are moving toward the bus terminal.

Hundreds of buses full of unknown people who refused to engage in dialogue with journalists and explain the reason for their coming to Kyiv have appeared in the capital over the last several days.

As the mass media has reported, they are probably supporters of Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych whom the government is bussing in from the country's eastern regions. Kyiv is also full of hundreds of militiamen and special forces.

Sources are also reporting that many soldiers from Ukraine's regions are being relocated to Kyiv. Defense Minister Oleksandr Kuzmuk denies these charges.

In particular, sources in the city of Alexandry reported to us today that a helicopter regiment has been dispatched to the capital.
 

Gettin' scary... with Georgia's recent election woes in mind, these developments, though not entirely unexpected, are troubling indeed. Sorta casts a whole new light on the petty squabbles over The US Elections.
 
 
'Gas princess' protests Ukraine election result
By Olena Horodetska
Kiev
November 25, 2004

 

Yulia Tymoshenko places carnations into the shields of anti-riot police in Kiev. The protesters believe liberal opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko had the election stolen from him.
Photo: Reuters

A firebrand opposition leader once dubbed Ukraine's "gas princess" is rallying hundreds of thousands of demonstrators through Kiev's snowy streets to protest against what they call a rigged presidential election.

A march on Tuesday increased the tension in the former Soviet republic already in turmoil since Sunday's election, which liberal opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko says was stolen from him by Ukraine's pro-Moscow Government.

Yulia Tymoshenko, who got the nickname because of her involvement in the country's gas industry, rallied supporters of the West-leaning Mr Yushchenko with a call for decisive action.

"We are going to go to the presidential administration in a peaceful way, without breaking anything. And either they will give up their power, or we will take it," declared Ms Tymoshenko.

The 43-year-old then led demonstrators in driving snow and freezing temperatures from Kiev's Independence Square to the presidential headquarters.

As the march came to a halt, she picked up a loudspeaker and urged police to join the demonstration. She and another opposition deputy later began talks with senior police officers, urging them to join the protest.

"I am asking you, the police, to be on the side of citizens of Ukraine!" Ms Tymoshenko yelled. All this was typical of the former machine factory manager who rose to become a driving force in the camp of Mr Yushchenko, locked in a crisis over Ukraine's presidency.

Now the head of the opposition parliamentary faction, Ms Tymoshenko has regularly won media beauty polls, while her charisma took her into office as a deputy prime minister in the government under Mr Yushchenko in 2000. But she faced criticism and was fired by outgoing president Leonid Kuchma after formal charges of forgery and smuggling gas were brought against her while head of a private gas trading firm in the mid-1990s.

We are going to go to the presidential administration in a peaceful way... either they will give up their power, or we will take it."
Yulia TymoshenkoMr Kuchma accused her several times of exceeding her powers as deputy prime minister. Never one to shy away from publicity, Ms Tymoshenko has denounced the criminal probes as a witch-hunt, saying her efforts to clean up the corrupt energy sector threatened the interests of powerful businessmen.

She spent a month in a detention centre following the investigation, but a court cleared her.

Ms Tymoshenko's rise was swift and she showed her entrepreneurial spirit right out of university during the 1980s in the Soviet period under Mikhail Gorbachev's perestroika reforms. She earned money by renting out films to rural cinemas in a venture with her father-in-law.

Ms Tymoshenko also once headed parliament's budget committee and a centrist parliamentary faction.

Always elegantly dressed, she has an economics degree and speaks English. She has a daughter, Evhenia, who studied in Britain.

- Reuters
 
 
I dunno Timber, a link can still be construed... Bush Jr is the President who swore he trusted Putin on his blue eyes, after all... I'm glad that the Bush administration does seem to be taking a strict stand on this new Ukrainian situation, good on 'em, but I think Kerry would have been tougher on Putin's like...
 
 
I hear ya nimh... but Kerry, Bush, Chirac, Schroeder, Martin, Howard, whoever in the end all boil down to immaterial. Putin will do as Putin will do, regardless of the wishes and pronouncements of world leaders. As, pretty much, do Chirac, Schroeder, Martin, Howard, et al.
 
 
What if, God forbid, Kuchma and Yanukovych (and behind the scenes, Putin) win out though... what will happen then?

Will the Ukrainians become passively resigned again, as they have mostly been in the past ten years of "bolshevik capitalism", so to say? Or will the West of the country refuse to acquiesce this time?

The East/West divide is historic and deeply-rooted... Fierce, if not violent political polarisation along territorial lines is a tricky mix...

Msolga, you're Ukrainian, or that is, your parents, grandparents? Ms Olga, of course...
 
 
 
SkyNews:  KIEV: HANDOVER OF POWER 

A peaceful handover of power has reportedly been agreed in the Ukraine after protesters clashed with anti-riot police outside the president's headquarters.

Tensions in the capital Kiev reached breaking point as tens of thousands of demonstrators surrounded the HQ.

They had been called on to march by opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko.

He and his supporters believed the presidential election, which took place at the weekend, was rigged.

According to the poll results, Kremlin-backed Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych won the presidency.

But after calls from outgoing president Leonid Kuchma for talks between the two sides, Mr Yanukovych stepped aside.

Mr Yushchenko will now become president, it has been reported.

The turmoil in the Ukraine followed a day of claims and counter-claims about the disputed presidential election, which has been condemned internationally as not being "free or fair"...
 

Anyone think this is the end of it?
 
 
That would be great!

In a way a proper little revolution would have been better because it would have allowed a clean sweep of the blackmailing, corrupt authoritarian clique, like they are doing in Georgia. Knowing Kuchma, a brokered agreement kind of handover (with someone who, let's not forget, once was his own prime minister) allows for much holding on to positions of power.

But still it would be great news. Because revolutions also tend to come with a lot of bloodshed, and considering the east/west divide in the Ukraine, even a civil war wouldn't be wholly unthinkable... happened before. I'd take any brokered agreement over that.

Its not on CNN yet, or BBC or Reuters, ZDF, or the Dutch news... but it would be good...

The BBC does report how Yanukovich finally broke his silence in a statement that seems geared to allow him to still step back:

 
On Wednesday he broke his public silence to say that the final results had to be "legitimate" to ensure there was no violence.

"I will not accept the results of the presidential election until it is proved to me and the Ukrainian people that they are legitimate and credible in accordance with conditions set down by the constitution," he said in a statement.

"I need no fictitious victory, a result which could lead to violence and victims. No position of authority, no matter how important, is worth a single human life."
 
 
 
 
Reuters:  Signs of Compromise Emerge in Ukraine Conflict 
Wed Nov 24, 2004 12:04 PM ET

By Olena Horodetska
KIEV (Reuters) - Ukraine's political crisis appeared to ease on Wednesday when both presidential candidates in a disputed election offered ways out of their bitter feud that has taken the country to the brink of violent conflict.

Liberal contender Viktor Yushchenko, who brought tens of thousands of supporters onto the streets after alleging he had been robbed of victory last Sunday by mass cheating, said he was now ready to take part in a new "honest" poll.

Moscow-backed Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich was, as expected, formally declared the winner by electoral authorities.

But earlier, he hinted that he too was open to compromise saying he was not interested in official results that handed him a "fictitious victory."

The signs of a compromise emerged as the United States, the European Union and the U.S.-led NATO military alliance all urged authorities to review the conduct of last Sunday's run-off which most western powers have said was fraudulently conducted.

Even Russian President Vladimir Putin, who quickly congratulated Yanukovich when it was clear he was winning, looked ready to see an end to the crisis in its ex-Soviet ally.

The Kremlin said that Putin and German Chancellor Gerhard Schroeder agreed, in a telephone conversation, that Ukraine should solve its crisis through legal means.

Though compromise was in the air, the central electoral commission went ahead with a rowdy session at which it declared that Yanukovich had won 49.46 per cent of the vote to 46.61 percent for Yushchenko.

Yushchenko's comments provided outgoing President Leonid Kuchma with a way to defuse the crisis that has convulsed the state of 47 million since early on Monday.

"We are ready to have a repeat of the second round vote provided we have an honest Central Election Commission," Yushchenko told tens of thousands of supporters massed in Kiev's main square...
 

Don't look much like much has ended, but mebbe folks really are lookin' for a peaceful way to end things. Untill the shootin' starts, there's hope.
 
 
Oops, didn't notice this second thread, and posted thus rather lonely on me own since Monday :wink:
 
 
Hey, Walter, how 'bout tossin' us a link to your thread?
 
 
I'm wearing my orange scarf. Will be going to the Ukrainian embassy tonight with colleages who are recent immigrants from Ukraine.

One spoke to family members again this morning. More sightings of Russian troops in Ukrainian uniform arriving at the train station in Kiev. The t.v. station they trust isn't broadcasting. Some are relying on her to get them the news of what's really going on.
 
 
 
Hey, Walter, how 'bout tossin' us a link to your thread?
 

Sorry, - and it will make eBeth's report better to understand as well -  HERE  it is :wink:
 
 
 
Oops, didn't notice this second thread, and posted thus rather lonely on me own since Monday :wink:
 

Sorry Walter, I expressly looked through the New Posts and International News pages to see if anything had turned up yet, but couldnt find any thread so started this one. Failed to look into the Europe page.

Ebeth, let us know how it goes tonight and what people are saying. The Russian soldiers in Ukrainian uniforms thing is unsurprising, but (all the more) alarming. In case the shit does hit the fan, I guess we know who will be intervening, covertly or openly.
 
 
Following to learn more.
 
 
 
Sorry Walter, I expressly looked through the New Posts and International News pages to see if anything had turned up yet, but couldnt find any thread so started this one. Failed to look into the Europe page.

 

No need for an excuse. :wink:
(Since recently a couple of Europe-related threads were moved by moderator from 'International News' to 'Europe', I voluntarily posted my thread there :wink: )
 
 
The Labour Party's Eastern Europe-focused Alfred Mozer Stichting hastily organised an expert meeting on the events in the Ukraine (and parallell brewing stuff in Byelorussia) tonight, with a Ukrainian activist, a Byelarussian activist from the Coalition for Europe and the spouse of one of the journalists that went missing in Byelorussia, as well as a European parliamentarian and someone from the Ministry of Foreign Affairs...

I'd wanted to go, but they were already fully reserved... its a hot topic... otherwise I woulda reported back. So-rry
 
 
We've got some people from Byelorusse here. They're coming to the Ukrainian embassy with us tonight - they don't want things in Ukraine to go the Byelorusse direction.
 
 
I sooo hope that the opposition chooses 1989/1991-style passive resistance, and that it will work again. So far it looks quite promising. Yanukowych said he would "only accept the vote if it is provably correct", Yushchenko suggested to repeat the second round of the election under heavier checks and balances. On the face of it, it seems like both are trying to solve this in a civilized way.
 
 
Well, I have read; I have listened and it seems to me that the cold war is heating up.

Strange that it all comes down to the balance of power once again.

pity this busy monster,manunkind,

not. Progress is a comfortable disease:
your victim (death and life safely beyond)

plays with the bigness of his littleness
--electrons deify one razorblade
into a mountainrange;lenses extend

unwish through curving wherewhen till unwish
returns on its unself.
A world of made
is not a world of born--pity poor flesh

and trees, poor stars and stones,but never this
fine specimen of hypermagical

ultraomnipotence. We doctors know

a hopeless case if--listen:there's a hell
of a good universe next door;let's go
 
 
General strike call raises stakes in Ukraine
November 25, 2004 - 8:24AM/the AGE

Election officials today declared Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych the winner of Ukraine's presidential election, prompting opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko and his allies to call for a nationwide strike to protest what his camp contends was brazen vote fraud.

"My actions to combat the current regime will be even more consistent and powerful," Yushchenko pledged. "This decision puts Ukraine on the verge of civil conflict."

Kremlin-backed Yanukovich won 49.46 per cent of Sunday's vote, against reformist Yushchenko's 46.61 per cent, the Central Election Commission said in announcing the final results earlier Wednesday.

Yushchenko called for an "all-Ukrainian political strike."

Addressing hundreds of thousands of opposition supporters gathered in central Independence Square, Socialist Party leader Oleksandr Moroz said: "The all-Ukrainian national strike means that we are organising citizens, stopping lessons at schools and universities, stopping work at enterprises, stopping transport... and, thus, we'll force the authorities to think about what they are doing."

Yuliya Tymoshenko, Yushchenko's key ally, said the opposition will "surround all government buildings, block railways, airports and highways."

"We have a strict intention to seize power in our hands at these sites," she said, vowing a "consistent struggle that will lead to the destruction of this regime."

She also said the opposition would go to Ukraine's Supreme Court on Thursday to protest the alleged election fraud, and urged supporters to remain in the central Kiev square.

Yushchenko, who led the crowd in chanting: "we will not give up," called the election commission results "their latest crime."

"With this decision, they want to put us on our knees," he told his followers as the crowd chanted: "Shame! Shame!"

Meanwhile, Yanukovich said negotiations with Yushchenko's team would begin on Thursday, the Interfax news agency reported, citing Ukrainian television.

"We will be looking for common language," he was quoted as saying. "Ukraine is our common land, and we should have a chance to live together as well as possible."

The prime minister's staff declined to comment on the report.

US Secretary of State Colin Powell said the United States considered the election results illegitimate. European Union nations had already severely criticised the vote.

"If the Ukrainian government does not act immediately and responsibly there will be consequences for our relationship, for Ukraine's hopes for a Euro-Atlantic integration and for individuals responsible for perpetrating fraud," Powell said.

Yushchenko and his allies have accused authorities of rigging Sunday's vote in favour of Yanukovich, a claim backed by Western observers.

Outgoing President Leonid Kuchma said Yushchenko supporters were trying to "carry out... a plan of a coup d'etat." He called "on all political forces to negotiate immediately," and on the international community to "refrain from interference in Ukraine's affairs."

Kuchma called the election "an examination of the maturity and democracy of all the Ukrainian people. "We will pass this exam," he said.

The election commission announcement came after a flurry of statements on the possibility of negotiations to find a compromise, which Kuchma had proposed earlier.

Mykola Tomenko, a lawmaker and Yushchenko ally, told the Western-leaning politician's earlier today that the opposition would only negotiate a handover of power to Yushchenko.

Yushchenko claimed victory on Tuesday over Yanukovich in the presidential run-off, which many Western nations said did not meet democratic standards. In a sign he would not back down, he took a symbolic oath of office.

The election has led to an increasingly tense tug-of-war between the West and Moscow, which considers Ukraine part of its sphere of influence and a buffer between Russia and eastward-expanding NATO.

Russian President Vladimir Putin has already congratulated Yanukovich on his victory, and the Kremlin-controlled Russian parliament denounced the Ukrainian opposition for its "illegal actions."

The opposition supporters have taken over blocks of Kiev's main street, setting up a giant tent camp. Yanukovich supporters have become increasingly visible in Kiev, also setting up hundreds of tents on a nearby wooded slope.

Kiev's city council and the administrations of four other sizable cities - Lviv, Ternopil, Vinnytsia and Ivano-Frankivsk - have refused to recognise a Yanukovich victory.

- AP
 
 
Fox News says it appears civil war is imminent.

They showed riot police (from Russia?) in gear and massing.

Keep getting waves of chillbumps.

Another fight for freedom.

Solidarity with Ukraine. I couldn't bear it if they are massacred like so many before them.
 
 
 
Recent from msnbc. 

Has clickable links to related history for those interested--and links to Powell's remarks.

It appears, from what I read, that fraud was witnessed.

Powell has said there will be consequences... (To whom? The govt of Ukraine? Russia?) I think we've rejected the results of the vote.

It's breathtaking to watch a country mass and demand their voice be heard. Powerful. Majestic. There's nothing like it.
 
 
 last night at the place i just came from 

glad i went, though i'm pretty cold and damp
i'll go again on Friday or the weekend if things continue to develop

The CBC this morning interviewed a father and daughter team who went as election observers. The most bizarre thing (IMNSHO) they described was a polling station the daughter was at, where pens with invisible ink seemed to have been provided. People voted, the scrutineers put the ballots away, hours laterm, at counting time, the ballots were blank. Apparently, if more than 10% of the ballots at a polling station are spoiled, the results from that entire polling station are discarded - so about 40 people gathered round and tried to figure out what the invisible ink ballots might have been! They apparently decided the votes would probably be for the ruling party.
 
 
Good on you, ehBeth!
 
 
I'm really glad I went, msOlga, even though I didn't stay long (dogs, ya know). Kinda knew I HAD to (for me) when someone at work asked me why I was going - "you're not Ukrainian, are you?" - Well, no, I'm not Ukrainian, but I care about what's happening there for many reasons - and dang it's time to walk the talk (sometimes I hate that phrase - tonight I lived it).
 
 
 

I'm wondering how Ukrainians in Oz will respond, eh Beth.
 
 
 look here, msOlga  - appears they're starting to take notice - though things are a bit more active here right now
 
 
Thank you for that ehBeth!  
 
 
 
It appears, from what I read, that fraud was witnessed.
 

Hell yeah. This from one of the Dutch newspapers, yesterday:

<goes off to look>

Damn, the article isn't online. I read it in my lunch. If it werent so sad, it would have been kind of funny - it listed a mindboggling range of fraud practices witnessed during the Ukrainian elections. Let me try to remember some by heart.

The one with the invisible pen was the most surreal. Without the signature of the election precinct chief, your vote is invalid. This one precinct chief signed (some?) votes with his invisible pen. Unclear how widespread the practice was.

Fraud centred around two patterns. In the pro-Russian, pro-Kuchma East, it was focused on forcing turnout up. And so, a journalist witnessed how one voting box was filled with real votes, while two more were kept behind in another room - and at the end of the day, all three were full.

But that was primitive kids stuff. The Kuchma machine has money. So there is another way. Apparently, voters arrive at the precinct with their empty ballot. The Yanukovich fellow outside buys their empty ballot, in exchange for one already filled in for Yanukovich. He fills in the empty one he just bought for Yanukovich, and gives it to the next voter in line, in return for his empty ballot. Et cetera.

There's collective ways to buy votes too. In the East, the apparatchiks are all pro-Kuchma. In one town, the factory workers (I think it was) were told that if their precinct did not yield a high turnout and ample Yanukovich victory, the workers would not be paid the next month. Simple. Workers in the Ukraine know about not being paid, so its at the same time unremarkable and effective enough. With soldiers it works even better of course.

And of course, with the co-operation of the local apparatchiks, more subtle ways again were practiced. They had the population registers, and knew who would not in any case be coming out to vote (too old, sick). Those votes were cast "for them" - and for Yanukovich. Lot of dead people got to vote too.

In the end, one of the two major cities in the East had a turnout of 96%. Smaller places had a turnout of over 100%. Oops.

In the West, on the other hand, where there was no way people were going to vote for Yanukovich in any great numbers, the trick was to depress turnout. Hence disappearing ballot boxes. Hence self-erasing ink, probably. Hence thousands of people whose name suddenly did not appear on the voting lists anymore.

Hence, also, various subtle ways to invalidate votes. A precinct chief whom the voters hand their ballot needed to only press his nail into the Yanukovich box on a Yushchenko ballot to invalidate the vote.

Mind you, in the West fraud was also observed in Yushchenko's favour. But the overwhelming majority of fraud was unsurprisingly in the regime's favour.

Damn, wish I had that article.
 
 
You'll find it, nimh! Of that I'm certain. :wink:
 
 
World condemns Ukraine's disputed poll
November 25, 2004

 
Flower power... riot police - with carnations inserted into their shields by opposition supporters - guard the presidential administration building in Kiev.
Photo: AP

Ukraine's Moscow-backed Prime Minister, Viktor Yanukovich, at the centre of a political crisis over the disputed presidential poll, said he saw no reason for opposition street demonstrations.

A third day of mass protests began in the frigid capital yesterday, a day after the opposition presidential candidate, Viktor Yushchenko, took a symbolic oath of office in parliament.

Speaking at a government meeting yesterday, Mr Yanukovich, who appears poised to be declared winner of Sunday's run-off vote, shrugged off the huge rallies of Yushchenko supporters, saying: "We [ordinary people] have all we need to be able to live normally. Nothing extraordinary is taking place."

Ukraine's central electoral commission said yesterday that it would announce the final results of the disputed presidential poll later in the day.

On Tuesday, with 99.48 per cent of precincts counted, official but still not final results gave Mr Yanukovich 49.39 per cent of the vote against 46.71 per cent for Mr Yushchenko. Exit polls had put Mr Yushchenko well ahead.

Mr Yushchenko's supporters massed at Independence Square and the Supreme Rada, Ukraine's 450-seat parliament, their numbers reaching an estimated 200,000 on Tuesday. That night, they marched to the presidential administration building, where they were met by lines of riot police standing 12 deep.

The risk of violent unrest in the former Soviet republic of 48 million people heightened as both sides claimed victory and stepped up their rhetoric following the vote that Western European observers said was marked by widespread fraud.

"Ukraine is on the threshold of a civil conflict," Mr Yushchenko said in parliament on Tuesday. "We have two choices: Either the answer will be given by the parliament, or the streets will give an answer." Supporters cheered as he took the oath, which has no legal status.

In the face of the protests and strong condemnation from the US and the European Union, the Government appeared to hesitate. President Leonid Kuchma, who supported Mr Yanukovich, called for negotiations.

But the opposition said yesterday it would not negotiate. Mykola Tomenko, a close aide to Mr Yushchenko, told the huge crowd: "I want to tell you that we will not hold negotiations with Yanukovich and the people who surround him."

The White House said in a statement: "We strongly support efforts to review the conduct of the election and urge Ukrainian authorities not to certify results until investigations of organised fraud are resolved."

Jan Peter Balkenende, the Dutch Prime Minister, whose country holds the rotating presidency of the European Union, telephoned Mr Kuchma to express the presidency's "serious concerns" about the election.

The NATO Secretary-General, Jaap de Hoop Scheffer, summoned the Ukrainian ambassador to express the alliance's disappointment with the way the presidential election was handled, officials said yesterday. The German Chancellor, Gerhard Schroder, told his parliament yesterday that the election showed massive fraud.

But Russia, which backed Mr Yanukovich, dismissed foreign charges of electoral fraud as premature and arrogant.

Vaclav Havel, the former Czech president and leader of the 1989 "Velvet Revolution" that overthrew Communist rule, yesterday urged Ukrainians to keep up their protests.

"All respected domestic and international organisations agree that your demands are justified. Therefore I wish you strength, endurance, courage and fortunate decisions," Mr Havel said in a statement from Taipei, where he was travelling.

The role of the Communist Party in parliamentary manoeuvring remains critical. It did not endorse a candidate in the second round of voting despite pressure from Russia to back Mr Yanukovich. If it sides with Mr Yushchenko there would be enough votes to demand a review of the election and the 11,000 violations that the Yushchenko campaign claims to have collated.

The Washington Post, The New York Times, Reuters
 
 
Government Warns U.S. Citizens in Ukraine

1 hour, 11 minutes ago White House - AP Cabinet & State

WASHINGTON - The State Department is alerting U.S. citizens to the potential for civil unrest in Ukraine, following that country's disputed presidential elections.

The U.S. Embassy in Kiev has urged Americans living in Ukraine to remain vigilant about the possibility of election-related demonstrations and disturbances following Ukraine's presidential election Sunday. That advice is in effect until Dec. 7.

The election results are in dispute and many police forces have gathered around the rallies in Kiev.

U.S. citizens are urged to avoid the demonstrations and areas around them.

The State Department cited reports that certain intercity travel in Ukraine is now restricted and buses and trains to Kiev have been canceled.

Americans who travel to Ukraine are urged to register with the U.S. Embassy in Kiev or check the State Department's travel Web site.
 
 
I hope that everyone, everywhere, who cares about this gets out to express their support. Apparently, there are images going back to Kiev on photo-phones showing the supporters in other countries - it's a good thing when their media is having some difficulties getting news out.
 
 
 
U.S. citizens are urged to avoid the demonstrations and areas around them.

 

Seems to be a bit difficult, at least in Kiev itself, when one follows the latest news.

 
... it's a good thing when their media is having some difficulties getting news out.
 

 Neeka's Backlog  seems to be quite reliable: she works as a freelance journalist for euro-correspondent.com.
 
 
 
Fox News says it appears civil war is imminent.
 

Sounds like Fox. They wish!  
 
 
Interesting statement from Moscow:

 
Duma issues statement on Ukraine
November 25, 2004 Posted: 09:05 Moscow time (05:05 GMT)

MOSCOW - The State Duma of the Russian Federation called on Ukraine to solve its political problems in accordance with the Ukrainian Constitution and election laws.

In their statement, State Duma deputies expressed deep concern about the unlawful actions of Ukraine's radical opposition forces, which could lead to tragic consequences for the Ukrainian people. "Only the Central Election Commission of Ukraine, in accordance with Ukrainian laws, has the right to announce election results, and any pressure on the Central Election Commission should be ruled out," the statement says.

Though competition was tough, the election took place, State Duma deputies said, and Russia was very much concerned with the results. The members of the State Duma respected the will of the Ukrainian people, expressed through voting, and hoped that the situation would stabilize in Ukraine, and the country's authorities, political and public figures, together with the Ukrainian people, would themselves settle the crisis, without being dictated by outside forces, the statement said.

"Any actions aimed at seizing power are seen as crime in any country of the world," the State Duma stressed in its statement.

The Russian parliamentarians appealed to their Ukrainian colleagues to show political wisdom and responsibility and make everything possible to solve the crisis. The State Duma also expressed readiness to further develop friendship and ties between Russia and Ukraine.

The statement was passed by a vote of 423 to 0, with 6 abstentions.

Meanwhile, the Central Election Commission of Ukraine is going to announce the final results of Sunday's presidential election at 17:00 Moscow time on Wednesday.

According to unofficial reports, Viktor Yanukovich gathered 49.52 percent of the vote, and Viktor Yushchenko had 46.66 percent, Echo of Moscow radio reported.
 
 Source 
 
 
Certainly doesn't appear there's nuch call to stop worryin'

 Kyiv Post: Opposition calls for general strike 

 News-Telegraph(UK): "We will face the tanks if we have to" - protestors 

 NYT: Powell Says U.S. Will Not Accept Final Tally in Ukraine 
 
 
Nice hedge: "In accordance with Ukrainian laws"... Certainly they're not insinuating that the election commission would break that law?
 
 
Walesa heads to Ukraine to help mediate
November 25, 2004 - 9:39PM

Lech Walesa, the founder of Poland's Solidarity movement, flew to Ukraine to help mediate in the crisis over the disputed election, underscoring strong Polish interest in a peaceful resolution for the country's eastern neighbour.

Walesa flew to Kiev early on Wednesday morning, his office said.

Ahead of his departure, Walesa said he hoped his experience in fighting to overthrow a Moscow-backed authoritarian regime in his home country would be of use in the current standoff in Ukraine.

"I hope that Ukraine can avoid the mistakes that Poland made, such as the imposition of martial law," Walesa was quoted as saying by Polish news agency PAP.

"This simply divided the nation, killed people's enthusiasm, forced people to immigrate from Poland."

Walesa launched the Solidarity movement in 1980, rallying workers as part of eastern Europe's first free labour union.

He presided over round-table talks in 1989 that led to the peaceful end of communism in Poland, and was elected president the following year.

© 2004 AP
 
 
 
Nice hedge: "In accordance with Ukrainian laws"... Certainly they're not insinuating that the election commission would break that law?
 

Oh, never!
 
 
Want to freak out? Read this:

 
Mystery surrounds Yushchenko ailment

VIENNA, Austria (AP) -- What ails Viktor Yushchenko?

 
Yushchenko pictured left in July 2004 and in November, after his illness.

As Ukraine's popular pro-Western opposition leader claimed victory Tuesday in hotly contested presidential elections, the mystery surrounding an appearance-altering illness that twice prompted him to check into a Vienna hospital persisted.

Yushchenko accused the Ukrainian authorities of poisoning him. His detractors suggested he'd eaten some bad sushi.

Adding to the intrigue, the Austrian doctors who treated him have asked foreign experts to help determine if his symptoms may have been caused by toxins found in biological weapons.

Medical experts said they may never know for sure what befell Yushchenko.

But the illness, whatever it was, has dramatically changed his appearance since he first sought treatment at Vienna's private Rudolfinerhaus clinic on September 10.

Known for his ruggedly handsome, almost movie star looks, Yushchenko's complexion is now pockmarked. His face is haggard, swollen and partially paralyzed. One eye often tears up.

Doctors at Rudolfinerhaus declined to comment Tuesday. By the time Yushchenko checked out of the clinic last month after returning for follow-up treatment, physicians said they could neither prove nor rule out that he had been poisoned.

Dr. Nikolai Korpan, who oversaw Yushchenko's treatment in Vienna, said the cause of his illness remained "totally open.''

Doctors were unable to confirm suspicions of poisoning because Yushchenko first checked into the clinic four days after the symptoms appeared -- too late for tests to show if poisoning had occurred, Korpan said.

At Rudolfinerhaus, Yushchenko underwent a week of intensive treatment for several illnesses, including acute pancreatitis, a viral skin disease and nerve paralysis on the left side of his face, Korpan said.

Clinic director Michael Zimpfer said doctors were unable to explain some of Yushchenko's symptoms, particularly his strong backaches.

He said they could not rule out stress or a viral infection.

Yushchenko's doctors in Kiev, the Ukrainian capital, said they had determined that "chemicals not of a food origin'' had triggered the illness.

Zimpfer and the clinic's chief physician, Dr. Lothar Wicke -- who requested police protection after receiving an anonymous threat while treating Yushchenko -- later asked for outside help from "a specialist in military operations and biological weapons,'' the Austria Press Agency reported.

Yushchenko's medical files since have been sealed and turned over to Austrian prosecutors, local media reported.

Authorities have not said whether they planned to investigate further or merely turn over their findings to Ukraine.

Earlier this month, Volodymyr Syvkovych, the head of a 15-member Ukrainian parliamentary commission that investigated the mysterious illness, said a forensic medical examination found no traces of "any biological weapons'' in Yushchenko's blood, nails, hair or urine.
 

More pics with the article  here .

How much WMD stocks (chemical weapons and the like) does the Ukraine have?

Anyone remember the "umbrella murder" carried out by the Bulgarian communist government, back when?
 
 
That's an extraordinary change, nimh! Spooky!
 
 
 
 
Fox News says it appears civil war is imminent.
 

Sounds like Fox. They wish!  
 

Could you possibly explain this? The world is saying it, yet you single out FOX?

Walter--

It is a standard State Department advisory. I imagine they think people should stay in their homes, or get out of Kiev. They would be remiss if they remained silent about it.
 
 
 
 
 
Fox News says it appears civil war is imminent.
 

Sounds like Fox. They wish!  
 

Could you possibly explain this? The world is saying it, yet you single out FOX?
 

As I gather it, the world is saying that civil war is a possibility. Maybe I'm reading too much certainty into the "imminent", but it fit into my viewing experience that Fox has a particular weakness for scenarios that end up loud, spectacular and explosive, and likes to create this drum-roll like atmosphere of anticipation before they even happen. Not that other media outlets don't like a nice, noisy war to report about, but I think the weakness is more pronounced in American than in European TV stations, and more pronounced at Fox than at any other American outlet. Hence my reaction.

(And apart from all that, I wasn't 100% serious, which I hoped to make clear with that winky face.)
 
 
Hope for peaceful resolution? Perhaps:

 
BBC:  Ukraine poll plea goes to court 

The Ukrainian opposition has taken its case to the Supreme Court as foreign leaders are asked to help resolve the bitter presidential election dispute.
Liberal opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko called for a general strike after election officials declared Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych the winner.

Yanukovych supporters have vowed to ignore the strike call while opposition protests continue in the capital, Kiev.

A deputy minister has resigned in protest at the controversial poll.

"When the European community does not recognise the results of the election, what kind of European integration we can speak of?" said Oleg Hayduk, Deputy Minister for Economics, as he announced his departure.

President Vladimir Putin of Russia, visiting The Hague for a summit with European Union leaders, called for the dispute to be settled in the courts and urged restraint.

"We have no moral right to push a major European country to mass mayhem," he told EU leaders who said they could not recognise an election result which failed to meet international standards.

According to the official election result, Mr Yanukovych won with 49.46% of the vote against Mr Yushchenko's 46.61%.

Legal challenge

Mr Yushchenko's supporters say the authorities oversaw massive fraud in Sunday's election - and independent observers have also reported widespread abuses.

An official at Mr Yushchenko's headquarters confirmed that a complaint had been filed at the Supreme Court over the handling of the poll by the Central Electoral Commission (CEC)...
 

More to come, though... thats for sure.
 
 
They've got a short description of that AMS expert meeting about Ukraine & Byelorussia last night online now... lemme translate...

 
What is happening in the Ukraine and Byelorussia?
 
 
 
Thanks for that. nimh.

Here's yet more of the "More to come" stuff:

 
Reuters:  Ukraine Court Blocks Yanukovich Taking Power 
Thu Nov 25, 2004 02:07 PM ET

By Ron Popeski
KIEV (Reuters) - Ukraine's highest court on Thursday blocked the inauguration of the Moscow-backed prime minister as president, putting fresh wind in the sails of his liberal opponent who has led street protests to overturn his election.

The Supreme Court rejected official publication of results that showed Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich had beaten Viktor Yushchenko in a run-off election on Sunday. The ruling effectively stopped Yanukovich being sworn in as head of state.

The West-leaning Yushchenko, who says he was robbed of victory by electoral fraud, hailed the ruling as a victory.

"This is only the beginning. It is proof that it is society that always wins. It is small compensation for the suffering that we have endured," he told tens of thousands of supporters on Kiev's Independence Square to wild cheering...
 

Boy them Russkies... they sure love chess, don't they?
 
 
PORA!, by the way (where the guy in my post above is from) is a democratic movement of youngsters that, like Kmara earlier in Georgia, has taken the example of the famous Otpor!, which played such a crucial role in the last Serbian uprising against Milosevic.

Otpor! youngsters have even been giving trainings, first to Kmara and later to Pora!, on civil disobedience and the like. The BBC reported that "Pora, mainly made up of students, [..] is prepared to take considerable risks. On Sunday, some of them lay underneath buses to stop pro-Yanukovych voters with absentee ballots being transported to polling stations far from their homes."

It also remarked that "on Monday, at least one Georgian flag could be seen being waved in the demonstration that filled Kiev's Independence Square." A democratic Internationale of youngsters who are fed up with their corrupt, authoritarian ex-communist rulers, whaddaya know! Similar movements have been founded in Byelorussia and, I hear, Albania...

Check  the PORA website  !
 
 
How bad was voter fraud? Pretty damn bad:

 
 Transitions Online: From Run-Off to Showdown 

According to the opposition, opposition members of local election commissions were expelled from their commissions in the eastern Donetsk and Luhansk oblasts along with 400 commission members in the Kirovohrad oblast. Election observers from the opposition were prevented from observing at polling stations in the regions of Donetsk, Sumy, and Kirovohrad.

In the Donetsk oblast, international observers from the European Network of Election Monitoring Organizations were also prevented by election officials from entering polling stations.

Election commission members, election observers, and journalists were assaulted and beaten in virtually all of Ukraine's 27 oblasts according to the nonpartisan Committee of Voters. Some were kidnapped and then released. Dozens of polling stations were attacked by unknown assailants who broke windows and furniture and interfered with voting on election day.

In the Cherkasy oblast in central Ukraine, one policeman was beaten and tied up by six masked gunmen who broke into the safe containing election documents, and another policeman was beaten to death at a polling station from which election documents were stolen. At two polling stations in Kiev, the capital, unknown intruders splashed acid over ballot boxes, partially invalidating the votes cast.

[..] a major problem largely unseen in the first round emerged this time: the use of absentee ballots. The election law allows local election commissions to provide voters with absentee ballots prior to election day. [..] the absentee ballots themselves, unlike regular ballots, are simple pieces of paper without any built-in protection.

[..] Ihor Popov, the chairman of the Committee of Voters, estimates that "tens of thousands" of duplicate votes were cast by voters who were issued multiple absentee ballots in areas that back Yanukovych and who were then bused to regions where support for Yanukovych was weaker.

Hundreds of buses with migrant voters were observed moving across the country on election day. In Kiev, activists from the youth movement Pora lay down in front of buses filled with voters holding multiple absentee ballots to prevent them from entering the city.

[..] The security forces have been preparing for clashes for weeks. Official sources have publicized the drafting of thousands of extra police into the capital and special exercises aimed at reasserting control if there is widespread disorder.

[..] It is now anyone's guess whether the government would actually be willing to send the police in to disperse demonstrators.

The calculations will be complicated by recent signs that some officers in the law enforcement agencies are wary of being pulled into a possible conflict with the opposition. On 21 November, a major in a Berkut riot police unit, Hennadiy Abramchuk, appeared on TV to denounce "illegal orders" issued by his superiors to use force against demonstrators.

Abramchuk was fired from the police service the same day.
 
 
 
More about the youth movement for democracy in Ukraine and how it echoes those that fronted the Georgian and Serbian revolutions in this article:  Georgia's Long Shadow , also in Transitions-Online.

In it, the author (still less than hopeful when he was writing it just before the elections) describes how the regime has tried to defuse it by a combination of clamping down on it forcefully and staging artifical copies of its own.

Also interesting to keep up with the latest with:
 The Kyiv Post 

For example this item. Strikes are affecting several of the normally reliably pro-regime TV stations, and at one station the journalists have already succeeded in turning out their editor, promising the viewers that from now on, they'll report honestly and fairly again:

 
 Regime's control over TV media crumbling 

As the fifth evening of growing civil protests approached on Nov. 25, it became clear that the ruling regime's control over television media was crumbling.

Ukrainian President Leonid Kuchma's establishment had, according to oppositionist political forces and media experts, used their control over a handful of channels with nationwide coverage to manipulate voters.

[But] on Nov. 25, privately owned television channel 1+1 announced that Vyacheslav Pikhovshek had been removed as editor of the venue's news programs.

Oppositionist political figures have accused Pikhovshek of spreading biased news coverage designed to lower support for Yushchenko while beefing up Kuchma and his allies.

A recent survey of journalists funded by Democratic Initiatives Foundation, a western-funded NGO, singled out Pikhovshek as the "least trusted" journalist in Ukraine.

[..] News programs on 1+1 virtually disappeared earlier this week after journalists and editors and the channel went on strike in protest of alleged pressure from management and certain political forces to produce biased media coverage that favored Kuchma and allies.

In a statement issued late on Nov. 25, the news team announced that they would resume with fair coverage that evening.

"We guarantee that all information distributed by our channel will be complete, in accordance with professional standards of journalism," the statement reads.

At 7:30 pm on Nov. 25, news coverage on TSN resumed, but started with a short statement from the channel's editorial team. The collective said they would resume news reports but promised they would be objective, explaining that previous editorial policy was not so, due to political pressure.

Pikhovshek's departure from TSN follows strikes by journalists at state-owned television channel First National Channel, known as UT-1, and at other channels. They include ICTV, owned by Kuchma's son-in-law Viktor Pinchuk, reputably Ukraine's second richest man.
 

(Oh, in case you'll read that full article and you're a leftist trying to find your way around the country's landscape, you'll read about the Social-Democrats (United), who support the Kuchma / Yakunovich regime. The Socialists, however, are among both the most strident and most important supporters of the Yushchenko-led uprising now. The Communists, finally, are supposed to be reliable (because pro-Russian) regime supporters, but refused to come out in support for Yakunovich this time, hedging their bets instead.)
 
 
Thanks, nimh.

Reading and reading.
The article on the media is very interesting. I wish I could get my colleague to chime in here. She was a media buyer when she was in Kiev - has lots of interesting stories about the lying and corruption.

and here's a tiny funny. Her new husband, here from Kiev for less than a year, was charged with bringing orange scarves, something to the support demo last night. He ran around their apartment, found a scarf for her, and in a panic grabbed an orange nylon-flowered lei for himself. He's a sport. Wore the lei over his winter jacket at the demo.  
 
 
Nimh is now my primary source of Ukrainian news.

Impressive display nimh, and appreciated.
 
 
And don't forget to take me  
 Ukraine Protesters Blockade Official Buildings 

 
KIEV (Reuters) - Thousands of supporters of opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko blockaded official buildings in the Ukrainian capital Friday in a direct challenge to the Moscow-backed government's control of the country.

As foreign envoys arrived in Kiev for urgent talks with Ukraine's leaders to try to resolve the crisis over a contested election, protesters effectively took over Kiev city center.

They barred entry to the main offices of the government, parliament and presidency, sealing off approach roads to traffic by blocking them with buses.

They turned away employees trying to enter the buildings, telling them: "There's a strike on."

Outside the president's offices, crowds sang Ukrainian folk songs, waved banners in Yushchenko's orange campaign colors and rhythmically chanted his name.

But they did not try to cross the lines of special forces around the building.

Socialist leader Oleksander Moroz, a Yushchenko ally who was on the spot, said supporters' action made a mockery of government control.

Asked how long the supporters would keep up their protest, he said: "Victory began yesterday," adding that some members of the police were switching sides to support the demonstrators.

Yushchenko's camp got a boost Thursday after the Supreme Court put off the inauguration of Moscow-backed Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich as president.

His election in a run-off vote last Sunday brought tens of thousands out on the streets of Kiev and in western regions. Yushchenko said he was the real winner and was cheated out of the election.

The campaign of civil obedience is part of a strategy by Yushchenko and his allies that involves a national strike, including a blockade of main highways.

Foreign envoys were arriving in Kiev and were to meet the principal figures in the standoff in attempts to defuse the crisis.

Polish President Aleksander Kwasniewski, a pivotal regional figure with credibility on both sides, flew in from Warsaw and was meeting outgoing President Leonid Kuchma outside Kiev.

European Union foreign policy chief Javier Solana also arrived. Jan Kubis, secretary-general of the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe, was expected.

Lithuanian President Valdas Adamkus was also due in Ukraine after being asked by Kuchma to help mediate.

Solana, a spokeswoman said, wants to discuss "a negotiated diplomatic solution" with Yushchenko, Yanukovich and Kuchma, stepping down after a 10-year term marked by scandal.

Poland's Kwasniewski has proposed a three-point plan, which includes verifying election results, potentially annulling those tainted by irregularities and the renunciation of violence by all sides.

Yushchenko has vowed to remain in the square with his supporters until the election result is overturned. He has said he is prepared to take part in another election if it is "honestly" run.

Western countries have bluntly criticized official results proclaiming Yanukovich president. The EU and the United States said the election fell far short of international standards and called for a review of its conduct and outcome.

Relations with the EU, three of whose states now border Ukraine, formed an important campaign issue. Yushchenko sees gradual integration with Europe as a critical post-Soviet principle. Yanukovich says Ukraine can be prosperous only if it develops ties with other ex-Soviet states.

The election has strained relations between the West and Russia, fearful of losing its hold over Ukraine. President Vladimir Putin has congratulated Yanukovich on his win.

Thursday's Supreme Court ruling barred publication of results in the official gazette, effectively stopping Yanukovich becoming head of state for now. It also agreed to hear next Monday Yushchenko's complaint alleging cheating in the poll.

Yanukovich looked harried in a brief appearance on state television Thursday night, but repeated that the election had been fair.

He said Western countries had no right to condone opposition calls for further demonstrations to reverse the result.

"I believe that resolving issues in the street, appeals to resolve matters through pressure or revolution are a deviation from the very democratic norms advocated by countries making declarations at the moment," he said.

 
 
 
 
 
 Regime's control over TV media crumbling 
 

 

The same news now digested on BBC, and its impact:

 
TV stations rebel

On Thursday, state-owned TV station UT1 rebelled against government control by announcing live on air that its news team was joining opposition protests.

Two TV stations have pledged to provide balanced coverage
Hours earlier the private, formerly pro-government channel One Plus One announced it would stop broadcasting "biased news".

Mr Yushchenko started the presidential campaign as Ukraine's most popular politician, and it took an enormous propaganda effort on state-run TV channels to make Mr Yanukovych look like a real contender, say correspondents.

The move may mean pictures making plain the huge size of the opposition demonstrations will now reach the heartlands of Mr Yanukovych's support in the industrial east of the country, reports BBC world media correspondent Sebastian Usher.

 
 
 
On a flippant note... its a very picturesque uprising, isn't it? With all that warm, flaming orange in stark contrast to the bleak winter landscape... ;-)

 
 
 
Just a silly and inessential question....
why does Yushchenko look so harsh?
 
 
 
Just a silly and inessential question....
why does Yushchenko look so harsh?
 

There has been speculation about this since some months, summarised on the page before:

 http://www.able2know.com/forums/viewtopic.php?t=39599&postdays=0&postorder=asc&start=40 
 
 
Kiev's man in Canberra takes stand
By Mark Forbes
Foreign Affairs Correspondent
Canberra
November 26, 2004/the AGE

With Ukraine on the brink of civil war, its ambassador to Australia is initiating an extraordinary international campaign against his own Government, supporting protests against electoral fraud.

Olexandr Mischenko is calling on all of Ukraine's ambassadors to "stand together with Ukrainian people" to force an investigation into the discredited election of President Viktor Yanukovich. He warned his nation risked going "back to communist days".

Rival candidate Viktor Yushchenko yesterday called for a national strike against the "fraudulent" presidential vote. Thousands of protesters continued their fourth day of demonstrations, occupying Kiev's main square.

Outgoing President Leonid Kuchma, a supporter of the pro-Russian Mr Yanukovich, warned Ukraine could plunge into civil war and urged the West to stay out of the country's affairs.

Mr Yushchenko also warned Ukraine was on the brink of civil conflict after election officials defied international protests and declared the result.

US Secretary of State Colin Powell said the election was illegitimate, with numerous and credible reports of fraud. "If the Ukrainian Government does not act immediately and responsibly there will be consequences for our relationship," he said.

Foreign Minister Alexander Downer said the election result "just belies all credibility, I'm afraid, and we certainly don't accept the results of the election".

Mr Downer said Australia had been told Ukrainian embassies overseas had been ordered to falsify voting returns in favour of Mr Yanukovich.

Mr Mischenko told The Age he had a duty to support democracy and could not remain silent, for the sake of his nation.

"We must have a full investigation of the results of the presidential election, we cannot go back to our communist past. It's why 300,000 people stand in the terrible weather in the street."

Mr Mischenko said Ukrainians must "struggle for a constitutional right to elect and be elected, notwithstanding manipulations, falsifications, pressure and intimidation". He

Was confident his counterparts would support the call and force an investigation. He said he had been inspired by junior diplomats supporting the street protests.

"Due to our authority, we have to do our best for the truth on the results of the elections in Ukraine to be determined through the court," he said.

Mr Mischenko has distributed his open statement to embassies across the world. "I believe in your patriotism and national consciousness," it says. "Today, our future depends on the patriotic stand of each of us, notwithstanding what position or occupation we may be, students, doctors, teachers, journalists, workers, servicemen, and especially diplomats."

The Australian Federation of Ukrainian Organisations yesterday called on the world to reject the announcement of President Yanukovich's election win and demanded a tougher Australian stance.

Australian election observer Peter Romaniw, speaking from Kiev's Independence Square, told the federation that Ukrainians were calling on Australia in their time of need.

Early yesterday, Kiev time, thousands of democracy supporters were preparing for a day of militancy despite sub-zero temperatures. Many warmed themselves on braziers after spending the night in tents along the main thoroughfare.

Brigades of women, wearing quilted jackets against the cold, were handing out sandwiches of cheese and salami.

Groups of supporters marched up and down calling out "Yu-shch-enko", their jackets covered in a blaze of orange, his campaign colour.

- with agencies
 
 
 
BBC:  Crowds blockade Kiev government 

Thousands of demonstrators have laid siege to government buildings in the Ukrainian capital, Kiev, in protest at the presidential election results.
Support for opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko appears to be growing as police cadets and TV stations openly show their allegiance, say observers....
 

 
AP/ABC:  Yushenko to meet with Ukraine President[ 
 

While they appear mostly to be talkin' about talkin', at least they're talkin'. That beats hell outta shootin'.
 
 
Russia slams Ukraine interference
From correspondents in Moscow
November 26, 2004/SMH

RUSSIAN Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov has slammed Western intervention in Ukraine, as the European Union stepped up efforts to mediate a standoff over a presidential vote in the former Soviet republic.

"We are alarmed by attempts by certain governments to steer the situation in Ukraine away from a legal path," Mr Lavrov said.

"Especially when certain European capitals are declaring that they do not recognize the elections and that Ukraine has to be with the West," he said.

"It is the Ukrainian people and not someone in their place who must decide with whom Ukraine will be," he said.

"We are not indifferent to what happens in Ukraine."

"Geographically Ukraine is near the West but also near Russia," he said. "We hope that the world will respect the choice of the Ukrainian people, respect its right to decide on its own its internal affairs."

"These declarations... make one think that someone would very much like to draw up new partition lines in Europe," he said.

Mr Lavrov spoke as Polish President Aleksander Kwasniewski and EU foreign policy chief Javier Solana flew into Kiev for mediation talks over the crisis. Lithuanian President Valdas Adamkus was expected later in the day.

Like Ukraine, the international community has split into two camps over Sunday's presidential vote, which handed victory to the pro-Russia Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich.

While the EU and the US have backed opposition claims that the election was rigged in favour of the ruling party candidate, Russia, China, Belarus and two former Soviet republics in Central Asia said the vote was fair.

`
 
 
Good, informative articles, msolga, thanks. Just a nitpicky note: links to sources are useful to some folks.
 
 
For the first time

 
Ukraine rivals meet in presence of EU, Russia mediators
 

which could give some more hope:

 
11-26-2004

KIEV (AFP) - Ukraine's two presidential rivals were due to meet for the first time in the presence of top European and Russian mediators in a bid to resolve a five-day political crisis that has paralyzed the government.

Tens of thousands of supporters of the pro-West opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko blockaded key government buildings in the capital Kiev demanding that their hero be recognized the winner of a weekend election that official ballot counts handed to pro-Moscow Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich.

But there were growing signs that the seat of power was relenting -- even as Russia again vented its fury at what it said was unlawful Western pressure being applied against its most important eastern European ally.

Ukraine's national television stations that had throughout the week provided mostly positive coverage of Prime Minister Yanukovich and avoided broadcasting news of the mass demonstrations gripping the country began to feature the opposition in its news.

The supreme court was expected to hear opposition claims Monday that the state had fixed last weekend's vote in favor of their man. Analysts said that its justices have shown independence in the past and could possibly back Yushchenko's position.

The police have so far failed to intervene against the unprecedented blockade of both the presidential administration and the cabinet buildings -- which prevented Yanukovich from getting into his offices on Friday.

"This has paralyzed the government," the prime minister's press secretary fumed.

A flurry of closed-door negotiations between Ukraine's top players and European dignitaries highlighted the standoff's fifth day.

Outgoing President Leonid Kuchma first met visiting Polish President Aleksander Kwasniewski -- who has expressed growing concerns about the crisis in his country's eastern neighbor -- before European Union's foreign policy chief Javier Solana joined the talks.

Kuchma's office then crucially announced the president would also meet with Yushchenko before inviting Solana, Kwasniewski and Lithuania's President Valdas Adamkus for round-table crisis talks.

The president's office said Yanukovich and Russian parliament speaker Boris Gryzlov -- the first Moscow representative to visit Kiev during the conflict -- would also eventually enter the talks.

A polish embassy official said the first round of the critical negotiations would begin Friday at 1600 GMT.

There was no initial mention of Yanukovich attending any of the meetings but he told his supporters on Friday that he would not allow the opposition to "overthrow the constitution" through their protest will calling for his own backers to keep calm.

"The life of every individual is dear to me and I do not need any power if this provokes bloodshed," he was quoted as telling a Kiev rally by Interfax.

But Moscow greeted Europe's direct intervention in the crisis with open fury and dismay.

Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov told reporters in Moscow that Europe was trying to pull its ally into the Western camp by dangerously and illegally fomenting opposition protests.

"We are alarmed by attempts by certain governments to steer the situation in Ukraine away from a legal path," Lavrov said.

"Especially when certain European capitals are declaring that they do not recognize the elections and that Ukraine has to be with the West," he added.

The comments were some of the harshest from Russia because they directly confirmed that Moscow was interested in seeing its own allies rule the strategic former Soviet republic.

The Slavic nation of 48 million has served as a buffer between Russia and the expanding European Union -- which Moscow is viewing with growing mistrust -- and remains its key trading partner, particularly in the military sphere.

Meanwhile Yushchenko supporters who throughout the week kept up a non-stop vigil on key Kiev squares moved directly against the government's seat of power en masse for the first time.

Tens of thousands of chanting, cheering and singing protesters blocked the presidency and the government building in a human chain of opposition orange that kept all from entering or leaving the buildings.

Some officials tried to sneak in through back doors and secret entrances only to be turned away by the crowds.

The police presence was light and some quietly said they were following orders but were with the people in their hearts.

"Of course I am with them, the police are with the people," said Vadim, a policeman in his late 20s, who was standing with the protesters near the building.

His comments came as some 25,000 Yanukovich supporters gathered at a railway station before their planned march in the direction of their opposition rivals who have made the capital's central Independence Square their home.
 
 Source 
 
 
Some webcams in the Ukraine/Kiev:

 Kyiv, Maidan Nezalezhnosti (Independence Square). Live 

 37 (!) webcams 

 Kiev, Maidan Nezalezhnosti, Inter Webcam 

 Kharkov, crossroad of Lenina and 23rd August streets 
 
 
Somehow, something like this was to expect:

 
Eastern Ukraine Threatens with Autonomy

Politics: 26 November 2004, Friday.

The Russian-speaking Eastern regions of Ukraine, which account for the country's economic heart and mainly back Yanukovich, has threatened to hold a referendum on autonomy if Yushchenko succeeded in overturning Yanukovich's election.

The big industrial centers of Donetsk and Lugane are seen to have provided the controversial advance of 3% of votes that made the Central Elections Committee pronounce Yanukovich winner in Sunday's runoff for the presidency.

Ukraine's parliament (the Rada) decided to hold an emergency debate on the crisis on Saturday, a spokesman for the chamber's speaker said. All the chamber's factions backed the plan except Yanukovich's Party of the Regions.

The opposition campaign of civil disobedience is part of a strategy by Yushchenko and his allies that involves a national strike, including a blockade of main highways.
 

source:  Sofia News Agency 
 
 
Some good news now:

 
Working group set up to tackle Ukraine crisis

The outgoing president of Ukraine and the two men who want to take his place sat down Friday to discuss the growing political crisis sparked by Sunday's disputed presidential election.

Emerging from the meeting, President Leonid Kuchma said a "multilateral working group" will tackle the job of settling the dispute over who will replace him: pro-Western candidate Viktor Yushchenko or Kremlin-backed Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych.

Holding another election is one possibility on the table, a source close to the talks told the Associated Press.

The three-hour meeting took place as tens of thousands of Ukrainians continued to demonstrate in favour of Yushchenko in the streets of the capital Kiev.

- INDEPTH: Ukraine's presidential contenders

The elections commission in the country of 48 million people has declared Yanukovych the winner of the election, despite widespread evidence of voter intimidation and rigged ballot counting.

Before the meeting, Kuchma gave a televised address in which he called for Yushchenko's supporters to stop their protest and return to their jobs and homes.

"Any revolution must end in peace," said Kuchma, who has been backing Yanukovych. "The sooner this so-called revolution ends, the better it will be for the Ukrainian people."

Interviewed at his ranch in Texas Friday as the meeting began, U.S. President George W. Bush spoke out for the first time on the political crisis.

"The international community is watching very carefully," he said. "People are paying very close attention to this and, hopefully, it will be resolved in a way that brings credit and confidence to the Ukrainian government."

A number of European envoys also attended Friday's meeting, including European Union foreign policy chief Javier Solana and the presidents of Poland and Lithuania, said Solana's spokesperson, Christina Gallach.

On Thursday, a Ukrainian Supreme Court order put the presidential inauguration of Yanukovych on hold until it hears a complaint from his rival that the election was rigged.

That news led to loud cheers by an estimated 200,000 demonstrators in Kiev's Independence Square when they were told of it by defeated opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko.

- FROM NOV. 25, 2004: Demonstrations grow in Ukraine

Yushchenko has vowed to remain with his supporters until the results are overturned.

Linking arms and standing in five-deep rows, the demonstrators on Friday circled the presidential administration building where Yanukovych works, and refused to let his staff inside.

Busloads of police remain on standby nearby, but no violence has been reported.

- Polish, Lithuanian leaders in Kiev -

Polish President Aleksander Kwasniewski arrived on Friday to help smooth the way for a peaceful end to the confrontation, at Kuchma's request.

Kwasniewski's proposed three-point plan includes calling on both sides to renounce violence, call for a vote re-count and begin round-table discussions.

Some of Yushchenko's allies have called for more radical action, including blocking the building entrances to keep the civil servants out.

Fiery member of parliament Yuliya Tymoshenko has called for a general strike, blocking all the country's central highways and stopping rail and airport traffic.

It's unclear whether the general strike is having any effect.

 
 Source 
 
 
I found this BBC forum an absorbing read, with posts from all over the world. Especially interesting were those from western & eastern Ukraine.

Other good links on this page, too, including photographs from the Ukrainian demonstrations.

How can the Ukraine crisis be solved?

 http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/talking_point/4033549.stm 
 
 
Ukraine's supreme court is set today (Monday) to hear an opposition appeal that the presidential election has been rigged in favour of pro-Moscow Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich.
 
 
Is Ukraine able to be divided into two parts?  
I supposed so....
See two completely seperated (also geographic dichotomy makes it easier to be divided)groups have two completely different ways for developement and making benefits.
Any group's representive picks the presidency, the other group will absolutely protest (like the supporters of Yuchenko these days.)

My English if not so good and i am not sure i can show my sentiment clearly.
Anyway i am waiting for your opinions.
 
 
"This preliminary report of the BHHRG's observers on the controversial second round of the Ukrainian presidential elections challenges the widely-disseminated media image of government-sponsored fraud at the expense of an untainted opposition on the basis of first-hand reporting."

 Ukraine Country Reports: British Helsinki Human Rights Group 
 
 
Walter, from what I remember the BHHRG is quite the controversial group... I can see if I can look back up when I came upon some earlier rather unsavoury moves on their part (re: Serbia? Georgia?)... I dont think they're accepted by the Helsinki Groups elsewhere in Europe...
 
 
Here's Wikipedia on them:

 
Despite its name, it is not an official Helsinki Committee; the United Kingdom's official Helsinki Committee is the British Helsinki Subcommittee of the Parliamentary Human Rights Group, which was established in 1976. The "About us" page on the BHHRG web site (as of 28 September 2004) neither states anything about the historical background of the Helsinki Committee nor does it make any attempt to clarify the relationship between itself and the Helsinki Committee. This apparently deliberate confusion has prompted the International Helsinki Federation to publicly disclaim any connection with the BHHRG and has led others to accuse the BHHRG of "nam[ing] itself so as to usurp the prestige of its elder".

[..] It has been criticised by other human rights activists and genuine Helsinki Committees for publishing views which are markedly at odds with the generally accepted picture of affairs in Europe. For instance:

* it condemned the November 2003 revolution in Georgia as a coup d'etat;
* it has strongly criticised Western support for the Serbian opposition to Slobodan Milosevic;
* it has claimed that elections in Belarus have met democratic standards;

[..] The BHHRG has been subjected to particularly strong criticism in the Czech Republic for claiming that the country's Roma population do not suffer discrimination, a proposition which very few observers accept. A Roma member of the Czech parliament, Monika Horakova, published an open letter in 1999 condemning the BHHRG's claims:

 
I had thought that the Helsinki Group was a non-partisan body interested in exposing and helping to solve human rights abuses in the world. This report caused me to question my previously held beliefs. However, I have since learned that the BHHRG has no connection to the International Helsinki Federation for Human Rights in Vienna. It is a disgrace that the BHHRG is using the good Helsinki name to mislead the public into thinking that their racist propaganda is somehow affiliated with the well-respected Helsinki Group.
 

[..] The membership and political orientation of the BHHRG is somewhat obscure. Its trustees include a number of prominent right-wing British Eurosceptics (notably the Oxford academic Mark Almond and political commentator John Laughland), which perhaps explains the slant of some of the BHHRG's views. A common theme in many of its reports has been a critical view of perceived Western "meddling in the internal affairs" of central and east European countries, notably Yugoslavia (now Serbia and Montenegro) and Belarus. Many of its reports refer to the "New World Order" [3] (http://www.google.com/search?hl=en&q=%22New+World+Order%22+site%3Abhhrg.org&btnG=Google+Search), which suggests that the BHHRG is ideologically allied with far-right groups such as the John Birch Society which oppose the activities of multinational organisations such as the UN and OSCE on the grounds that they are steps towards a "world government".
 

It appears that the BHHRG is an exponent of what one could call the Western pendant of the "red-brown coalition" - (far-)right-wing politicians who come out in defence of such figures as Milosevic or Putin because those are seen as fellow opponents of liberals worldwide...
 
 
Thanks for explaining that!

Although, I know about that, nimh.

But I do think that even such **** should be mentioned.

Here's the link to the correct Britsih Huelsinki Human Righ Subcommittee:

 United Kingdom: British Helsinki Subcommittee of the Parliamentarian Human Rights Group 

 
PLEASE NOTE that the so called British Helsinki Group is NOT affiliated with the IHF
 
 
 
Fmom my morning paper paper: A provocative view of the west & it's attittudes toward the Ukraine situation & revolutions "elsewhere".

The West closes its eyes to the truth in Ukraine

 http://www.theage.com.au/news/Opinion/The-West-closes-its-eyes-to-the-truth-in-Ukraine/2004/11/29/1101577415208.html?oneclick=true 
 
 
Hmm, the "oscewatch.org", where the author John Laughland is a trustee, is part of the above mentioned "British Helsinki Group" :wink:
 
 
Tell me more, Walter! I know nothing & wondered.....  
 
 
 
Tell me more, Walter! I know nothing & wondered.....  
 

The author of the opinion piece you linked in is John Laughland of the BHHRG... to read more about him and his organisation  read my post right above ...
 
 
Thanks, nimh, I've already done a bit of reading this morning & understand where he's coming from. Pretty much what I'd thought. Just decided I'd post that article as a view from "the other side". Always interests me, what the other side is saying & where they're coming from.... :wink:
 
 
Of course, msolga. I only referred back up to the other post about him because you had said to Walter, "tell me more, I know nothing & wondered".

Interesting snippets from the Kyiv Post, when I was browsing it yesterday morning:

 
 Analysis 

[..] Meanwhile, more Ukrainian officials have abandoned the current regime, expressing their support for or allegiance to Yushchenko, even as millions of pro-democracy demonstrators back him on Ukraine's streets.

As of Nov. 27, more than 470 foreign ministry officials had publicly pledged their support for Yushchenko, essentially recognizing him as the next president of Ukraine. More law enforcement officials have also pledged support or allegiance to Yushchenko and his campaign. The support of these officials puts more pressure on the ruling regime and on officials who haven't yet switched sides. Their support would be crucial for Yushchenko's chances of rising to power through a quasi-legal forced coup, should events develop in that direction.
 

Imagine if Yanukovich wins this contest for power after all. The above means that he would then basically be forced to first do a purge of all these people who have now committed to an uprising against him. Such a purge would in turn mean that he would be forced to rely much more strongly on the conservative/collectivist pro-Russian east than he must originally have intended... which in turn obviously will fuel new resentment again.

What all that means, in short, is that whatever happens now, a preservation of the status quo as was originally envisaged by the government is no longer possible...

Also:

 
[..] Kharkiv governor Yevhen Kushnyarov on Nov. 26 declared that his oblast would rule itself and control the military on its territory before it takes orders from what it calls extreme right-wing factions allied with Yushchenko. Parliamentarians in the eastern oblasts Donetsk and Lugansk and in the southern part of the Crimean peninsula called for the creation of an eastern autonomous Ukrainian republic. They began blacking out Ukrainian television channels that are reporting objectively about the current situation in Ukraine, leaving only propaganda outlets on the air. Officials from these regions also pledged to stop sending budget revenues from their industrial regions to the capital.
 

The threat of the pro-Yakunovich South/East to break off if the pro-Yushchenko demonstrators get their way appears to be getting some support from Russia itself:

 
 Union for local self-government established in eastern Ukraine 

A congress of local governments meeting in Severodonetsk, in Luhansk oblast, has decided to create an interregional committee for local self-governance, Ukrainian News reports.

The decision was supported by 3,576 people, members of the local councils who came from Dnipropetrovsk, Donetsk, Zhitomir, Zakarpattya, Kyiv, Luhansk, Nikolaev, Odessa, Poltava and Kharkiv oblasts, plus Crimea.

[..] Delegates also decided to recognize the Nov. 21 presidential run-off election as legitimate.

Prime Minster Viktor Yanukovych and Moscow mayor Yury Luzhkov arrived in Luhansk oblast on the morning of Nov. 28 to take part in the congress.
 
 
 
A Russian newspaper confirms the earlier reports about Russian troops arriving in the Kyiv and changing into Ukrainian uniforms - and adds some more salient details, according to an article on the Kyiv Post now:

 
 Daily Kommersant reports Russian troops in Ukraine 

By PAUL MIAZGA
Kyiv Post Senior Editor

The Russian daily Kommersant published a report on Nov. 29 stating that up to 800 Russian special forces, or spetsnaz, began arriving in Kyiv early on the morning of Nov. 23 and changed into Ukrainian uniforms at a Ukrainian military base just outside the capital.

The report says that at 1:32 a.m. on Nov. 23 a Russian Antonov An-26 (serial number RA-26410) arrived at a Ukrainian military base near Irpen, located 10 km from the city center. The base is adjacent to a compound operated by the BARS government security agency, which has as many as 3,000 service personnel protecting the Presidential Administration in central Kyiv.

According to the Kommersant report, at 3:17 a.m. on Nov. 23, a second plane arrived, a Ukrainian-registered heavy lift Ilyushin Il-76. The occupants of both the Antonov and the Ilyushin boarded buses waiting on the tarmac and were transported to the base at Irpen. Kommersant also reported that up to 800 such spetsnaz forces of the Vityaz regiment have arrived in Ukraine from Russia on Russian military transport aircraft, many also having landed at Kyiv's Boryspil International Airport from Nov. 24-26.

The location of the troops is currently unknown.

The deputy head of the Boryspil Airport security service, Lt. Colonel Lyashenko, refused to give clearance for the first of the planes to arrive from Russia on Nov. 23 and immediately tendered his resignation. The press service of the airport security service would not give the reasons for Lyashenko's resignation, but did confirm that Lyashenko had resigned his post.

The staff at another regional airport nearby also refused to give landing permission to further planes arriving on Nov. 24, but they were overruled and the planes landed, said an anonymous source within the State Security Service (SBU) on Nov. 25.

The source stated that each plane, after landing, was then loaded with sensitive documents from the Presidential Administration, the SBU and other departments before taking off again, bound for Moscow.

Officials at Boryspil airport and with the Interior Ministry have so far declined to comment on the matter. Russian Ambassador to Ukraine, Viktor Chernomyrdin, on Nov. 26 called the reports of Russian forces in Ukraine as "completely absurd and an open provocation."
 
 
 
 
Of course, msolga. I only referred back up to the other post about him because you had said to Walter, "tell me more, I know nothing & wondered".
 

Thanks, nimh. No, I knew zilch about the Helsinki Group. Understood the spin, but knew nothing of who they were.
 
 
Not always easily accessible, but interesting (of course):

 The Yushchenko campaign website (English) 

Current stories include a warning about  the arrival of yet another Russian politician  at the pro-Yakunovich rallies, namely Vladimir Zhironovsky, the notorious (and rather unstable) extreme nationalist. He is said to be coming as the head of a delegation from Russia's State Duma.

(Zhirinovsky, a kind of Dadaist fascist, would be a laugh if he wasnt so successful... one documentary caught him promising a cheering crowd, "vote for me and I promise you, you will never have to vote again!" He won the '93 elections on an anti-everyone platform and has since seen his share of the vote shrink in subsequent elections, but is still trotted out as a useful, Putin-loyal lightning rod for the nationalist electorate. Currently vice-speaker of the Russian parliament.)

Other stories focus on how the parliament will tomorrow consider whether to dismiss Yanukovych's as prime minister, respectively to dismiss the government as a whole and the General Prosecutor as well. Yushchenko has called the demonstrators to march to parliament at 9:00 "to help the parliament make a decision."

Parliament is also to discuss the moves towards autonomy of the pro-Yakunovich East. In that context, the Yushchenko website - worryingly, IMO - quotes Yulia Tymoshenko, Yushchenko's radical and charismatic ally (photo below) as  appealing in firebrand language  for Parliament to take measures against the "plotters-separatists", respectively for Kuchma to "discharge the governors responsible for separatist actions." He is to "force the General Prosecutor and the SSU to bring actions against those who are now splitting the state."

At the same time, Tymoshenko wants Kuchma himself to be prosecuted. And she also asserts that armed troops were sent to Kyiv last night, but that conscientious Ministry of Defense officers blocked the action:

 
Tymoshenko has also reported there are enough materials to bring an action against President Kuchma for the treachery of Ukraine's people. "There are a lot of investigators willing to start this case," she has stated.

Yulia Tymoshenko has also thanked the rally participants for defending all objects last night - the Cabinet, the Presidential Administration and camping. Yulia Tymoshenko has reported that last night there was given an order to make troops ready for action.

"At 11:10PM warriors got the arms and set out for Kyiv from Petrivtsi, Boryspil and Zhytomyr along the Brovary highway. Yet some conscious and honest officers in the Ministry of Internal Affairs did their best to stop this punitive force," has said Tymoshenko.

Tymoshenko has added that the officers of the Ministry of Defense gave the government to understand they would not tolerate killing their people.

The people's deputy has reported it was Minister of Internal Affaurs Bilokon who had ordered to send troops to Kyiv.
 

True or not? Who knows, in the fog of revolution?

 
Yulia Tymoshenko
 Tymoshenko website  (last update 16 November)
 
 
I'm going to tell my colleague that her brother's report about the Russian troops in Ukrainian uniforms has made it into the media - she'll tell him - and I can tell you that one family is going to have a lot more trust in at least one area of the media. Of course, his grandmother, who didn't believe him, is not going to take it well at all.

I'm going to be interested to see how the reports she's getting of what's happening in the eastern areas pan out. No one she, or any of her co-immigrants, have been in touch with in the eastern area, can identify anyone who voted for the status quo. We've been mulling over what that could mean.
 
 
Translated from Dutch newspaper Trouw, 27 November (my apologies for grammatical errors):

 
Pora has shaken Ukrainians awake
by Wendelmoet Boersema
 link to original 

As a modern "International" they have sprouted in eastern Europe: the students movements who challenge the established order. After the Serbian Otpor (Resistance) and the Georgian Kmara (Enough) the stage is now taken by the Ukrainian Pora, 'It's Time'.

KIEV - Wet snow sticks to the volunteers, who are making one cheese or meat roll after another. Steam is rising from big stoves. On the Kreshtshatik, Kievs Stalinesque main street, there are almost twohundred tents. Woodblocks, warm clothing and food are lying in big heaps, brought by sympathisers. Andrey (16), student at the trade school, is hurrying to fill hot thermoses. "I've been out doing this for four nights now.''

The organisation of the tent camp is mainly in the hands of Pora, the Ukrainian student movement. Their flags, yellow and black, colour the streets of Kiev.

For the past half year, the Ukrainian youngsters of Pora have been getting trainings from, mostly, their Serbian colleagues of Otpor. With the slogan 'Gotov je' (He's done), Otpor played an important role in October 2000 in driving out the Serbian dictator Milosevic. "We know what it is to live under a dictatorial regime", says trainer Sinisa Sikman from Otpor, which has been renamed 'Belgrade Centre for Nonviolent Resistance'.

What the student movements have in common is their fluid organisation. There are no statutes, meetings, no real leaders. The actions are humoristic. Pora has had Che Guevara T-shirts printed in a Ukrainian folkloric blouse. With symbols (the fist of Otpor's set the pattern), flags and stickers they have rallied large crowds. In Kiev it was said often: "The youth has shaken us awake.''

That didn't take place without conflicts. Of the over 10,000 Pora activists hundreds have been arrested this month. The authorities accused Pora of 'terrorist activities'. A thorn in the eye of the Ukrainian rulers is also the involvement of western NGO's in Pora's rise, such as the American Freedom House. An advisor of this organisation, the former Otpor leader Aleksandar Maric, was refused entry to the country at Kiev airport early this month.

Not just in Ukraine do people see this involvement as evidence of the hand of the US, which through organisations like Freedom House and the National Democratic Institute tries to influence elections in authoritarian countries. According to the British newspaper The Guardian their Ukrainian campaign involves a sum of 14 million dollar. strategies include the exit-polls, which have to set the tone in the media, the training of observers and the organisation of nonviolent resistance. American ambassadors have actively involved themselves with the opposition in different former Soviet republics during recent elections.

This American involvement is not always successful by the way, let alone decisive. In Byelorussia the Americans managed to get the (at the time strongly divided) opposition behind one candidate, but this little charismatic trade union leader lost against President Lukashenka. The Byelorussian student movement Zubr exists now mostly underground.

Ukraine furthermore has a tradition of civic resistance of its own. The intellectual source of the youth protest is the Kyiv-Mohyla University, located in the picturesque neighbourhood Podil. Founders of the student movement Pora, but also of other Ukrainian youth organisations, the civic movement 'Znayu' (I know) and human rights organisation 'Chista Ukrayna' (Clean Ukraine) study at this young university. The college was founded in 1990 after the example of the famous humanist Kyiv-brotherhood School from 1615.

That is also why the first tent camp - an oppositional strategy from Soviet times - emerged before the gates of 'Mohylianka', as the students lovingly call their university. The rector of Mohylianka applauds the political awareness of his students, and has attracted the anger of the authorities by that. An attempt to search the university campus was rebuffed by the students.

Pora now experiences its finest hour. "It is impossible for me to say what we are going to do tomorrow", says spokesperson Anastasia Bezverha. "The situation here changes every hour".

At the office of Pora it is now quiet, after extra guards have been added at the door. Just before the elections it was still a steaming, crawling anthill in the cramped basement office. "Everybody now is on the street", says Anastasia. "Of course our friends support us, from Georgia, Byelorussia, Lithuania, Estonia and even Azerbajjan. But this is our revolution. Pora peremogi. Time for a victory.''
 
 
 
<sniff>

It's just so bloody exciting. Maybe this means that Byelorusse can be reclaimed as well.
 
 
Re: that Trouw article...

A new "international" of youth movements for democratisation, active across South-Eastern Europe and the Former Soviet Union in fierce but nonviolent resistance to the various post-communist authoritarian regimes that reign there in shades of red and brown? Funded and edged on by the National Democratic Institute and, of course, George Soros, pushing for a second democratic wave to achieve free elections, free media and the cleansing of corruption?

Hey, the lefties at Indymedia and the righties at the Free Republic are both already in full debate about the big conspiracy that must be behind it all. The Indymedia types are going, "the Americans support it, so it must be bad", and Freepers are going, "Soros supports it, so it must be bad" - so it looks like Yanukovich will soon have his own supporters here in the West, neatly compiled out of those on the far left and those on the far right *. But if the big "conspiracy" in question is to oust tyrans like Lukashenka and mobsters like Kuchma, and foster a new democratic, pro-European/pro-Western generation to take over instead and finally finish the job of 1989, more power to it, I say!

Now, if they can get Nastase voted out in the run-off of the Romanian elections next month... small chance, but one can hope... and then, like Beth says, Byelorussia!  

Serbia and Georgia down, how many more to go? 1989, part two... !

* I came across the lefty version on Indymedia.nl and, to my regret, the Green Left mailinglist. General logic: "The Americans should stay out and not meddle, they're probably only out to increase their sphere of influence anyway - did you know that the Americans want an important oil pipeline through the Ukraine? And besides - look at the fraud that went on in the American elections! Let them look at their own stuff before lecturing other countries." Deeep sigh. The odd poster who actually knows something about the Ukraine intervened, but anti-Americanism overruled. Substantiated of course by the odd oldstyler 'reminding' us how the East-Ukrainians had suffered under the Nazis while the West-Ukrainians had collaborated...

On the other hand, I looked up what was posted on the Free Republic to doublecheck my suspicions and sure enough, they're all confused and arguing with each other there as well. Its most amusing, in a sick way. One Freeper  actually joined PORA  (bless his heart), and started blogging... but soon came upon resistance. After all, as one Freeper said coming in, "OK, who are the players, good guy, bad guy?" - and that's where, lacking actual knowledge of the region, the tried and tested moulds were brought in. Except, of course, the traditional Freeper moulds yield contradictory results here. There's those who take, say, the Reagan logic and go: if those Yushchenko guys are against Russia, against the Communists, and for freedom, they must be the good guys. But then there's those who take the mould used in the Clinton years and the last election campaign, and reason that, wait: if those Yushchenko guys are supported by Soros and they like EU (and they've even got the country's Socialists supporting them), they can't possibly be the good guys! The liberal media must be lying to us. "That bastard Soros is spamming this very site with his Chirac Crap!!!"

Poor "Destro" just doesn't get it anymore...: " What interest does Soros have in having a pro-Western leader in Ukraine. (He's FOR the Communist in our election, and AGAINST the Communist in Ukraine's??) This is beyond strange. " Erm, no, kid. The thing is to get your head out of your ass and realise Kerry wasn't a communist, and Soros did not thus actually support any Communist neither here nor there. Soros has, in fact, opposed pretty much every single post- and neo-communist in all Eastern and Central Europe, funding more or less every major pro-democracy, pro-free media, pro-minority rights, pro-human rights and yes, pro-Western initative that emerged anywhere there. And yet, yes, he also supported Kerry. Amazing, huh? The poor Freeper, who long ago started equating liberals with communists, just cant get his mind around that particular juxtaposition - how can the two actually appear as each other's foes ? Something must be amiss... well, yeah - your moulds of interpretation are amiss, thats what.

Anyway, that on an aside... :wink:
 
 
moulds of interpretation - heh!

Still reading along with interest and appreciating analysis.
 
 
 
Yulia Tymoshenko

 
 Guardian (UK): Ukraine's leaders in poll climbdown 

President admits new election may be needed as US signals concern

Nick Paton Walsh in Kiev
Tuesday November 30, 2004

The Ukrainian government made a significant climbdown last night in its stand-off with the opposition when outgoing president Leonid Kuchma said another round of elections might be required because the "country needs a legitimate president".
"If we really want to preserve peace and accord, and if we really want to build up the democratic society that we talk about so much... let's organise new elections," Interfax reported him saying...

... At 10pm on Sunday, opposition deputy Yulia Tymoshenko said Mr Kuchma had 24 hours to sack and prosecute Mr Yanukovich, and the heads of the eastern regions who have threatened to secede from Ukraine, or the protesters would block his movements.

Meanwhile, outside the presidential administration, blockaded for five days by a tent city, protesters danced to a rap song based one of their favoured chants: "We are many, and we will not be defeated."
 
 
 
Whilest by now, Kuchma backs new vote, the St. Peterburg Times (that's the one from the original At. Petersburg in Russia!) reports:

 
Ukraine TV Journalist Stages Silent Revolt

By Carl Schreck
STAFF WRITER

MOSCOW - When the anchorwoman for Ukraine's state-owned television station UT-1 reported Thursday morning that Viktor Yanukovych had officially been declared the winner of the presidential election, Natalya Dmitruk staged a silent protest.

Dmitruk, shown in the bottom righthand corner of the screen wearing an orange ribbon indicating her support for opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko, told viewers in sign language that she considered the Nov. 21 election a farce.

"I am addressing all the deaf citizens of Ukraine," Dmitruk signed. "Our president is Yushchenko. Don't believe what they say. They are lying."

Dmitruk, 47, whose parents are deaf and who has worked at UT-1 as its sign-language interpreter for almost three years, then went back to signing anchorwoman Tatyana Kravchenko's report before straying from the script one more time at the end of the 10-minute segment.

"My soul is heavy that I had to repeat these lies," Dmitruk signed. "I will not do it again. I don't know if we'll see each other again."

Dmitruk's personal revolt came amid a mutiny of Ukrainian television journalists against the management of pro-government stations and a gag order on showing the growing masses of Yushchenko supporters demonstrating in the capital.

By the end of last week, the journalists claimed to have won, though critics say their coverage still is not what it should be.

Contacted by telephone in Kiev on Sunday, Dmitruk said she felt she had a special responsibility to speak her mind. "The deaf don't have any other option for getting television news," she said, referring to the reports she does daily on UT-1 at 11 a.m. and 3 p.m.

"I figured they could fire me, but I wasn't scared. The only thing I was worried about was that they might get rid of the sign-language news."

On Wednesday, 14 journalists at UT-1 and 1+1, a privately owned but pro-government channel, went on strike to protest the use of "temnyki," instructions from the presidential administration on how certain subjects should be handled. The strike soon spread.

After her morning report, Dmitruk joined the strike, one of more than 220 journalists and contributors at the state-owned channel to do so. They put out a statement condemning the "one-sided coverage" that "deprives Ukrainian citizens of important news."

Thursday evening, journalists at 1+1 said they had struck a deal with management. They went back on the air for the first time since Tuesday to announce the deal and to apologize.

"We acknowledge our responsibility for the biased information that the channel spread after coming under pressure from various political forces," the 1+1 journalists said. "From today,... we guarantee that any information we broadcast will be complete and objective."

Inter, another privately run and strongly pro-government channel, promised Friday to put an end to biased reporting. Inter is controlled by members of the Social Democratic Party of Ukraine, which is headed by President Leonid Kuchma's chief of staff, Viktor Medvedchuk.

No formal agreement was reached at UT-1, but the channel changed its policy and on Friday began showing the huge demonstrations in support of Yushchenko in Kiev.

Natalya Ligachova, head of the media watchdog organization Telekritika, said all the national channels are now showing footage of the Yushchenko supporters, but she still did not consider it completely objective coverage.

"Unfortunately, they are not showing as much of it as they should," Ligachova, whose organization monitors Ukraine's television media, said by telephone from Kiev on Sunday.

She complained that Inter and UT-1 were giving the impression of balanced coverage by showing footage of meetings between representatives of Yushchenko and Yanukovych instead of running reports highlighting the marked difference in the amount of public support for the two candidates.

"When they show a rally of 4,000 for Yanukovych and a rally of 100,000 for Yushchenko and don't make it clear how much more support Yushchenko has, that's not accurate reporting," Ligachova said.

Until Thursday, Channel 5 was the only channel giving significant airtime to the pro-Yushchenko protests and airing critical reports about the Yanukovych camp.

For example, on Thursday the station reported that Yanukovych supporters were brought to Kiev on special buses and trains and were being paid 200 hryvnas (about $30) per day to stay. Kuchma has accused Channel 5 of trying to prepare the way for a coup.

Ligachova said Channel 5 had been blacked out in much of eastern Ukraine, where Yanukovych claims most of his support, as a result of its critical coverage of the prime minister. A woman named Tanya who answered the phone Sunday at Yushchenko's headquarters in Donetsk, confirmed that Channel 5 and also TRK Era, another station critical of Yanukovych, were not being received.

"Now our only source of reliable information is Radio Era," she said. "We've been listening to Radio Era all day."

Television channel 1+1 has changed its content for the better but is still not providing objective coverage, she said. "Before it was just complete lies, now it shows the truth more often," she said.

n Grigory Yavlinsky, the leader of the liberal Yabloko party, accused Russian journalists on Friday of "lies and manipulating public opinion" over the election dispute, The Associated Press reported.

He singled out state-controlled Channel One television and newspapers he did not name for acting like "slaves who envy others' freedom," and said they were "poisoning one part of the Ukrainian people against the other."

Channel One, which is broadcast in Ukraine and many other former Soviet republics, has given blanket positive coverage to pro-Yanukovych demonstrators and accused their opponents of worsening tensions.
 
 Source 
 
 
Heh, Walter, great story!

I linked in Yushchenko's website, so fair's fair, here's  Yanukovich's website  as well. Wont do you much good tho because its only in Russian and Ukrainian.
 
 
Looks like you ended the argument on free republic nimh.
 
 
Progress? It looks like it.

 
 Ukraine building siege lifted 
From correspondents in Kiev, Ukraine
02dec04

UKRAINE opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko signed a compromise agreement today that obliges his supporters to lift their siege of government buildings.

According to the agreement - signed by Yushchenko; the declared official winner of the presidential runoff, Viktor Yanukovych; outgoing President Leonid Kuchma and European envoys - the blockade that has paralysed the work of Ukrainian authorities must be lifted immediately...
 

 
 'No Confidence' Vote Adds to Ukraine Turmoil 
Ukraine Parliament Brings Down Government
 

Wire service reports (live feeds - no links yet ) are saying a new runoff election is to be held Dec. 19th - unconfirmed.
 
 
Breaking... links sure to follow soon...

Ukraine Supreme Court sets aside election, Calls for December 26th Re-Run.
 
 
Here are comments from a Russian news agency on the decision by the Ukrainian Supreme Court to cancel the second run-off ballot and reasons given for this verdict:

 
UKRAINE: SUPREME COURT MAKES EXPECTED VERDICT
MOSCOW, December 3 (RIA Novosti's Vladimir Pronin) - At last! Ukraine's Supreme Court invalidated the presidential runoff to appoint another. The verdict, which followed seven hours' debates, points out bad trespasses in the runoff of November 21, and highlights Central Election Commission non-compliance with several election law clauses.
The court annuls a Central Election Commission resolution of November 24, which gave presidency to Victor Yanukovich. The verdict qualifies the resolution as illegitimate-it is impossible to see with whatever degree of precision what the runoff returns actually were, says the Supreme Court.
The Central Election Commission did not care to verify reports from territorial commissions, and failed to regard complaints according to due procedure. More than that, it gave up complaint consideration long before it was over, the court stresses.
"The trespasses rule out any reliable evaluation of election returns," says Judge Anatoli Yarema, who presided the Civil Law Chamber session of the Supreme Court.
A second presidential runoff has been appointed for December 26-three weeks after December 5. All Civil Law Chamber members have signed a related statement.
The verdict is final, and immune to appeal, concluded Mr. Yarema.
The Supreme Court verdict was quite predictable. It evidently aims to meet opposition demands as much as possible. Another option, to null both rounds and start another presidential campaign from scratch, is impracticable-as the acting legislation has it, the arrangement would make both principal hopefuls give up the presidential race for others to compete. The party in office has no lack of eligible personalities. The opposition is harder put-it has a negligible chance to come at another charismatic leader on a par with Victor Yuschenko, if not for Yulia Timoshenko, its second-largest figure.
The court verdict will surely come as a disagreeable surprise to outgoing President LeonidKuchma. He appeared in Moscow on a blitz visit, yesterday, to talk the matter over with President Vladimir Putin. While at the negotiation table, Mr. Kuchma harshly objected to the runoff re-enacted-a statement he had made on many previous occasions. Another presidential runoff is unprecedented in global legal practice. That is what the incumbent proceeds from.
A precedent is coming up now. The issue is getting over to parliament. It has to legalise the Supreme Court verdict with related constitutional amendments. The road to the presidential palace has opened to Victor Yuschenko.
 

Link:  Russian Information Agency Novosti: * UKRAINE * PRESIDENTIAL ELECTION * COURT * VERDICT * COMMENTARY * Dec.03, 2004 20:51 
 
 
Thanks, SerSo.

It's marvellous that this is, well, happening.
 
 
But i am still not optimistic about this second time.  
 
 
A DO OVER!!!

I am pretty sure every polling place will be monitered for fraud and intimidation.

I'm confident of a Yuschenko win. Just wondering if his 'illness' is finished with him...
 
 
I wish I was that confident, Lash. Man oh man oh man, I want this to work out.

 
It would be wrong, however, to regard Mr Yanukovych as a completely dead duck.

Until this election, it was an axiom of Ukrainian politics that you could not win the presidency without the support of the heavily populated industrial eastern regions.

Mr Yanukovych's popularity in the east and south is unquestioned and the eagerness of his supporters to turn out and vote will only have been strengthened by the scenes in Kiev.
 

 
Security expert and former Ukrainian MP Yevhen Zherebetsky does see certain dangers ahead for Mr Yushchenko.

One is that Mr Yanukovych might withdraw from the race, despite his declaration on Saturday that he would run again.

His nightmare scenario would be for Mr Yanukovych to withdraw, and then call on voters in the east and south to boycott the election, adding to the risk of separatism developing in these regions.

If Mr Yanukovych withdraws less than 10 days before the vote, Mr Yushchenko becomes the single candidate.

If he withdraws sooner, then the candidate placed third in the first round of voting, Oleksandr Moroz, will take his place.

Mr Zherebetsky says Mr Moroz, a Socialist, would pick up all Mr Yanukovych's votes and some more besides and could therefore be a formidable opponent.
 

 bbc 

I don't think we've heard the last from Russian on this either. Which makes me uneasy.
 
 
 
KIEV, December 4 (Itar-Tass) - The delegates to the Congress of Councils in Kharkov, eastern Ukraine, on Saturday urged Viktor Yanukovich and Viktor Yushchenko to withdraw from the revote in the second round of presidential elections set for December 26.

A statement which the delegates made on Saturday also contains a request to Ukrainian President Leonid Kuchma to appeal to the Constitutional Court and demand that it recognize the Supreme Court's decision on the revote as a politically engaged action that interferes in the competence of the Central Electoral Commission.

"The actions in one part of Ukraine have produced a return reaction in its other part. It is obvious that this reaction has helped preserving the country's unity. However, the Supreme Court's decison surprised many. Apparently, it was passed under pressure. Yushchenko's supporters are applauding but it's we who have questions now," Kharkov Governor Yevgeny Kushnaryov said in his report to the congress earlier on Saturday.

 

 from Itar-Tass 
 
 
Was following the news as well as I could from Greece... I share the apprehensions (both about Yushchenko's chances and Russia's next moves and, to some extent, about Yushchenko himself), but still, hey, before I/we go on worrying, I'm gonna join Lash in a cheer of elation! Yahay!!
 
 
Have any of you just sat silently and watched footage of that sea of orange in Independance Square? Isn't it glorious? The unadulterated POWER they must feel!

I saw elderly people singing beside teenagers, punks and children-- all singing the same thing. They didn't look worried or fearful--there faces were joyful.

The EE's. Our extended family.

I wonder if the students in Iran watch with heightened interest...in China?

Does anyone think this situ will have recriminations between the West and Russia?
 
 
 
Does anyone think this situ will have recriminations between the West and Russia?
 

DEFinitely. I'm a bit anxious even what Putins next move will be before that rerun even comes around.

And tho Iran, China, I hope everywhere they look upon events like this as an example, most acutely I'm hoping something will have stirred in Byelorussia... of course the hurdles there are much bigger, the fear much larger (where Kuchma's Ukraine is/was a corrupted, fraudulent democracy Byelorussia is a full-on dictatorship), but still, it's so close, the two peoples are so related, people must be feeling a little emboldened in Minsk now...

If somehow, Lukashenka can be taken out next, then we're finally completing 1989's unfinished business... its just that Putin will totally flip out before all of that actually happens, and its hard to predict what the consequences of that will be...

nimh <-- not feeling too analytic and elaborate today.... hence the sketchy sentences...
 
 
Thanks for the thoughts, nimh.

I was wondering what we have actually witnessed.

I guess its a given that Putin didn't think his hand would be caught in this. So, I guess he is standing around nekkid now. I suppose as nimh alludes to--there is no further reason for pretense.

I do wonder what he'll do next. Or if some other player will beat him to the next move.

Hate to see the death of glasnost, perestroika. Words I had grown to love.
 
 
 
The political crisis in Ukraine marks a reality check for US-Russian relations and may force President Bush to re-evaluate ties with President Vladimir Putin, his close ally in the war on terror.

Despite his crusade to spread democracy in the Middle East and elsewhere, Bush until recently has been largely tolerant of Putin, whose policies critics fear are shifting Russia back to state control from post-Soviet liberalism.
Putin's direct intervention in neighbouring Ukraine's disputed presidential election was for many in Washington a bridge too far, helping undermine the incipient democratic process in a strategically important country.
 

another checkmark for the uncurious.
 
 
I sorta suspect Putin's Russia will be the next shore to be lapped by the wave of democracy... and I sorta suspect Putin suspects that too. That's worrisome - a cornered critter is an unpredictable critter, and a wounded, cornered critter is downright dangerous. Ignored by Byelorus, challenged interminably in Chechnya and Georgia, repudiated by Ukraine, and abandoned by the entire former Warsaw Pact, Putin is within his rights to be feelin' more than just a little desperate.

Of some comfort is the fact the eyes of the world are on Ukraine - a scrutiny more intense than any ever faced by Putin. He is not stupid; it may be hoped he recognizes the dire ramifications of further overt Russian heavy-handedness in this matter. For the future of Russia as he envisages it, his best, and only viable, option is to cut his losses and concentrate on trying to head off, or at least ammeliorate, the inevitable domestic Russian upheaval which will follow closely on what is happening in Ukraine.

But that's the thing about desperate critters - you can't tell what they're gonna do 'till they do it.

Edit - there are no "e"s in "Warsaw"  
 
 
The problem with the Ukraine is that historically it was the majority of Russia from the 9th until the 13th century with the capital at Kiev.The Mongol invasion forced the capital north to Moscow. The Ukraine spent the next five centuries split between the Russians, Turks, Poles and the Austro-Hungarians. It became an independent nation briefly from 1918 to 1924 and again in 1991. Economically and culturally the west is more European and the east is more Russian. A major segment of the old Soviet heartland was in the eastern Ukraine. Putin is going to try and get at least part of that back. I suspect that for historical and cultural reasons, many Russians regard the Ukraine as an integral part of Russia.
 
 
 
I sorta suspect Putin's Russia will be the next shore to be lapped by the wave of democracy... and I sorta suspect Putin suspects that too. That's worrisome - a cornered critter is an unpredictable critter, and a wounded, cornered critter is downright dangerous. Ignored by Byelorus, challenged interminably in Chechnya and Georgia, repudiated by Ukraine, and abandoned by the entire former Warsaw Pact, Putin is within his rights to be feelin' more than just a little desperate.

Of some comfort is the fact the eyes of the world are on Ukraine - a scrutiny more intense than any ever faced by Putin. He is not stupid; it may be hoped he recognizes the dire ramifications of further overt Russian heavy-handedness in this matter. For the future of Russia as he envisages it, his best, and only viable, option is to cut his losses and concentrate on trying to head off, or at least ammeliorate, the inevitable domestic Russian upheaval which will follow closely on what is happening in Ukraine.

But that's the thing about desperate critters - you can't tell what they're gonna do 'till they do it.

Edit - there are no "e"s in "Warsaw"  
 

And unlike Iran, Russia, of course, does have a nuclear arsenal of monstrous proportions.
 
 
...everything old is new again...
 
 
 
He is not stupid; it may be hoped he recognizes the dire ramifications of further overt Russian heavy-handedness in this matter. For the future of Russia as he envisages it, his best, and only viable, option is to cut his losses
 

His best option, theoretically - absolutely - in the sense that unlike Kuchma or Lukashenka, Putin still has the advantage of actually commanding a sincere popularity among what appears to be a clear majority of his own people. So at this moment, if he were to "withdraw" to his own country, he would not actually need to worry about his position there quite yet.

The irony of course though, as Timber did already also allude, is that the "loss" of the Ukraine could be the one thing that could lose him his popularity. But then again it is only through his own and allied nationalists' current rhetorics about what the Ukrainian events mean (and the way they've been echoed throughout the loyal media) that a Yushchenko victory has come to be popularly seen as the "loss" of that country in the first place. There's no reason it needs to be seen like that. After all, it's not like the EU is going to warmly welcome the Ukraine as a new member state any time soon, so actual uncontestible evidence of its "loss" will not immediately materialise - any lesser form of co-operation with the EU could still be massaged away in the news propaganda.

So I think that theoretically, if Putin, say, symbolically reconciles with Yushchenko at some highly hyped Russo-Ukrainian summit, and gets Yushchenko to utter enough symbolic words there about the historical spiritual unity of Russia and the Ukraine and so on (in exchange for a non-publicized promise of non-intervention) - and he has that summit reported in endless propaganda coverage on Russia's TV stations - then he might well still be able to square the circle. He was effective enough in framing a Yushchenko victory as meaning the loss of a historical heartland - it would be up to him to reframe that again too, with the help of loyal politicians and commentators. And stranger reversals have been gotten away with in states with a "trusty" media system.

Theoretically, he might well get away with it still. But a true reconciliation with Yushchenko and his allies and a contentment with symbolic, "spiritual" alliances alone would imply a total reversal of the foreign policy line Russia has set out regarding its "Near Abroad" thus far. Whereas that policy seems to reflect a sincere and deeply-rooted enough ideology, and is one Putin has implemented more or less effectively and quite ruthlessly throughout the Former Soviet Union (barring the Baltics). So I doubt whether he'd take that opportunity even if he would believe it existed.

Not quite sure what the alternative is though. Splitting up the Ukraine is in nobody's (immediate) interest. Sponsoring, even covertly, a last-minute coup of sorts in the Ukraine to prevent Yushchenko from winning the repeated run-off - or even simply again banking on fraud to deny him the victory a second time - is a theoretical possibility, but a drastic one, whereas Putin thus far has preferred more under-the-radar operations. Seemingly recognizing a future President Yushchenko's authority in the diplomatic arena, while at the same time undermining the Ukrainian government through political allies, the Russian minority and economic blackmail would on the other hand be the "traditional" approach, tried and tested in variations in Moldova, Georgia, Armenia and Azerbajjan, etc; but then, the Ukraine is no Moldova.
 
 
 
before I/we go on worrying, I'm gonna join Lash in a cheer of elation! Yahay!!
 

I knew there was something I had forgotten.
 
 
Yanukovych and Yushchenko's biographies
I think these links could be interesting to all those who watch the developments in the Ukraine. (Or, sorry Mr.Yushchenko, should I break the English grammar rules and omit the definite article in order to avoid an imputation of imperial ambitions?)

 Biography and political portrait of Viktor Yushchenko from Wikipedia 

 Biography and political portrait of Viktor Yanukovych from Wikipedia 
 
 
Electoral reform laws stall again in Ukraine parliament

The Ukrainian parliament adjourned again Tuesday without passing a revised electoral reform package previously agreed to in principle by the leaders of the major political factions in the country's ongoing electoral dispute. The parliament had failed to adopt an earlier version of the reform package Saturday, but a second failure loomed large even before the Tuesday session got under way after Monday's putative accord collapsed after several further hours of negotiations between Ukrainian President Leonid Kuchma and party leaders. Government supporters in the parliament stalled the new package by insisting that it be accompanied by constitutional reforms to curtail the presidency's powers. The parliament's failure to act only seems to deepen Ukraine's political crisis, now in its third week, and complicates the process of conducting a new election, as mandated by the December 3 ruling of Ukraine's Supreme Court.

 
Ukraine Officials Fail to Vote on Reforms

ALEKSANDAR VASOVIC

Associated Press

KIEV, Ukraine - Parliament adjourned a raucous session Tuesday without voting on amendments to secure a fair rerun of the disputed presidential vote later this month, and throngs of opposition protesters appeared to be growing restless with the prolonged political crisis.

Supporters of opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko say the changes are necessary to close loopholes for fraud that marred the Nov. 21 presidential runoff. Evidence of systematic vote-rigging prompted the Supreme Court to cancel the victory of Kremlin-backed Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych and order the revote on Dec. 26.

Also Tuesday, outgoing President Leonid Kuchma approved a leave of absence for Yanukovych so he could conduct his presidential campaign, and named First Deputy Prime Minister Mykola Azarov to be temporarily in charge of the Cabinet, the presidential office said in a statement. Yanukovych announced Monday he was taking the leave.

A loose coalition of communists, socialists and pro-government factions in parliament had insisted that the electoral changes should be passed at the same time as the constitutional reforms to trim presidential powers. Yushchenko has balked at the changes, saying that Kuchma allies fear his victory and want to curtail his authority.

Rival parliamentary factions reached a tentative agreement Monday to vote on the legal changes all at once, but the deal collapsed later after several hours of European-sponsored talks between Kuchma and both rivals.

A somber Kuchma said the parties had failed to agree on the constitutional reform and on the opposition's insistence on Yanukovych resigning as premier.

The compromise had included opposition demands to delay implementation of the constitutional changes until after spring 2006 parliamentary elections, which Yushchenko's allies hope to win.

A pro-Yushchenko majority in parliament would render many of the constitutional changes to hand more power to parliament less restrictive to him.

But on Tuesday, Yushchenko's supporters again complained against the simultaneous vote.

"We won't vote for any package deals," said Yushchenko's fiery ally Yulia Tymoshenko.

Yushchenko's opponents accused him of bad faith during a rowdy parliament session that featured angry shouts and sarcastic speeches until parliament speaker Volodymyr Lytvyn adjourned it until Wednesday.

A similar compromise deal between Yushchenko's supporters and pro-government lawmakers fell apart Saturday, one day after the Supreme Court's momentous ruling.

Lytvyn said Kuchma would attend the parliament session and sign bills into law if a compromise is reached.

In a communique released after six-hour talks with European sponsors that dragged long after midnight, Kuchma pledged to reshuffle the Central Election Commission - a key opposition demand. The statement signed by both rivals also emphasized the need to pass electoral changes to ensure "a fair and transparent vote."

On Tuesday, Yushchenko backers, now in their third straight week of protests in a sprawling tent camp in downtown Kiev, lashed out at what they described as "Kuchma's plots."

"We have been peaceful so far," said a protester who identified himself only as Vyacheslav. If Yushchenko wants to force Kuchma to concede defeat in his attempt to hand power to his chosen successor, "we are ready," Vyacheslav said - a tacit threat that the demonstrations could turn violent.

At a barricade blocking the entrance to the Cabinet building, Yushchenko's orange-clad supporters were determined not to let "a single bureaucrat enter," said Adam Yanakievych from Kiev.

Meanwhile, pro-government lawmaker Stepan Havrysh became the latest senior official to defect from the Yanukovych camp, telling Kiev's Stolytchniye Novosty weekly he would not participate in the election campaign. Havrysh was Yanukovych's representative on the Central Election Commission.

Yanukovych's campaign manager Serhiy Tyhypko also resigned last week. Yanukovych has appointed lawmaker Taras Chornovil as the new campaign manager.

Mikhail Pogrebinsky, an Kuchma-allied analyst with the Institute of Political and Conflict Studies, said he expected the president to cave in to the opposition's demand to fire Yanukovych.

"Kuchma is coming under enormous pressure, and he has been slowly taking a step back every day," Pogrebinsky said. "I fully expect this next concession today."

In his campaign speech Tuesday, Yanukovych sought to distance himself from Kuchma, apparently trying to shed an image that he is Kuchma's puppet. If Kuchma fires him, that could actually help Yanukovych's desperate effort to expand his support base.

Nestor Shufrych, a pro-Yanukovych lawmaker, said the issue was moot because Yanukovych had already taken a leave of absence to campaign. The opposition wants Yanukovych fired simply to "take revenge," he said.
 
 Source 
 
 
Watching.
 
 
<smiling>

<biting fingernails>

It will be a vigil on the 26th. Here, and there.
 
 
I wonder how close an election it'll be, though... I mean, Yushchenko now clearly's got the momentum, there's a sense of revolution. In Kiev and the West, that is. From reports from the east I understand, on the other hand, that the people there have been much rallied by the events to the other side. Where last time round they basically voted (or were made to vote) for Yanukovich in some kind of surly, Soviet way, just because they were expected to - and where the first counter-demos there looked greatly staged - by now there does seem to be a genuine popular backlash against "Orange" in the east. A famous soccer team there even exchanged their orange/black shirts for black/white ones!

I wouldnt be surprised if Yushchenko won this easily, but I also wouldnt be surprised if Yanukovich this time did get a sincere 90% of the vote in Donetsk, and that way made himself lose, at least, by just a small margin... I guess how this revolution will be interpreted afterwards depends greatly on the eastern vote. If Yushchenko does this time get 30% upwards there, the talk will be of how a genuine democratic upswell got the hollow, corrupt old system crashing down; whereas if he gets just 10% or 20% in the east, the stress will be on how divided a country the Ukraine simply is - with the unscrupulous Kuchma years tipping the balance to orange this time, but perhaps straight back next time...

interesting times, in any case... <smiles>
 
 
*ahem*

 
 
 
Great find, PDiddie  
 
 
bm
 
 
 
Ukraine's Opposition Sees Path to Victory
Wed Dec 8, 2004 11:16 AM ET

By Ron Popeski
KIEV, Ukraine (Reuters) - Opposition hopeful Viktor Yushchenko said Wednesday a parliamentary vote to root out cheating in elections opened the way for him to win a re-run of a rigged presidential poll.

But to secure parliamentary backing for fairer election laws, Yushchenko bowed to demands from outgoing President Leonid Kuchma to curb the powers of the office he may well win after two weeks of mass demonstrations in his support.

"Today's decision opens the way for my victory in 18-20 Ukrainian regions," Yushchenko told reporters outside parliament after the vote. "The main thing is today we managed to achieve what we had hoped for. This is a day of historic compromise."

He said the parliamentary vote was a "serious change in the ideology and mechanism of elections" to allow a new election without mass fraud. The Supreme Court annulled last month's election, won by Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich, and ordered a new ballot on Dec. 26.

But Russia, which openly backed Yanukovich, stepped up its rhetoric against both a Yushchenko win and what it perceived as Western meddling in its backyard.

The assembly broke into applause as speaker Volodymyr Lytvyn announced results showing nearly all groups had backed a new election law and a series of constitutional amendments.

"These decisions should pave the way for a free and fair re-run of elections in Ukraine on Dec. 26," European Union foreign policy chief Javier Solana said in a statement, one of several international mediators in the crisis.

Under the compromises, Ukraine's next president will have fewer powers, parliament and the regions will be stronger and control over the electoral process will be tighter.

Kuchma's more radical rivals said parliament had caved in.

"This vote means the president's powers are severely cut and that means a victory for Kuchma," opposition firebrand Yulia Tymoshenko told reporters.

Activists were considering pulling back from government buildings. Many thousands remained in the center of Kiev.

YANUKOVICH ROUSES SUPPORTERS

Yanukovich, who remains prime minister but is on a "break" to campaign for the re-run, urged supporters to gird themselves.

"If we win the new vote and they try to deal with us in the same way, we will simply have to defend our victory," he told supporters in his native eastern Ukraine.

The crisis, which has cranked up tensions between Russia and the West, still reverberated throughout Europe.

Russian parliament speaker Boris Gryzlov, another mediator, said Ukraine could only remain united if Yanukovich won again. He denounced the Supreme Court's decision ordering a new run-off between the two top candidates.

"The court had no legal right whatsoever to give its assessment of the election and, furthermore, it had no right to pass a ruling on such a formulation as a re-run of the second round of voting," he told reporters in Kazakhstan

Polish Deputy Foreign Minister Adam Rotfeld said Russia's stand was a "return to its old position... from the Cold War."

NATO postponed a meeting due Thursday between its foreign ministers and Ukraine's, but pledged talks with a minister of a "new and legitimate" Kiev government, NATO sources said.

In parliament, 402 of 450 members, enough to approve amendments to the post-Soviet constitution, backed changes to the electoral law to prevent a recurrence of fraud.

"This is an act of consolidation and reconciliation, an act which demonstrates that Ukraine is united," speaker Lytvyn said.

He and Kuchma, who minutes earlier had agreed to an opposition demand to sack the prosecutor general, held aloft documents approved by the assembly.

By the same vote, members also approved changes to the constitution to reduce powers of the president and increase those of parliament -- key demands set by Kuchma and his parliamentary supporters in order to support election reform.

Regions will also get extra powers to ease tensions between the nationalist west and Russian-speaking east of the country.

"Kuchma showed that he is still the strongest player in Ukrainian politics," said analyst Oleksander Lytvynenko. "The opposition could not use the mass support it had mustered."
 

 Source 
 
 
 
Just a silly and inessential question....
why does Yushchenko look so harsh?
 

 
Ukrainian Candidate's Illness Unclear

Wednesday December 8, 2004 5:01 PM

By SUSANNA LOOF

Associated Press Writer

VIENNA, Austria (AP) - A combination of poisons could have sparked the ailment that struck Ukrainian opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko during the campaign, but there's no conclusive evidence that he was poisoned, the director of the hospital that treated him said Wednesday.

Yushchenko, whose formerly smooth skin has turned pockmarked since he fell ill, has alleged that Ukrainian authorities poisoned him - a charge they deny.

Doctors are still running tests to try to determine what caused the illness, said Dr. Michael Zimpfer, the Rudolfinerhaus director.

``We are meticulously investigating that, and we are running entirely new tests in different labs, but there is no evidence so far,'' he said.

Doctors had only ``a descriptive diagnosis'' but no proof of what caused the illness, Zimpfer said, adding it could have had natural causes or have been sparked by a poison.

``It might also have been a combination of poisons. Everything is in the air,'' he said.

Zimpfer rejected as ``entirely untrue'' a story in Wednesday's edition of the London daily The Times, which quoted Dr. Nikolai Korpan - the Rudolfinerhaus physician who oversaw Yushchenko's treatment - as saying the Ukrainian candidate had been poisoned and the intention was to kill him.

Hours after the newspaper report was published, Korpan denied making the remarks.

``The suspicion of poisoning has until now neither been confirmed or excluded,'' Korpan was quoted as saying by the Austria Press Agency.

One of the theories being tested was whether Yushchenko could have suffered from dioxin poisoning, as suggested by British toxicologist John Henry.

Yushchenko first sought treatment at Vienna's private Rudolfinerhaus clinic on Sept. 10, four days after falling ill. He went home in mid-September to resume campaigning. But he came back to the hospital later that month for more treatment, returning to the campaign in early October.

One of the chief doctors treating Yushchenko, Lothar Wicke, had been placed under police protection after receiving an anonymous threat. No details about the threat have been released.

Yushchenko was defeated by Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych in the Nov. 21 presidential election runoff, but the result was later canceled by the Supreme Court amid accusations of fraud that led to massive street protests. A rerun of the election is set for Dec. 26.
 
 Source 
 
 
 
December 8, 1991 - Leaders of Russia, Belarus and Ukraine met and signed an agreement ending the U.S.S.R. and establishing the Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS) in the Belovezhskaya Pushcha Nature Reserve in Belarus.
 

I can't decide if I think it feels like this happens yesterday or a long time ago.
 
 
 
I can't decide if I think it feels like this happens yesterday or a long time ago.
 
Mr. Putin is making it seem more recent isn't he?  
 
 
It definitely feels like it's been a long work in progress. Belarus is in a horrible way, Ukraine is in the middle of something exciting/nervous-making, the Russian mob is causing trouble in many countries. <sigh>
 
 
 
Ukraine government back to work as crisis eases

KIEV (AFP) - Ukraine's civil servants went back to work for the first time in weeks as the opposition lifted its blockade of government buildings and a political crisis eased following a compromise with the ruling regime.

The buses and human chains used by the opposition to block access to government buildings after a disputed presidential vote melted away and state employees were again free to enter their places of work without obstruction.

"I am glad it's over, it was incredibly irritating," said Ivan Volkov, a staffer with the cabinet of ministers.

Opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko called on his supporters to lift the blockades after he struck a compromise with outgoing President Leonid Kuchma, breaking a tense standoff sparked by a contested election on November 21.

The compromise, which smoothed the way for a rerun vote on December 26, was hailed in Ukraine and abroad as a breakthrough in the political crisis that has polarized this strategic nation and fueled Cold War-like rhetoric between Russia and the West.

But on Thursday, Russia and NATO agreed to "work to ensure a free, fair electoral process that reflects the will of the Ukrainian people."

NATO chief Jaap de Hoop Scheffer called it a breakthrough agreement that "shows that this is not and this should not be... an East-West confrontation, it's not an East-West rivalry."

Meanwhile thousands of Yushchenko supporters who had come to Kiev in the aftermath of a disputed vote packed up to go home.

Mikhailo, an 18-year-old student from the western town of Terebovlya, smoked his last cigarette before climbing onto a bus to take him home.

"I've been here since November 22," he said, adding that he would take his exams and return to Kiev afterwards "to defend the rights of our country."

But others vowed to stay in the tent camps set up in central Kiev to serve as both shelter and a quasi campaign headquarters.

"Yesterday there were fireworks and we claimed victory," said Sergei Semenchenko, a 22-year-old who came to Kiev from the eastern region of Chernigiv. "But we're staying here until the vote."

The compromise that broke the tense standoff between Yushchenko and Kuchma was a bill passed by parliament on Wednesday, which included measures pushed by both the opposition and the outgoing leader.

The opposition got electoral law changes and a new central election commission, measures it saw as vital in preventing fraud from marring the December 26 rerun vote, as had been the case with the November 21 election that was later annulled by the supreme court because of irregularities.

Meanwhile Kuchma got a controversial constitutional amendment that transfers many of the powers of the presidency to parliament.

After more than two weeks of standoff over the election that saw Yushchenko regions refuse to recognize any other president, parliament passed the compromise bill by a crushing majority of 402 to 21 and the chamber erupted in applause as the result appeared on a huge electronic board.

"This is an act of consolidation and reconciliation that proves Ukraine is united and indivisible," parliament speaker Volodymyr Litvin said afterward.

The European Union, which sent mediators three times to aid the negotiations during the standoff, hailed parliament's vote as a breakthrough and US Secretary of State Colin Powell (news - web sites) called Kuchma to congratulate him on the vote, according to the Ukrainian presidency.

The compromise is expected to boost Yushchenko's chances of winning the December rerun, but will also weaken the presidency.

The amendment transfers important powers from the presidency to parliament, where opposition forces are now in a minority, and is due to enter into force by January 1, 2006 at the latest.

Under the reforms, the president loses the power to appoint all top posts except for the prime minister, defense and foreign ministers, and his candidates for these three posts need to be approved by legislators as well.
 
 Source 
 
 
 
Opposition Leader in Hospital
Friday December 10, 2004 9:01 PM

By SUSANNA LOOF

Associated Press Writer

VIENNA, Austria (AP) - Ukrainian opposition leader and presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko checked into a private Vienna hospital Friday for more tests to determine whether a mysterious illness that has disfigured his face was caused by poisoning.

Arriving at the Rudolfinerhaus clinic, Yushchenko said he would stay until Monday, unless the tests were finished before then.

Yushchenko, 50, first fell ill in September and was rushed to the Vienna hospital. He resumed campaigning later in the month but with a pockmarked and badly disfigured face.

He has accused Ukrainian authorities of trying to poison him ahead of Ukraine's presidential vote - an allegation they have denied.

``Everything is going well. I plan to live for a long time and I plan to live happily. I am getting better health every day,'' said Yushchenko, wearing a scarf in his campaign color of orange and accompanied by his wife, Kateryna Chumachenko.

Dr. Michael Zimpfer, director of the Rudolfinerhaus hospital, said that among the tests would be tissue biopsies, a check of his blood chemistry and an examination of his internal organs.

``He needs to be re-examined so that we can get a chance to further clarify the nature of his illness,'' Zimpfer said.

Dr. Nikolai Korpan, the Rudolfinerhaus physician who oversaw Yushchenko's treatment, said earlier this week that doctors were working on three different poisoning theories, including one involving dioxin.

Yushchenko suffered from a series of symptoms, including back pain, acute pancreatitis and nerve paralysis on the left side of his face.

Zimpfer said doctors ``cannot exclude poisoning,'' but added: ``Theoretically it could be that we never can prove poisoning because he only came here a few days after the symptoms appeared. On the other hand, there are poisons that stay in the body a long time.''

If his disfigurement turns out to be chloracne - a type of adult acne caused by exposure to toxic chemicals - it could take a long time to clear, Zimpfer said. Sometimes it takes two to three years for people to heal.

Ukraine's Supreme Court voided the outcome of the Nov. 21 presidential runoff election, which Yushchenko lost to Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych, following allegations of massive vote fraud. A rerun of the ballot is slated for Dec. 26.

Yushchenko told reporters that he was confident of victory in the runoff - provided the vote is fair.

``There are no doubts that we will win on Dec. 26. We don't have a problem with support, we don't have a problem with getting votes. The problem is an honest election,'' Yushchenko said.
 
 Source 
 
 
<reading>
 
 
Just in:

 
Doctors: Yushchenko was poisoned
Associated Press
Saturday December 11, 2004

The mysterious illness of Ukrainian opposition leader and presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko was caused by dioxin poisoning that was likely intentional, doctors have said.
"There is no doubt about the fact that Mr Yushchenko's disease has been caused by a case of poisoning by dioxin," said Dr Michael Zimpfer, director of Vienna's private Rudolfinerhaus clinic.

Zimpfer said Yushchenko's blood and tissue registered concentrations of dioxin 1,000 times above normal levels.

"It would be quite easy to administer this amount in a soup," Zimpfer said, adding that tests showed the dioxin was taken orally. "The criminal investigation does not fit within our purview but... there is suspicion of third-party involvement."

Tests run over the past 24 hours provided conclusive evidence of the poisoning, Zimpfer said. When first seen by the Austrian doctors, Yushchenko was in a "critical stage" but was "not on the verge of dying," Zimpfer said.

He is now in "satisfactory" condition and his dioxin levels have returned to normal.

Yushchenko has accused Ukrainian authorities of trying to poison him in the runup to a presidential vote marred by fraud. Ukraine's Supreme Court voided the outcome of that vote, which Yushchenko lost to Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych, and a rerun of the ballot is slated for December 26.

Yushchenko first fell ill in September and was rushed to the Vienna hospital. He resumed campaigning later in the month but with a pockmarked and badly disfigured face.

He returned to the hospital later in September for further treatment and checked in for a third time yesterday.
 
 Source 
 
 
Is this being reported in Ukraine?
 
 
There has been a press conference in Vienna at 14:00 GMT - media are reporting this since that time. (Not online yet on e.g. interfax Ukraine/English service, but they reported about the press conference already yesterday.)
 
 
Yikes. Thanks Walter.
 
 
Just in:

 
Yushchenko was poisoned with dioxin-Austrian doctor says

11.12.2004, 17.42

VIENNA, December 11 (Itar-Tass) - Ukraine opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko was poisoned with dioxin, Yushchenko's doctor Nikolai Korpan and the head of the Rudolfinerhaus Clinic in Vienna Michael Zimpfer said on Saturday.
 
 
 
UhOh! I just this minute started a thread on this very thing, Walter. I'll delete it.
 
 
This article sums up all the latest news:

 
11.12.2004

Yushchenko Poisoned, Doctors Say

Ukrainian opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko was the victim of dioxin poisoning and the toxin was probably administered deliberately by a "third party", his doctor in Vienna said on Saturday.

"There is no doubt about the fact that the disease has been caused by a case of poisoning by dioxin," said Michael Zimpfer, the medical chief of Vienna's Rudolfinerhaus clinic. "We suspect a cause triggered by a third party."

Zimpfer added the clinic's conclusion that Yushchenko had been poisoned was based on "skin changes, blood samples and histological findings."

Yushchenko, the 50-year-old pro-Western candidate in the Ukraine's bitterly contested presidential race, fell ill on Sept. 6 with an ailment that has left his face severely disfigured.

Seen as the likely winner of a Dec. 26 re-run of a second round of the Ukraine's November presidential vote which sparked mass protests by his supporters and was finally invalidated on grounds of fraud, Yushchenko repeatedly claimed that he was poisoned by political rivals.

Ukrainian public prosecutors have opened an investigation and said on Oct. 22 that he was suffering from a fever caused by a virus that affected his liver.

Victim of a murder plot?

But before leaving for Vienna on Friday, Yushchenho reiterated that he had been the victim of a murder plot.

"I believe now more and more that what happened to me was an act of a settling of political scores," he told reporters. "The aim was to kill me."

He said he planned to return to Kiev on Sunday and was confident of defeating Yanukovych when voters return to the polls in two weeks.

"The recent revolution (in Ukraine) has opened the eyes of many civil servants who were implicated in (fraud) during the earlier rounds," he said.

Yushchenko pushes for EU membership

In an interview with the Financial Times published on Saturday, he called on the European Union to accept his country as a future member of the 25-strong bloc at a future date.

"Of course, Ukraine is waiting for real concrete steps in response to these democratic and political processes that are occurring in Ukraine," Yushchenko said in an interview with the Financial Times published on Saturday. "We are awaiting analogous steps from the European Union. In these 17 days we have shown that we are a different country, we are a different people."

In the interview Yushchenko, who trained as an economist, set out a plan consisting of four stages, culminating in the adhesion of the former Soviet republic to the EU.

Ukraine, he told the newspaper, should first become a market economy. It should then join the World Trade Organisation, and become an EU associate member before eventually acquiring full membership.

Putin supports EU plan

Friday President Vladimir Putin said he would be "pleased" to see Ukraine admitted to the European Union because this would only benefit Russia's economy due to its deep and long-standing industrial links with its neighbor.

The Russian leader's comments marked a sharp departure from the barrage of criticism that Russia has directed at the European Union and other European institutions in the past 10 days.

Privatization criticized

In the interview Yushchenko also criticised the series of privatizations under the presidency of outgoing Ukrainian President Leonid Kuchma, which he said had favoured people close to the regime.

"Many assets we all know were handed over without competition just as more than 200 years ago Catherine the Great gave out land in southern Ukraine to her lovers and favourites," he was quoted as saying. "In this same way today strategic assets of the state were transferred to people close to Kuchma and (Prime Minister Viktor) Yanukovytch."

Author DW staff / AFP (win)
 
 Source 
 
 
This has been all over the news for the past few hours - but I haven't seen any mention of it appearing in CIS or Ukraine sources... doesn't mean its not there - just that I can't find it, but I'm pretty good at ferretin' out news.
 
 
 
This has been all over the news for the past few hours - but I haven't seen any mention of it appearing in CIS or Ukraine sources... doesn't mean its not there - just that I can't find it, but I'm pretty good at ferretin' out news.
 

Well, I've listened live to that press conference: it happened just a bit more than two hours ago, and the European media didn't report about it any earlier (the first mentioning in the Austrian media happened exactly 69 minutes ago)  

As far as I can't read Ukrainian, and only guessing Russian, but could be 'Vienna' is mentioned a couple of times during the last hour in nearly all updated Ukrainian online media
 
 
This is the latest I can find from the Kiev Post:
 
 Breaking news

Austrian doctors running new tests on Yushchenko 
Dec 11, 14:12

VIENNA, Austria (AP) - Doctors were closing in on the cause of the mysterious illness that has struck Ukrainian presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko, the head of the clinic where he is being treated said Dec. 11.

Physicians began running new tests the evening of Dec. 11, when Yushchenko was admitted for a third time to Vienna's private Rudolfinerhaus clinic, hospital director Dr. Michael Zimpfer said.

"We're closing in," Zimpfer said. "We started last night to do the entire imaging, including nuclear medicine, to look at the function of the organs, skeletal system and to see what kind of damage might be hiding," he said.

Doctors were also investigating Yushchenko's blood to check for any signs of poisoning.

The physician who oversaw the opposition leader's treatment said a press conference would be held the afternoon of Dec. 11 to announce the findings.

"Everything will be clarified today," Dr. Nikolai Korpan told reporters. "Today I will able to tell you a few things... "
 

The news showed up on the wires a couple hours ago, links to articles began hittin' google a little over an hour ago. It is "Around The World" now - several hundred hits now on "Yushchenko +poisoned +dioxin"
 
 
I suppose it will reach the Ukrainian electorate as well given time.
 
 
(Radio) Correspondants in Kiev said, most Ukrainians weren't surprised at all. (Which means, it is known there, too.)
 
 
timber

14:12 in Kiev is 12:12 GMT.
The press conference wasn't opened at that time.
 
 
That's good news, Walter - thanks for the update.

I suspect this means a landslide for Yushchenko. If he lives that long.
 
 
Well, as Ukrainians said in the life reportages, I just listened, the 'knew' this already.
Using here a quotation from the Guardian:

 
If anything, the release of the results only strengthened resolve for the upcoming campaign among the opposition, since they blame for the poisoning squarely on Yanukovych or his supporters.
 
 Source 
 
 
 
Ukraine opposition leader likely to win election - poll

KYIV. Dec 11 (Interfax-Ukraine) - An opinion poll suggests opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko is heading for victory over Ukraine's Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych in a repeat presidential runoff on December 26, called after a November 21 poll was declared invalid under opposition pressure. The Razumkov Center said 47% of those questioned in a survey it carried out on December 6-9 had said they were ready to vote for Yushchenko and that 39% had expressed support for Yanukovych. Six percent intended to vote against both candidates, 3% said they would not vote at all, and 5% were undecided, the Center told Interfax. Of those who had decided to vote but had not yet made their definitive choice, 50% intended to vote for Yushchenko, 40% for Yanukovych, and 6% against both while 4% were undecided. Of those who had made up their mind to go to the polls and had made a definitive decision, 52% were going to back Yushchenko and 42% Yanukovych. The Center said it had questioned 2,023 people older than 18 in 118 cities, town, and villages in all Ukrainian regions, and that there was a maximum margin of error of 2.3%. [UA EUROPE EEU EMRG VOTE POL PRO] as
 
 
 
Interfax-Ukraine, btw, published the full English (!) report about the poisoning at 19:25 local time (=16:25 GMT).
 
 
This from Interfax Ukraine is about an hour old:

 
 Austrian doctors say Yushchenko was poisoned 
KYIV. Dec 11 (Interfax-Ukraine) - A Ukrainian parliamentary deputy cited the director of an Austrian clinic as expressing confidence on Saturday that Ukrainian opposition presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko's strange illness this autumn had been caused by an attempt to poison him with dioxin. Michael Zimpfer, director of the Rudolfinerhaus private clinic in Vienna, made his statement at a news conference, deputy Oleksandr Tretyakov, who is in the Austrian capital, told Interfax. In September, Yushchenko had tests on several occasions at Rudolfinerhaus after a sharp deterioration in his condition. This was followed by allegations that his illness had been caused by biological weapons. The Vienna clinic did not confirm this at that time but said his illness was abnormal. On October 22, the Ukrainian Prosecutor General's Office denied the allegations and said an investigation launched by it had shown that Yushchenko's illness had been caused by a herpetic infection.

The Office quashed a criminal investigation it had launched. Ukraine's parliament appointed its own investigating commission but not all of its findings have been published yet.

Yushchenko is back in Vienna for one more blood test. Tretyakov said the doctors' conclusions about the use of dioxin were based on Yushchenko's latest blood tests. "Specialists at the clinic have sent the blood to various countries and have come to the same conclusion, that it was poisoning," the deputy said. "They are absolutely sure that its was dioxin poisoning, the dioxin content was less than 1 milligram," he said. He said that, at the beginning of his illness, Yushchenko had his liver enlarged seriously. Tretyakov said Yushchenko's Vienna doctor, Mykola Korpan, and the two chief Austrian liver and blood specialists were present at the news conference. "The doctors said that nothing is threatening his life as of this moment, his organs are more or less in order, and his liver is enlarged insignificantly," Tretyakov said. But he said Yushchenko would take a fairly lengthy treatment for his face skin condition. "But there is no need for any hospital treatment for this, and with a correct diet and correct treatment his face will normalize after a long period of time. But there will be something left behind, of course," Tretyakov said.

He said Yushchenko planned to return to Ukraine shortly.
 

This, also from Interfax Ukraine, is about a half hour newer (and totally predictable   ):

 
 Russian official says doubts Yushchenko was poisoned 

MOSCOW. Dec 11 (Interfax) - A senior Russian medical official questioned allegations by Austrian physicians on Saturday that the sensational illness of Ukrainian opposition presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko was the result of dioxin poisoning.

"Dioxins do not belong to immediate effect poisons: poisoning develops for years and decades, and so it is impossible to get a dose of dioxin today and get poisoning tomorrow," Yury Ostapenko, head of the Toxicology Information Center of the Russian Health Ministry, told the Moscow radio station Ekho Moskvy.

"It's true that was one of the first signs of dioxin poisoning is skin damage, but that is a very distinctive form of acne. Besides, the way of delivery of the poison to the planned victim is dubitable," Ostapenko said.

He supported the Austrian doctors' point that dioxin, if it was given to Yushchenko, "might have lasting effects on his health as those substances take a very long time to decompose."

"Dioxins are more an environmental than a toxicological problem. They are very tenacious substances, which are released in the course of industrial production, they build up in the air, water, food, and practically everyone has already received or may receive a dose of dioxin in any kind of situation," Ostapenko said.
 

Still haven't seen anything about it from  Kyiv Post's website  though this from them is interesting:

 
 Belarus opposition members stream to Kyiv protests 
Dec 10, 11:01

(AP) - "Today Ukraine, tomorrow Belarus!" read the banner strung up this week in a tent camp for opposition protesters in Kyiv.

It's the sort of political statement that rattles backers of Belarusian President Alexander Lukashenko, branded Europe's last dictator. It's especially troubling for them because it's a message coming from a number of Belarusian opposition leaders who have traveled here to watch Ukraine's popular revolt - and take notes on democracy in action.

"The Orange Revolution has reawakened hope in Belarusians and has colossal meaning for us," said Igor Stakh, a 23-year-old member of a Belarusian youth movement called Zubr, or Bison, whose tent sit among those from his young Ukrainian comrades.

And it's not just Belarus, which borders Ukraine to the north. Liberal leaders and opposition activists from Russia have also been spotted at the tent camps and on the podium beside opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko as he fought to annul the fraud-ridden Nov. 21 presidential runoff. Russian President Vladimir Putin has insisted that outsiders stop meddling in Ukraine, a former Soviet republic...
 
 
 
 
Dec 11 2004 9:51PM
Ukraine to reprobe Yushchenko's suspected poisoning
KYIV. Dec 11 (Interfax-Ukraine) - The Ukrainian Prosecutor General's Office relaunched on Saturday an investigation into an alleged attempt to poison opposition presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko after quashing a probe several weeks ago, sources told Interfax.

Saturday's decision followed a news conference in Vienna at which Austrian doctors expressed confidence that Yushchenko had been poisoned with dioxin in autumn 2004.

The Prosecutor General's Office launched its initial proceedings on September 21.

On October 22, it rejected a theory that biological weapons had been used against Yushchenko, saying that a forensic investigation had shown that Yushchenko's illness had been the result of a herpetic infection, and quashed the proceedings.

Yushchenko was admitted to the private Rudolfinerhaus clinic in Vienna on September 10 and had an examination there until September 18. He returned to the clinic on September 30 and stayed there until October 10.

Rudolfinerhaus doctors said Yushchenko had been poisoned with dioxin about five days before his initial hospitalization. [UA EUROPE EEU EMRG VOTE CRIM POL HEA PRO AER AT WEU] as
 
 Source 
 
 
The following AP-news got quite different (=negative, critizising) headlines in other countries and different papers:

 
$65 million in U.S. money aided Ukraine political groups

American officials deny activity amounts to interfering in vote
THE ASSOCIATED PRESS
Saturday, December 11, 2004

WASHINGTON

The Bush administration has spent more than $65 million in the past two years to aid political organizations in Ukraine, paying to bring opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko to meet U.S. leaders and helping to underwrite exit polls indicating that he won last month's disputed runoff election.

U.S. officials say that the activities don't amount to interference in Ukraine's election, as Russian President Vladimir Putin alleges, but are part of the $1 billion that the State Department spends each year trying to build democracy worldwide.

No U.S. money was sent directly to Ukrainian political parties, the officials say. In most cases, it was funneled through organizations like the Eurasia Foundation or through groups aligned with Republicans and Democrats that organized election training, with human-rights forums or with independent news outlets.

But officials acknowledge that some of the money helped train groups and individuals opposed to the Russian-backed government candidate.

For example, one group that got grants through U.S.-financed foundations is the Center for Political and Legal Reforms, whose Web site has a link to Yushchenko's home page under the heading "partners." Another project financed by the U.S. Agency for International Development brought an official with the Center for Political and Legal Reforms to Washington last year for a three-week training session on political advocacy.

"There's this myth that the Americans go into a country and, presto, you get a revolution," said Lorne Craner, a former State Department official who heads the International Republican Institute, which got $25.9 million last year to encourage democracy in Ukraine and more than 50 other countries.

"It's not the case that Americans can get 2 million people to turn out on the streets. The people themselves decide to do that," Craner said.

The White House press secretary, Scott McClellan, said, "There's accountability in place. We make sure that money is being used for the purposes for which it's assigned or designated."

Since the Ukrainian Supreme Court invalidated the results of the Nov. 21 presidential runoff, Russia and the United States have traded charges of interference. A new election is scheduled for Dec. 26.

Opposition leaders, international monitors and Bush's election envoy to Ukraine have said that major fraud marred the runoff between Yushchenko and current Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych, who was declared the winner.

Yushchenko is friendlier toward Europe and the United States than Yanukovych, who has Putin's support as well as backing from the current Ukrainian government of President Leonid Kuchma. Putin applauded Yanukovych during state visits to Ukraine within a week of both the Oct. 31 election and the Nov. 21 runoff.

Yushchenko's backers say that Russian support for Yanukovych goes beyond Putin's praise and includes millions of dollars in campaign funding and other assistance. Putin has said that Russia has acted "absolutely correctly" with regard to Ukraine.

Documents and interviews provide a glimpse into how U.S. money was spent inside Ukraine.

"Our money doesn't go to candidates. It goes to the process, the institutions that it takes to run a free and fair election," said Richard Boucher, the spokesman for the State Department.

The exit poll, paid for by the embassies of the United States and seven other nations as well as four international foundations, said that Yushchenko won the Nov. 21 vote by 54 percent to 43 percent. Yanukovych and his supporters say that the exit poll was skewed.

The four foundations involved included three financed by the U.S. government: The National Endowment for Democracy, which gets its money directly from Congress; the Eurasia Foundation, which gets money from the State Department; and the Renaissance Foundation, part of a network of charities financed by billionaire George Soros that gets money from the State Department. Other countries involved included Great Britain, the Netherlands, Switzerland, Canada, Norway, Sweden and Denmark.

Grants from groups financed by the U.S. Agency for International Development also went to the International Center for Policy Studies, a research group that includes Yushchenko on its supervisory board. However, the board also includes several current or former advisers to Kuchma.
 

 Source 
 
 
As a few of you have notice, I really really want something to happen in Belarus. My optimism may be going up a tiny notch from cautious.
 
 
I recently (today) read an article that reveals the US has funnelled large sums to the Opposition in Ukraine.

Wonder how the world will spin this...?

Also, finally the dioxin poisoning story breaks. The doctors confirmed it. Pretty damn weird and Soviet-sounding to me. Who was the guy who was poisoned by being stuck by the tip of an umbrella...? A journalist? I watched a segment about it over a year ago. Did anyone see it?

Anyway. They say Yuschenko will never look the same again.
 
 
 
Who was the guy who was poisoned by being stuck by the tip of an umbrella...? A journalist? I watched a segment about it over a year ago. Did anyone see it?
 

Bulgarian. Georgi Markov, journalist and writer. Famous case. He was murdered in 1978 in London, where he went to live after defecting from Communist Bulgaria nine years before - by a killer armed with a 'poisoned umbrella'.

EDIT: Googled up a  BBC link  that adds:

 
In 1992, General Vladimir Todorov, the former Bulgarian intelligence chief, was sentenced to 16 months in jail for destroying 10 volumes of material relating to Markov's death.

A second person suspected of destroying documents committed suicide, while a Bulgarian spy who was believed to be involved in the assassination died in a car accident.

Markov was an acclaimed novelist and playwright in Bulgaria prior to his defection to the West in 1969.

He was particularly known for his harsh criticism of the autocratic rule of the then communist leader, Todor Zhivkov, and his broadcasts were seen as providing inspiration to the dissident movement in Bulgaria.

 
 
 
 
Well, as Ukrainians said in the life reportages, I just listened, the 'knew' this already.
 

Problem is, the country's so divided and the media have been so unreliable for so long, the third to a half of the Ukrainians who are on Yanukovich's side will probably simply not believe it, even if the Ukrainian stations do cover it.
 
 
Concerning the money -- I have no doubt that it will be used for all its worth by Yushchenko's opponents -- but it's not news, is it? And hardly scandalous, IMO... the EU, too, has been funding pro-democracy groups across Eastern Europe... In one of the articles I posted earlier, the National Democratic Institute was mentioned as funder, and I'm sure the Socialist International, the Liberal International and individual political parties in Europe (for example through their organisations for international contacts and research) all fund civil society groups and even actual political parties in Eastern Europe as well, by helping them organise seminars, trainings or meetings to increase co-operation... Right on, I say.

Perhaps it'll even infuse a bit of realism back home in the West again, when it comes to one's enemy image of the opposition - I mean, it's interesting to read in Walters article above that Soros and the Bush admin have been funding the same groups, isn't it? That's hardly news either, but for some Americans still a surprise I'm sure... It's pretty standard though. Left and right here are left and right, but when they go east to find partners, they often find themselves roughly all on the same side, confronted with a nationalist/neo-communist coalition on the other side that all of them would prefer out...

For example, I remember how right after 1989, when all the Dutch parties (like the German etc ones) went to establish some first contacts, they all took their turn visiting Hungary too. To everyone's surprise (not least the Hungarians' themselves), the Alliance of Free Democrats was asked by both the right-wing liberals, the Democrats and the Labour Party to become their partner... ;-). (I dunno who they ended up with exactly, actually, just that they're now in the Liberal International and that the Labour Party in the late 90s finally resigned itself to co-operating with reformed ex-communists instead.)
 
 
I would prefer the US stayed out of this, for many reasons. The main one being: should Yushchenko win the next election, that the independence of the country not be in question, nor interfered with. Also, that there not be an expectation "return favours" owed by the Ukranians, whether it be to the US, or any other country.
 
 
Good point, msolga, about the expectations of reciprocity.
 
 
At the company Christmas party last night, I spent some time speaking with P. He arrived in Canada from Ukraine exactly one year ago yesterday. He'll be going back later this month, to be part of the group of election observers being sent by Canada. I made him promise that he'd keep us up to date on what's happening there.
 
 
 
I recently (today) read an article that reveals the US has funnelled large sums to the Opposition in Ukraine.

Wonder how the world will spin this...?

 

Yes, two posts above your response :wink:
 
 
Och. I guess there's no hiding now. I rarely read long cut and pastes. Doesn't stop me from posting them once in a while...

Anyway, it seems we have a huge fund for promoting democracies--and have been using it for quite a long time. I was unaware of it. I guess this is the source of the money going to Iran's students, possibly Chinese dissidents, obviously the EE's... I like the idea. < a smile >
 
 
If ya can't come right out and beat 'em, buy 'em some enemies, eh?
 
 
 
Perhaps it'll even infuse a bit of realism back home in the West again, when it comes to one's enemy image of the opposition - I mean, it's interesting to read in Walters article above that Soros and the Bush admin have been funding the same groups, isn't it? That's hardly news either, but for some Americans still a surprise I'm sure... It's pretty standard though. Left and right here are left and right, but when they go east to find partners, they often find themselves roughly all on the same side, confronted with a nationalist/neo-communist coalition on the other side that all of them would prefer out...

 

Worth focussing on - I think it's probably why you don't hear too much fussing about the funding from people in the U.S. Everybody understands way way way down deep (but doesn't like to come out and say) that they're all actually on the same side, politically. Perhaps facing the centre bar from slightly different angles, but from the same side.
 
 
Financial & organisational support and enticement are a good alternative to military force when one wants authoritarian regimes abroad to be tackled some way or other...

Lord knows the EU has used it to all its might, supporting democratic-minded civil society groups and withholding support from governments until certain conditions were fulfilled...
 
 
Lord knows the EU has used it to all its might, supporting democratic-minded civil society groups and withholding support from governments until certain conditions were fulfilled...
---------
Except when they don't toe Jacques Chirac's line-- I remember (and will never forget) Jack Chirac threatening to stymie a couple of EE's membership ambitions to the EU, because they dared to agree with the US about Iraq. They definitely have a price tag on their support.
 
 
I'm sometimes, it seems, really uneducated:

what does

 
EE's membership ambitions to the EU
 

mean, Lash? (What's a/the 'EE' in this context?)
 
 
The Eastern European countries, Walter. I'm sorry to use the shorthand so often. We'd used it a couple of times before and I thought it was in our vernacular now.
 
 
Thanks. And what did CHIRAC do exactly?

He threatened to stymie which countries when and how?
(By now, I've found out that these countries are: Albania, Armenia, Azerbaijan, Belarus, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Croatia, Czech Republic, Estonia, Georgia, Hungary, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Latvia, Lithuania, The Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, Moldova, Poland, Romania, Russia, Slovakia, Slovenia, Tajikistan, Turkmenistan, Ukraine, Uzbekistan.)

(You certainly know about the procedure, how new EU-membership is gained, do you?)
 
 
A number of those EE countries are now members of the EU (since 1 May, 2004) and have support troops in Iraq.
 
 
.... as have a couple of 'old' EU-members, like the UK, Italy, Denmark, The Netherlands....
 
 
Spain withdrawed troops from Iraq and Dutch will withdraw in March.
 
 
What remains is that not France, not The UN, and not the EU have done much, individually or collectively, of concrete, proactive effectiveness in the mater of global security. France in particular, and to a lesser extent Germany and Russia, have been the chief architects of obstruction, the way I see it. Had The UN taken decisive remedial action before March of '03, the current related contretemps would not exist. Had The UN not allowed the absurdity of violators participating and even chairing commissions established to prosecute such violations, The UN would not now be facing a credibility problem in that area. Had The UN been more diligent in its administration of the Oil for Food program, that would not be a scandal waved in today's headlines, either.

There's plenty of blame to go around - all the principals - including The US - have screwed up and have done their share of screwin' up other things. The question now is what to do about it. The "System" is broken. It doesn't work. Its not only not effective, its part of the problem. Do we fix it, or do we dump it and build a new one better suited to the task?
 
 
Why not let the Ukrainians choose themselve what they want???????
 
 
As far as the Ukrainians, or the Belorus, or the citizens of any other nation, you betchya they oughtta be able to determine what they want. Sometimes, though, there's gotta be some outside effort undertaken to ensure that what they actually want turns out to be what they actually get.
 
 
Ah, I see: democracy.
 
 
Lash is probably referring to the 17 February, 2003 speech in which Chirac chastised the East European governments who had signed a letter supporting Bush on Iraq. "They missed a good opportunity to keep quiet," he said about that, warning that the countries in question were still in a "dangerous" position, seeing how their accession had not been finalised yet.

Scandalous remarks, those were. As most other European governments agreed, in fact. Not just Blair but German Chancellor Schroeder, too, criticized the remarks as inappropriate. And the accession process since has not been affected - if anything, the remarks backfired on Chirac.

So how any of this episode thus proves Lash's assertion about "toeing Jacques Chirac's line" is totally unclear to me. Who was made to toe Chirac's line? Not the East-European countries in question, for sure. Poland, for example, went on to become one of the US's main partners in Iraq. And their not toeing his line has not affected their prospective EU membership in the least either - in fact, Romania and Bulgaria's track to a 2007 accession was just a week or two ago reconfirmed, even despite serious doubts about Romanian corruption and political transparency. Neither have Chirac's remarks impacted any of the ways in which the EU has "supported democratic-minded civil society groups", so how Lash proposes to have proven or disproven anything concerning the post she quoted also remains unclear to me.

This is all fairly typical for the level of argument presented here. Confusing the main thrust of the (massive) EU funding, accession and development process with some offhand remarks of one of the then-15 EU heads of state (that were, additionally, widely criticized by the other heads of state and heeded by noone) - and then somehow claiming that those remarks represent the line EU members are supposed to be "toeing". Evidence is not needed, the name Chirac should suffice to make the point. Ah, the logical twists one needs to bend oneself in to keep one's enemy images intact, huh. God prevent having to acknowledge that one's on the same side somewhere.
 
 
 
Ah, I see: democracy.
 

You disagree with the American and European financial support to democratic groups in the Ukraine, Walter?

That would surprise me, kinda. I mean, doesn't, say, your party's Friedrich Ebert Stiftung engage in the same kind of financial/organisational support of pro-democratic groups in Eastern Europe? I hear that  in the Ukraine  they've been organising seminars for trade unionists, summer schools for young politicians, professional training programs for independent journalists, for example.. ?
 
 
The EU agreed, btw, that those ten new members, which joined this, could join on 26 February, 2001.

That year, Chirac said: "If relations between Russia and the European Union are to become more and more integrated, I do not believe that Russia will purely and simply join the union. I do not believe it is Russia's calling."  Source 

This is the only evedence I could find, where he was toing about (one of) the EE countries.
 
 
Walter, I think I know what remarks of Chirac's Lash was referring to, see my post above.
 
 
 
A number of those EE countries are now members of the EU (since 1 May, 2004) and have support troops in Iraq.
 

Yes. That's true. So, if I'd said "Chirac refused to admit them to the UN", well then, you'd have disproved me.

He was just very rude, condescending and he threatened their memberships.
_____________

Tuesday, 18 February, 2003, 17:55 GMT
Chirac blasts EU candidates

Chirac's outburst against applicants surprised observers
By Oana Lungescu
BBC European regional correspondent

French President Jacques Chirac launched an unprecedented attack on the east European candidates for EU membership that signed two public letters of support for the American stance on Iraq.

At the end of an emergency summit in Brussels, Mr Chirac called their behaviour "childish" and warned it could have an impact on their hopes of joining the EU.
France was already concerned that the former communist countries would become America's Trojan horse within the EU and Nato - but the two letters have clearly stung President Chirac to the quick.

In an extraordinary outburst, he described the behaviour of the candidate countries as "dangerous".

Joining the EU takes some consideration and consultation, he said, and these countries were reckless and not very well-behaved.
"They missed a great opportunity to shut up," he chided the candidates, and their pro-American stance could feed public hostility to EU expansion.

Chilly reception

Eight former communist countries are set to join the EU next year, but Mr Chirac was particularly critical of the poorest applicants, Romania and Bulgaria, which will have to wait until 2007.

Their position is already very delicate, he said, and if they wanted to diminish their chances of joining the EU they could not have chosen a better way.

So the leaders of the applicant countries will get a chilly reception when they come to Brussels on Tuesday to be briefed on the summit results - even if Mr Chirac has already gone home.

Last week France rejected a British request for the candidates to join the talks on Iraq.

Even though it is unlikely that expansion can be stopped by the depth of French feeling, this first incident has shown that alliances will be much more unpredictable and fraught in a Union of 25 and more countries.
--------------
nimh-- It is obvious that Chirac was trying to stiff arm the small EE's into lock-step with his opinion on the war--the letter they signed was in support of the US. There is no other reasonable way to see it. He tried to bully them into agreement with him--or at least silence--they missed a good opportunity to shut up...?
 
 
 
Why not let the Ukrainians choose themselve what they want???????
 

Yes. I couldn't agree more!
 
 
I agree, also. Thankfully, they weren't railroaded into accepting Russia's choice for them.
 
 
 
He was just very rude, condescending and he threatened their memberships.
 

Yes he was.

How that substantiates your assertion earlier though, I dunno. After all, you wrote:

 
 
Lord knows the EU has used it to all its might, supporting democratic-minded civil society groups and withholding support from governments until certain conditions were fulfilled...
 

Except when they don't toe Jacques Chirac's line [..] They definitely have a price tag on their support.
 

Chirac did not speak for the EU. He was rebuked by other EU leaders. His remarks had no impact on EU policy towards these new and future members. So your point is, apart from that Chirac personally is an unpleasant politician? What's that supposed to say about the EU?
 
 
Yushchenko's Viennese doctors were threatened with murder themselves

From today's Sueddeutsche Zeitung, on the poisoning of Yushchenko, news of how the doctors at the Viennese clinic that examined him were hampered by death threats from the Ukraine themselves:

 
Both Wicke and also Yushchenko's examining doctor Nikolai Korpan were meanwhile apparently threatened with "problems" by unknown persons, yes even with outright murder, which necessitated police protection for the doctors at times. It never became fully clear, to whom in the Ukraine the truth about the poisoning attempt was so unwelcome, that he would resort to such massive threat gestures in a foreign country. For certain, in any case, is that the process of diagnosing Yushchenko in the Rudolfinerhaus was slowed down by pressure from outside. ("Ärzte als Detektive")
 

Yushchenko's strange dinner with secret service chief Smeshko

The fingers are pointing to Igor Smeshko, the chief of the Ukrainian intelligence service. It was him whom Yushchenko had dinner with the day before Yushchenko started suffering from extreme pain. And a strange conversation it had been too:

 
The opposition leader said that it was Smeshko who took the initiative for the meeting, he had wanted to pass along "distinctly important information". But then there was no such information [at the meeting], they simply chatted non-commitally and not at all confidentially about the upcoming elections. The dinner was thus only staged in order to poison Yushchenko, his supporters have insisted since. ("Die Giftmischer von Kiew")
 

How the Ukrainian secret service was assigned the investigation of the poisoning it was itself suspected of

You'll have noted that the Ukraine's public prosecutor, Svyatoslav Piskun, has now announced he will take the case of Yushchenko's poisoning back up again. So what happened last time - didn't they research it before? Well, they did. Piskun's predecessor, fired last week, had taken up Yushchenko's case - and assigned the SBU, the Ukrainian intelligence service, with investigating it. Yes, the same SBU that is suspected of being behind the poisoning in the first place. Within four weeks, it arrived at the conclusion that the case was baseless and that Yushchenko was probably suffering from a herpes infection. As a Yushchenko spokesman points out, this was tantamount to "making the goat into the gardener".

In the East-Ukraine, calls for censorship  and conspiracy theories about how Yushchenko will sell out the country to EU and US

News about the Viennese doctors' conclusions is widely reported in the Ukraine:

 
The news from Vienna dominated all the frontpages and news broadcasts in the Ukraine this weekend. Most media made an effort to report objectively. This too is one of the results of the three-week "Revolution in Orange": most of the Kiev editors have no fear anymore for the press controllers of the presidential administration. ("Bulletin mit Sprengkraft")
 

But in the East-Ukraine, there is resistance to the news:

 
In the districts of Donetsk and Lugansk, the bulwarks of support for [Yanukovich], there were sceptical comments. To "protect [the population] from false information", the regional soviet of Lugansk, an industrial city close to the Russian border, decided to request in Kiev the prohibition of the "anticonstitutional station Channel 5". [..] Several speakers at a Yanukovich rally in his hometown of Donetsk unfolded a simple scenario of how the Viennese doctors had gotten to their report: Austria, which never got over the loss of the West-Ukraine with [the city of] Lemberg (Lviv) after World War I, belongs to the EU after all; it is well-known that the EU supports Yushchenko, who in return has signalled foreign policy compromises.
 

Yanukovich himself was even more clear about it:

 
"Yushchenko was not just the lackey of the EU, but of the US too. Washington has financed his campaign. He warned that Yushchenko, if he were to win in the rerun of the elections, would "sell the country to the Americans".
 
 
 
Was it the Russian secret service that was behind the poisoning?

The Kiev press reported that Yanukovich continues to be helped by Russian "Imidzhmaykery" (Image-makers) who have come on the recommendation of President Putin, and who played a major role in Yanukovich's campaign before, notes the Sueddeutsche Zeitung also.

But The Independent goes a step further: was it the Russian secret service that poisoned Yushchenko?

 
 A story of power and poison is now etched on the face of Ukraine's hero 

[..]

[A]s prosecutors in Ukraine reopened a criminal investigation into his illness, which struck after he dined with a senior member of the Ukrainian intelligence service, Mr Yushchenko refused to renew those accusations. "I don't want this factor to influence the election in some way - either as a plus or a minus," he said. "This question will require a great deal of time and serious investigation. Let us do it after the election."

[..] But the confirmation of the poisoning is likely to lead to further speculation that the Kremlin was involved. It also gives credence to rumours that Russian special forces had been sent to the capital, Kiev, and then hastily withdrawn.

Ukraine's strategic importance is such that Russian President Vladimir Putin spoke in favour of Mr Yanukovych, who wooed the Russianised east of the country with pledges to make Russian a second state language and to offer dual citizenship.

A leading member of Mr Yushchenko's coalition, MP Yuriy Pavlenko, voiced the suspicion, held by many of his colleagues, that Russian intelligence was involved in the poisoning. "I was always convinced this was poisoning and an attempt on Yushchenko's life," he said.

Ukrainian intelligence services have said that they have no chemical or biological facilities and that during the Soviet era, when they were part of the KGB, specialised products of that sort were provided by Moscow.

There are historical precedents. Soviet intelligence agents were responsible for the shooting in a Paris church in 1924 of the leader of a short-lived Ukrainian state, Symon Petlyura. Ukraine's most prominent post-war nationalist leader, Stepan Bandera, was assassinated in Munich in 1959 by a pistol firing a poisonous mist which brought on a heart attack.
 

The newspaper continues the line of (admittedly speculative) thought in its editorial, Ukraine must seize this opportunity to drain the poison from its politics :

 
It is important to note that Mr Yanukovich, as the Prime Minister (and the preferred candidate of the tyrannical outgoing President, Leonid Kuchma) had the powers of the state at his disposal, including the secret services. The Ukrainian state under Mr Kuchma's leadership is no stranger to accusations of murder. Several political journalists have died in mysterious circumstances in recent years, including Georgiy Gongadze, whose headless corpse was discovered in 2000.

But Mr Yanukovich's links with the Russian Government also raise disturbing questions. The Russian secret services, of which President Putin was once chief, have long been suspected of finding ruthless ways to silence opponents of the regime, including the alleged poisoning of a Russian journalist on her way to cover the Beslan hostage crisis earlier this year. In this context, Mr Yushchenko's suspicions that his political enemies, which include the Putin government, tried to kill him seem eminently reasonable.
 
 
 
 
 
He was just very rude, condescending and he threatened their memberships.
 

Yes he was.

How that substantiates your assertion earlier though, I dunno. After all, you wrote:

 
 
Lord knows the EU has used it to all its might, supporting democratic-minded civil society groups and withholding support from governments until certain conditions were fulfilled...
 

Except when they don't toe Jacques Chirac's line [..] They definitely have a price tag on their support.
 

Chirac did not speak for the EU. He was rebuked by other EU leaders. His remarks had no impact on EU policy towards these new and future members. So your point is, apart from that Chirac personally is an unpleasant politician? What's that supposed to say about the EU?
 

I poked around a smidge, looking for the article I read months ago--about France and Germany running the EU show--trying to arrange things so that their countries call all the shots. Most people think (since Britain has been frozen out) that Chirac is the de facto leader of the EU. His remarks seem as though he had his cart before his horse. He knows he calls the shots, but the other members haven't yet seen the handwriting on the wall...

-----

That 'poisoning'....may be regionalism on my part...sure does sound like a Russian op.
 
 
 
Most people think (since Britain has been frozen out) that Chirac is the de facto leader of the EU.
 

Who is "most"?

José Manuel Barroso (Spain) is still the president of the EU commission, Peter Mandelson (UK) still the commissioner for trade, the Netherlands still are holding the Presidency of the Council of the EU...

People should perhaps try to get information before starting to think.
 
 
As long as they wind up thinking what you think?

There is always a power behind the throne. Many Chirac watchers and DeGaulle watchers before--see France (now Chirac) taking step after step toward some position of leadership within the EU. He has 'spoken for them' plenty of times and led political operations against Britain and the US. Whether or not you know it, or agree with it--he is jockeying for the power position in the EU.

If we could get an honest reply...Americans: How many know the name of the current president of the EU?

Who recalls a speech by Barroso? What was Peter Mandelson's last political statement?
 
 
 
Who recalls a speech by Barroso? What was Peter Mandelson's last political statement?
 

You really should inform yourself a bit, I suppose.

For instance, since when this commission in office.

Who, btw, recalls a speech of the US-American Secretary of Trade, and how many Euroepans, you think, know his name?

Obviously, he has been frozen out, using your logic.

There are a couple of EU MP's from the UK Anti-Europe Party sitting in the EU-parliament.
Freezing, I suppose.

And I must admit, I just know (a bit) of one of Barroso's speeches, namely as "President-designate at the European Commission Plenary session of the European Parliament Strasbourg on17 November 2004".
(But I sincerely doubt that there have been more.)
 
 
 
Most people think (since Britain has been frozen out) that Chirac is the de facto leader of the EU.
 

"Most people" in America, perhaps... or "most people" with your outlook on the world... and, possibly, Jacques Chirac himself.

That would be about it.

There's Euroscepticists here too... but I dont know anyone who seriously proposed that one of the bad things about the EU is that Jacques Chirac calls the shots. In fact, more often than not the perception is rather one of a certain quixotic quality about the French demarches. France has... its things. Sometimes those are diplomatically built around in the EU, sometimes a compromise is made, and sometimes they're just ignored as the idiosyncracies they sometimes are. What did Chirac make the EU do or not do? If his intention was to make the EU collectively oppose Bush on Iraq, he certainly failed, alas - what, with a bunch of its members deciding to supply troops.

Seriously. The idea that Jacques Chirac is "calling the shots" in the EU I think would be strictly confined to American (and probably British) conservatives - and possibly, the mind of Mr Chirac himself. Whatever.

But, you know - any kind of specific example of something Jacques Chirac successfully made the EU as a whole toe the line on would be greatly appreciated. Perhaps agricultural subsidies? There could be a point... cause I cant think of any other right now... But please - just so we know what we're talking about, specifically, you know - beyond blanket assertions about how "France and Germany are running the EU show" by some conservative op-ed writer...

 
Americans: How many know the name of the current president of the EU?
 

Prodi ring a bell? Previous president of the European Commission? Most powerful politician in the EU for the last few years?

If it doesnt ring a bell, I'm afraid it says more about American media than about power relations in the EU...
 
 
 
Myth peddling Anti-Europeans have no shame.
 

I really like this statement.

It's from an organisation, I'm quite friendly with (and actually the only part of it, where I could join :wink: ): the closest US-ally's, Tony Blair's Labour Party's Movement for Europe:

 
We aim to promote public understanding of the importance to Britain of playing a leading role in the European Union.
 
 
 
my question was to prove a point--

Who recalls a speech by Barroso? What was Peter Mandelson's last political statement?

nimh said--

Prodi ring a bell? Previous president of the European Commission? Most powerful politician in the EU for the last few years?

If it doesnt ring a bell, I'm afraid it says more about American media than about power relations in the EU..
-----------
...and he may have a point. Or, it may be that self-promotion of the one wants to gain name recognition, and become quoted more often than other EU players is paying off well for Chirac.

But, at any rate, I should try to find that article--or some other supporting one. But, one doesn't have to be anti-EU to at least assume from the media and Chirac himself, that he is "the most equal of equals"--as Caesar Augustus put it.
 
 
Maybe this Chirac/EU stuff could go to another thread, so we can stay somewhat focussed on doings in Ukraine here?
 
 
 
Or, it may be that self-promotion of the one wants to gain name recognition, and become quoted more often than other EU players is paying off well for Chirac.
 

Yup. That works.

In fact, I was just thinking, after my post mentioning Prodi, about what you'd earlier quipped about how "there is always a power behind the throne" - about how it's all about "as long as they wind up thinking what you think". One could say there is such a kind of power division in the EU, just the other way around. That the European Commission, with Prodi (now Barroso) at the helm, lets the national leaders fight each other for their place behind the mike and in front of the TV cameras, in order to reassert to their national voters that, you know, they're still in charge - even while they, the European Commission, actually control the massive money flows in the EU, making their decisions "behind the scenes" (that is, behind rather than in front of the TV cameras). The national leaders get the status moments, the airtime, the credit - but the power over the collective purse lies with the Commission.

Of course, that metaphor has its limits too. For example, larger countries like Germany and France are more likely to obtain some kind of exemption to the common rule - the rule setting a limit to national budget deficits, for example. But take a step back from the media fury about that, and you see that what those national governments succeed in scrambling for is already just crumbles left behind by the Commission. The budget deficit limits have been set - the national governments, Germany and France included, are forced to at least make strenuous, impopular efforts to live up to them - and even if they get an exemption this year, they wont get away with it four times in a row. Their success in fact is one in a rearguard action.

The end decisions over the long-term frameworks still remain with the national government leaders, united in the European Council, forsure - as testified by the successive European summits with their tortuous negotiations. But on an every day basis, its the Commission, reigning over a powerful bureaucracy little covered by any national news broadcast, that meanwhile gets to make all the funding decisions, set all the new guidelines and restrictions, accord or forbid transnational business mergers, etc.

If you do want to use this metaphor, I'd say Chirac gets to sit in his throne of media attention every once in a while, rhetorically invoking Europe in beautiful speeches even while his verdicts remain largely unheeded by the other European governments - while the nuts and bolts are controlled in discretion in Brussels.

 
But, at any rate, I should try to find that article--or some other supporting one.
 

If it's an op-ed or column, merely asserting that "Germany and France are calling the shots", don't bother, at least not for my sake. But if you can come up with actual examples of issues and decisions on which the other EU member states were supposedly successfully made to "toe the line" set out by Chirac, the discussion would rise above the merely rhetorical again.

 
But, one doesn't have to be anti-EU to at least assume from the media and Chirac himself, that he is "the most equal of equals"--as Caesar Augustus put it.
 

I think one would have to be anti-EU to assume so - either that or, perhaps, French.
 
 
 
Chirac, the EU, and possibly the end of the world as we know it can be found here. 

Moving my part of this Frenchy discussion to the appropriate thread.
 
 
Oops - sorry eBeth. You're right.

Places to possibly continue the EU discussion:

 How should the EU be governed? European Council vs European Commission (nimh) 

 Following the European Union (Mapleleaf) 
 
 
Thanks, both of you. I really appreciate it.

(not that I'm uninterested in the EU discussion, but this thread had become a little sort of reflection spot for me and a couple of friends from Ukraine who had been reading along)
 
 
Did this stuff get posted here already?

It's from Salon.com (and you have to pay - so no url will help.

"AP: Yushchenko shows record Dioxin level

By Emma Ross

Dec. 15, 2004 | London -- New tests reveal Ukrainian presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko's blood contains the second-highest level of dioxin poisoning ever recorded in a human -- more than 6,000 times the normal concentration, according to the expert analyzing the samples.

Abraham Brouwer, professor of environmental toxicology at the Free University in Amsterdam, where the blood samples were sent for analysis, said they contained about 100,000 units of dioxin per gram of blood fat.

However, the concentration could prove to be even higher, or lower, once results are in later this week from a more definitive test, said Arnold Schechter, a specialist in dioxin analysis from the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center in Dallas.

Brouwer's team has narrowed the search from more than 400 types of dioxin to about 29 and is confident they will identify the poison by week's end. That, in turn, could provide clues to its source.

"From a (chemical) fingerprint, at least you can deduce what kind of sources might have been involved," Brouwer told The Associated Press. "The labs will... try to find out whether it matches any of the batches of dioxins that are around, so that maybe you can trace it back to where it was ordered or where it came from."

Experts say Yushchenko, whose face has been pockmarked and disfigured, has probably experienced the worst effects already and should gradually recover, with no impairment to his working ability.

The 50-year-old reformist candidate, who faces Kremlin-backed Viktor Yanukovych in a repeat runoff on Dec. 26, fell ill after having dinner with Ukrainian Security Service chief Ihor Smeshko and his deputy Volodymyr Satsyuk on Sept. 5. Yushchenko reported having a headache about three hours after the dinner, and by the next day had developed an acute stomach ache.

He later reported pancreatitis and gastrointestinal pain, as well as a severe backache.

About three weeks after his first symptoms, Yushchenko developed the rough, acne-like rash on his face which is the hallmark of dioxin poisoning.

"It was very late before the rash started to develop, so if he had died it would have been a mystery illness of his pancreas, his liver or his gut and they would have said maybe it's some rare bug thing," said John Henry, a toxicologist at London's Imperial College. "He would have died within a few days and nobody would ever, ever have thought of dioxins."

Brouwer said the highest dose recorded so far was in a woman in Vienna, who was intentionally poisoned with dioxin in the mid-1990s. Tests showed her blood had 140,000 units per gram of fat, and she survived.

"We don't actually know what the lethal dose is. The only thing we do know is there's a woman who had an even higher dose, who didn't die, so it must be higher than that," Brouwer said.

The woman, who was among five people deliberately poisoned at a textile institute in 1997, was sick for two years and was in and out of hospital with various symptoms, said Schecter, who was involved in tracking the case. A second woman fell ill from the poisoning, but the other three people had no symptoms at all.

It would not be difficult to deliver the dose Yushchenko received, experts say. If the dioxin he ingested is the most hazardous type, tetrachlorodibenzoparadioxin, or TCDD, it would take only a drop or two, or a tiny amount of powder mixed in food, to poison him.

Most of what is known about the health effects of acute dioxin poisoning comes from experiments on animals. Most animals would die from the levels in Yushchenko's blood.

Dioxin is a term referring to a group of substances created mostly by factories that use chlorine, such as paper, pesticide or plastics plants. It comes from burning fuels like wood, coal or oil. Natural sources include forest fires, but most often it comes from manufacturing or waste burning, whether municipal or backyard.

Dioxins are widespread in the environment and rise through the food chain from the soil and river beds to animals. They are particularly concentrated in meat, fish and dairy products because the chemicals dissolve well in fat.

Nearly everybody has some level of dioxin in their body. The normal level found in the blood ranges from 15 units to 45 units per gram of blood fat.

Evidence of the hazards comes from studies of exposed workers or from people involved in industrial accidents. The research suggests Yushchenko faces an increased risk of heart attack, cancer, diabetes, muscle aches and other less severe symptoms, but it is unclear how high that risk has risen from a single poisoning.

The disfiguring acne, while not harmful to his health, may persist for decades, experts say.

"It'll be a couple of years, and he will always be a bit pockmarked. After damage as heavy as that, I think he will not return to his film star looks," said Henry.

Dioxin, which settles in the body fat, lasts a long time in the body. Eliminating it quickly would likely reduce Yushchenko's chances of long-term ill health.

One possibility is a couple of courses of liposuction, a procedure that sucks the fat out of the body.

Another option being discussed by scientists is the use of olestra, a fake fat substance used in diet food that could act as a magnet to draw the poison out of the body fat into the gut for elimination. The technique has been proposed before for the elimination of other fat-soluble pollutants, said Diane Henshel, an environmental toxicologist at Indiana University.

Studies have indicated the body keeps the levels of dioxin in the blood and in the body fat equal, she said. When there's an imbalance, it redistributes to return to equilibrium. The idea is that olestra could be used to create a "sink" in the gut that would draw the dioxin out of the blood, forcing the body fat to release more of it into the blood, Henshel said.

"There are some studies, but the results are not very impressive. You get rid of some of the dioxins, but it's a slow process. Liposuction would probably be a better idea," Brouwer said."
 
 
I heard that last night.

We're getting anxious here, waiting to hear if P will really be part of the group to go to Ukraine for the election-monitoring. He's most interested in going to the East, and, well, it's nervous-making.
 
 
In the wake of the debacle over last month's presidential run-off in Ukraine and the Ukrainian Supreme Court's ruling that the election had to be re-run, the Ukrainian Prosecutor-General's office, acting at the immediate request of the Ukrainian parliament, has begun a criminal investigation into the activity of several members of the country's Central Election Commission, accused of deliberately miscalculating the ballots and deliberately announcing incorrect results.

 
Ukraine Launches Legal Case Against Election Officials
16.12.2004

The Ukrainian Prosecutor General's Office has launched a criminal investigation against several members of the Central Election Commission.

They are accused of activity that led to grave consequences, the deliberate miscalculation of ballots and the deliberate announcement of incorrect results in the presidential election as well as the compilation of a Nov. 24 report about the results of the election.

The office's main investigations directorate has been instructed to conduct a pre-trial investigation of the case.

The commission announced the victory of pro-Russian candidate, the current Ukrainian prime minister, Viktor Yanukovich, in the second round of voting that took place on Nov. 21. However, his rival, opposition contender Viktor Yushchenko, disagreed with those results claiming they were falsified.

The Supreme Court of Ukraine forbid the publication of the results and ordered a rerun of the elections to be held on Dec. 26. The outgoing Ukrainian leader, Leonid Kuchma, later fired the Central Election Commission staff. The new commission was formed without the participation of possible Yanukovich's supporters, according to a decision by the Ukrainian parliament.
 

 Source 
 
 
Just a short item in today's Volkskrant (apologies for any broken English in the translation):

 
Blood Yushchenko turns out to have been poisoned even more strongly

AMSTERDAM - The amount of dioxin in the blood of poisoned Ukrainian opposition leader Victor Yushchenko is not a thousand times, but six thousand times higher than the normal value. This has become clear from tests done by Abraham Brouwer, professor of environmental toxicology at the Free University of Amsterdam. The concentration is the second highest ever found. (AP)
 
 
 
 
Was it the Russian secret service that was behind the poisoning?
 

Now we have a pause before the “third ballot” in the Ukraine on December 26 and I think it is good time to stop and look back at what has happened. I suspect my vision of the situation is somewhat different to the views expressed here but I do hope that I won’t be regarded as a Russian who dreams to oppress Ukrainians and keep them away from the route to the paradise (which is undoubtedly at a maximum distance from Russia)  

Frankly speaking the presidential elections in the Ukraine interested me at first no more than the colour of wallpaper at my neighbours’ living room. It used to be so until the second ballot when these elections drew attention of so many people. Unfortunately I do not observe any competition of programs and ideas, I only see a war of interests inside the Ukraine as well as outside the country. I hear lots of allegations and abuses all the time from the both sides. I wish there were some Ukrainians (preferably from both camps) here who could explain why they are going to vote for Yushchenko or Yanukovych. As to me I could only share my impressions of what Ukrainians write on some Russian-language Internet forums.

However everything and everybody have been labelled very quickly. Yushchenko who declared himself to be “democratic” and “pro-Western” immediately became a “good guy” while “pro-Russian” Yanukovych turned to a “bad guy” and I suspect this is only because one has close contacts with certain figures in the West while the other has close ties with the current Russian government. Is it such a bad thing for a presidential candidate to have strong contacts with the government of a friendly neighbouring country whose language is so widely spoken in his own country and with whom they have so much in common? And I was unpleasantly surprised to read here many posts from people who only know about the life in Ukraine from the media and readily repeat all the simplistic clichés.

I also feel a bit strange now to defend Mr.Putin here because I have never been among his supporters, but could somebody please explain to me: what crime has he committed as regards Ukraine? I think his behaviour was not at all politically correct, absolutely non-diplomatic and was simply not wise though I do not understand how it could prevent Ukrainians from expressing and implementing their will. He clearly demonstrated his preference to the voters and sent advisors to Yanukovych. So what? His two early congratulations to Yanukovych which, I guess, intended to support his protégé, were a silly thing given the dubious situation there, and I think it only damaged Putin’s own image in the Ukraine, but when I read this thread I have an impression that everybody is already expecting Russian tanks to invade Kiev and squelch the pro-Yushchenko protesters to enthrone Yanukovych. Weird! People keep talking of Russian planes full of soldiers landing in Ukranian airports, Russian riot police etc. I wonder if the Ukrainian state lacks riot police to have it imported from Russia! Putin is capable to do things which can be both cruel and stupid, but he still does not seem crazy enough to send troops to the place where just ANY outcome for them will be disgraceful. The only good option for such soldiers would be to get out of there undiscovered as soon as they can. If so, why send them there? Yet another cliché that reminds me of the cold war period: Russia is to blame for everything! When the Soviet Union seized to exist I was too naïve to think that all the nations that used to comprise it would live together in a sort of equitable union and nobody would see Russia as the only reason of their problems. Naïve I was!

I am really happy that the Ukraine proved to be a mature state and seems to sort out this very difficult situation on herself. Whoever will be their president they found a solution within the law and prevented both violence by the state towards its citizens protesting against the government that had lost its credibility and use of force by one of the conflicting sides to illegally seize the power. And I hope the constitutional reform they have adopted can consolidate their checks and balances system and will not allow any future leader to harm the nation willingly or unwillingly.
 
 
 
 
Was it the Russian secret service that was behind the poisoning?
 

"From a (chemical) fingerprint, at least you can deduce what kind of sources might have been involved," Brouwer told The Associated Press. "The labs will... try to find out whether it matches any of the batches of dioxins that are around, so that maybe you can trace it back to where it was ordered or where it came from."
 
 
 
Well, that should be interesting.

(Thanks for posting btw SerSo, its always good to hear an alternate take on things.)
 
 
What I dont get is... was their intention to kill him? Then they messed up badly... but wouldnt it have looked a little suspicious, anyway?

My working theory was that they just wanted him out of the race - like, simply sufficiently incapacitated. They cant have foreseen (whoever "they" turn out to be exactly) that he would go on campaigning like that, a tube up his spine for intravenal injection of painkillers or what was it...

But even so, they were taking quite the risk of getting caught, no? Gotten overconfident, perhaps? Or did they just fuck up? Thats the thing that still makes me doubt whether the FSB really could have been involved - I mean, I can imagine the Ukrainian secret service ****ing up like that, but the Russians?
 
 
Oh, I dunno nimh - Ivan might be a decent geopolitical chess player overall, but he screws up big-time once in a while when it comes to individual moves here and there.

I sorta think it really was an assassination attempt - really a very Russian/KGB sorta thing to try - and, after all, what was Putin's job before he got the big desk? I figure if the Russkies were behind it (and I figure they were), the thinkin' was that Yushchenko would take a few days or so to die, there's be little or no apparent connection to his last proximity to any Russians, the coroner's report would turn up nothin', dioxin bein' not only unexpected but pretty difficult to detect unless you know to look for it, and bingo! A credible opponent is outta the picture and whatever comes next can be dealt with more comfortably. I just figure they didn't figure he'd live. I also figure they're pretty well busted, and I even further figure Putin has already set in motion whatever he figures will work as far as hangin' out to dry some poor middle-level functionary on whom independent blame can credibly be placed.
 
 
It makes the most sense to me that they were trying to deal a fatal blow to his campaign rather than to his person. A hallmark of this type of poisoning is not only the incapacitation but the horrible acne and gray cast to his face. As it was, he didn't want to get a biopsy of his face because he didn't want to campaign with a bandage on his face.

Imagine if Bush went from looking like he does to a pustulent, swollen, gray-visaged, feeble apparition in the last month of his campaign. Would push all manner of buttons -- unfit to govern, unhealthy, just plain gross.
 
 
 
I also figure they're pretty well busted, and I even further figure Putin has already set in motion whatever he figures will work as far as hangin' out to dry some poor middle-level functionary on whom independent blame can credibly be placed.
 

Like after the Beslan histage-taking, when the Russian state TV proudly showed the one hostage-taker the special forces claimed to have caught... except the former hostages later said they'd never seen the guy, and it turned out he was a criminal who should have still been serving his time in prison during the hostage crisis... or was... Forced to act as scapegoat, sacrifical lamb? In exchange for, or under threat of what?
 
 
 
Well, that should be interesting.

(Thanks for posting btw SerSo, its always good to hear an alternate take on things.)
 

Nimh, I am afraid I can hardly be referenced as an advocate of the other camp. I am Russian (although of Ukrainian ancestry) and not directly involved into the events in the Ukraine. I only watch them at a closer distance and am able to hear different opinions from Ukrainians themselves. Maybe if I had been Ukrainian I would have voted for Alexander Moroz. I fully understand those Ukrainians who want changes and are deeply disappointed in the government which have been ruling the country for nearly a decade (I can even share their feelings because life in Russia and the Ukraine differs very little for the time being). They regard Yanukovych as the man who is going to keep the situation as it is and hope that Yushchenko can bring them positive changes. On the other hand Yushchenko used to be also a member of president Kuchma’s team, the same as Yanukovych who took over him later. Yushchenko supporters say that he was the first ever Ukrainian PM (since the country gained independance) who achieved economic growth and good financial indicators such as inflation rate, stability of the national currency, banking system etc. Yanukovych followers argue that their candidate achieved a more impressing growth in the economy and while Yushchenko’s financial victories were won at the expense of working people, as it was quite normal at that time for Ukrainian employers to refuse paying salaries to their employees, Yanukovych made wages grow.

As to the poisoning, I prefer to not speculate if I really know nothing. I see many other people who know no more but have already found who is to blame. If somebody wanted him to die, I also do not think they would have chosen dioxin.
 
 
 
As to the poisoning, I prefer to not speculate if I really know nothing. I see many other people who know no more but have already found who is to blame. If somebody wanted him to die, I also do not think they would have chosen dioxin.
 

 
Yushchenko Poisoned by TCDD
Yushchenko Poisoned by TCDD, the Most Harmful Known Dioxin, Scientist Says
 
 Source 
 
 
I'll see if I can find the supporting report, but the doctors said that the amounts of dioxin should have killed him about 6 times over. He shouldn't be alive.

They also said that if Yuschenko had died and been buried, his face wouldn't have gotten weird for about two or three weeks after the poisoning. So, the cause would have been assumed to have been a stomach bug or something. Had he died (as I think he was supposed to) no one would have suspected dioxin. They'd have had no reason to.

It was attempted murder.
 
 
Interesting.

Would like to see that, hadn't known the 6 times over part.

So it goes from sickly and unfit to govern, to so strong he's unkillable. Cool.
 
 
 
 
(Thanks for posting btw SerSo, its always good to hear an alternate take on things.)
 

Nimh, I am afraid I can hardly be referenced as an advocate of the other camp.
 

Note, I didnt say you were.

An "alternate take" need not mean anything more than "a different take" (webster.com: "constituting an alternative"). And you did contribute a useful, different take.

Nothing was implied about it thus necessarily representing "the other camp" or anything.

 
As to the poisoning, I prefer to not speculate if I really know nothing. I see many other people who know no more but have already found who is to blame.
 

I don't think we know "nothing". There's quite some info about the kind of poisoning, what caused it, how severe it was, et cetera - and also about how doctors who examined Yushchenko (in Vienna and Amsterdam) submit a "third party" is likely or must have been involved. We've collected a bunch of that just in this thread alone.

Of course it's important to separate findings from speculation. The Independent article I posted here about how the Russian secret service might be involved is, thus far, firmly in the corner of speculation - and that's how I explicitly presented it here as well, as interesting informed guesswork.

But I think we've gone clearly beyond the "we know nothing yet, really", by now.
 
 
I don't know if it matters to SerSo or not--but I didn't want to think Russia was the culprit. I don't think anyone here was looking for something to blame on Russia.

The new thawing of the relationship between my country and the former USSR has been very comforting to the West. Maybe we do assume the former USSR is most likely behind poisonings and clandestine murders than we should...

(But, I bet they are...)

No insult intended to you. The US was supposedly guilty of a poisoning attempt of Castro... Nobody's perfect.

I mean--who were we kidding, really? It was nice to pretend on the surface that the Cold War was over. But, who among us REALLY believed that Russia's old hardliners would be satisfied with the mess they were left with?
 
 
(Did you find the 6 times over link, Lash?)
 
 
No. I have found 6,000 times over the normal limit.

I'll keep looking around for the quote.
 
 
6000 times normal is the reported concentration level, and apparently is the second-highest confirmed dosage known. There is uncertainty as to what the 100% lethal dose might be. Dioxin of the nature and purity of that used is itself not likely to have originated outside of governmentally-overseen channels. The chemical signature of the substance discovered is consistent with a form of Dioxin Russia, among very, very few others, is known to have produced. The very sophisticated lab that produced it may have been in a basement, or anywhere else, but its extremely probable the order to use it came from pretty high up somewhere.

 
 BBC: Deadly dioxin used on Yushchenko 
Last Updated: Friday, 17 December, 2004, 19:17 GMT

Tests have revealed that the chemical used to poison Ukrainian opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko was pure TCDD, the most harmful known dioxin...

... It is a single chemical, not a mix," Prof Abraham Brouwer of the Free University in Amsterdam told the Associated Press.

"This tells us... there is no way it occurred naturally because it is so pure."

He said there were some small signs which could reveal where it was made.

Initial tests had shown the level of poison in Mr Yushchenko's blood was more than 6,000 times higher than normal - the second highest level ever recorded in humans.
 

 
 Guardian (UK): Ukrainian Rivals Campaign in Same City 

Friday December 17, 2004 8:46 PM

... Mykola Polyshchuk, a member of the parliamentary commission investigating Yushchenko's poisoning, said he could not say where the dioxin came from.

``There are certain forms of dioxins that are produced in Russia,'' he said.

A professor with Kiev's Institute of Ecological Hygiene and Toxicology, Galyna Balan, said there are no facilities in Ukraine capable of producing dioxin.

Smeshko's spokeswoman, Marina Ostapenko, declined to comment about the alleged involvement of the state security's chief in Yushchenko's poisoning.

In an interview with AP on Thursday, Yanukovych said he felt sorry for his opponent but added he did not ``want to be associated with the part of the authorities Yushchenko was talking about.''
 

 
 UPI-WP: Report: French PR firm linked to poisoning 

Kiev, Ukraine, Dec. 17 (UPI) -- The extent of an apparent plot to poison Viktor Yushchenko, Ukraine's opposition leader, and then cover up the evidence now reaches across Europe.

Yushchenko, who said he was poisoned with dioxin at a dinner with Ukraine's secret police, was found to have ingested 6,000 times the level of dioxin healthy people have, the Financial Times reported Friday.

Soon after Yushchenko first claimed he had been poisoned, President Leonid Kuchma's son-in-law engaged a French public relations team to initiate a media campaign, centered on a Vienna clinic, calculated to disparage the poisoning accusations, the newspaper said.

Yffic Nouvellon of EuroRSCG and his public relations team arranged a press conference where Lothar Wicke, general manager of Vienna's Rudolfinerhaus Clinic, contradicted Yushchenko's poisoning allegations.

Nouvellon also contacted international media offering "evidence" Yushchenko had not been poisoned. When asked during the media campaign, Nouvellon denied any connections to Kuchma's family.

The clinic's president has since cut its ties to Nouvellon and EuroRSCG and confirmed that Yushchenko was poisoned with the most powerful form of dioxin, TCDD, notorious from its use by U.S. forces in the Vietnam War in the defoliant Agent Orange, Sky News said.
 

It seems more and more that The Russian Connection waddles, quacks, and has feathers.....

Oh, and pardon the French Dressing - I'm sure that angle ain't there, other than as incidental to the real question, as related above in the context of dosage and purity.
 
 
 
They also said that if Yuschenko had died and been buried, his face wouldn't have gotten weird for about two or three weeks after the poisoning. So, the cause would have been assumed to have been a stomach bug or something. Had he died (as I think he was supposed to) no one would have suspected dioxin. They'd have had no reason to.
 

Thought this was enlightening, and yup, found it back (coincidentally) in today's The Times (I was having tea in Polmans...):

 
[..] several top toxicologists said they believed the dioxin was the compound 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo-p-dioxin or "TCDD" - a component of Agent Orange, the defoliant used by the United States in the Vietnam War. "It's the best known and it's pretty toxic. In the old Soviet Union, they would have studied these chemicals in detail. They may well know more about the acute effects of dioxin poisoning than we do," said Dr John Henry, one of Britian's top toxicologists.

Since acute dioxin poisoning was almost unheard of in the West, nobody would have recognised the symptoms and tested for dioxin had Mr Yushchenko died, he said.
 

The report also notes that "doctors confirmed that Mr Yushchenko was poisoned with dioxon, probably given to him in a creamy soup". We should know who supplied it soon enough:

 
Yesterday's results could reveal exactly where the dioxin came from by identifying the isomers of the chemicals used, Dr Henry said. "You could pinpoint it to a certain country, even a certain laboratory," he said. The results will be handed to Ukrainian prosecutors and lawmakers who have reopened an investigation.
 

For now, however, it appears to be Yushchenko himself who is sitting on the information. The head of one of the three laboratories that has identified the (same) dioxin "refused to reveal the name":

 
"The results match very well. They are definite," he said. "We just need to know what the family wants us to do.

He said Mr Yushchenko's wife had called Michael Zimpfer, the head of the Rudolfinerhaus clinic in Vienna where her husband was treated, to ask that the results be kept secret until after the election.
 

Yet even while Yushchenko "has forbidden [the medical experts] from revealing the results to avoid influencing the repeat of his presidential run-off", according to the article, he also "said for the first time that he was sure he was poisoned at a dinner with the head of the Ukrainian Security Sevice, Igor Smeshko [..] the night he fell ill."

Thats a bit weird - keep the data a secret so as not to influence the election, but in the meantime assert the identity of who did it?

All quotes from "Yushchenko guards secret ingredient of his poison soup", by Jeremy Page.
 
 
Thats a bit weird - keep the data a secret so as not to influence the election, but in the meantime assert the identity of who did it?
----------
Trying to guess a good motive. Way odd.
 
 
 
Did this stuff get posted here already?

It's from Salon.com (and you have to pay - so no url will help.

"AP: Yushchenko shows record Dioxin level

By Emma Ross

Dec. 15, 2004 | London -- New tests reveal Ukrainian presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko's blood contains the second-highest level of dioxin poisoning ever recorded in a human -- more than 6,000 times the normal concentration, according to the expert analyzing the samples.

Abraham Brouwer, professor of environmental toxicology at the Free University in Amsterdam, where the blood samples were sent for analysis, said they contained about 100,000 units of dioxin per gram of blood fat.

However, the concentration could prove to be even higher, or lower, once results are in later this week from a more definitive test, said Arnold Schechter, a specialist in dioxin analysis from the University of Texas Southwestern Medical Center in Dallas.

 

This may be the source for Lash's misquote.

6,000 times the NORMAL concentration of dioxin in human blood - nothing about what the fatal amount is.

The person who had more than Yuschenko is still walking around, too.
 
 
It must be, because I can't find 6 times over...
 
 
 
Thats a bit weird - keep the data a secret so as not to influence the election, but in the meantime assert the identity of who did it?
----------
Trying to guess a good motive. Way odd.
 

Hmmm - mebbe its signature was neither Russian, nor likely to have been in hi sopponents' hands - without supply from another source entirely???
 
 
A jealous wannabe in his inner circle?
 
 
<shrugs> Or it could be "the fog of war", so to say... its a chaotic time, wouldnt be the first time that Yushchenko or his campaign is going one direction one moment, another the next...

It could even be the article itself - in the intro it has the bit where it says he "has forbidden [the medical experts] from revealing the results", but further down the only specifics we get is that of the Amsterdam researcher saying that Yushchenko's wife called the Viennese researcher to say not to release it... hearsay...

Still, if they do know so specifically, I dont see why Yushchenko shouldnt give the green light. The 'not wanting to influence the election' bit seems a bit weak, seeing how he's himself already publicly 'outing' the perpetrators (and besides, wouldnt it be one of those things you'd want to know before making your choice on who to vote for?)

My guess: the details will indeed be released before the election, and what we're seeing now is just random dissonance from day to day.
 
 
Could be, indeed.
 
 
 
Ukraine Activists Rethink Travel Plans
 
source: AP via  Yahoo! 
 
 
Talked to a friend whose daughter is there right now!!!!! Amazing feeling!!!!!!!!
 
 
 
Ukraine rivals clash in TV debate

Rival presidential candidates in Ukraine have clashed in a live TV debate - days before Sunday's re-run of the disputed election.
Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych, whose victory last month was declared illegal because of fraud, was facing opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko.

Mr Yushchenko, opening the debate, accused the authorities of rigging the original election against him.

Mr Yanukovych denied the claims, urging Mr Yushchenko to begin a dialogue.

Following the disputed election on 21 November the country was gripped by a political crisis, with hundreds of thousands of protesters on the streets of the capital Kiev.
Ukraine's Supreme Court ordered a re-run of the second round of voting.

Since then campaigning has been bitter, with both sides trading personal insults.

A convoy of Mr Yushchenko's supporters has been moving deeper into eastern areas which have shown strong support for his rival.

Meanwhile, Ukraine promises to be high on the agenda at talks between Russian President Vladimir Putin and German Chancellor Gerhard Schroeder in the German city of Hamburg.

Correspondents say both sides are keen to play down differences over the crisis.

Mr Putin originally backed Mr Yanukovych's candidacy and recognised his victory, but later accepted the need for a re-run of the poll.

Trading accusations

West-leaning Mr Yushchenko opened the 100-minute debate which was shown live on Ukraine's state television.

He said some 3.1 million votes were stolen by the authorities during the original run-off.

"They had tried to steal our future," Mr Yushchenko said.

Mr Yushchenko also praised hundreds of thousands of his supporters who took to the streets to protest over the disputed vote.

In his opening remarks, Moscow-backed Mr Yanukovych - speaking in Russian and later switching to Ukrainian - denied that he was the pro-government candidate.

Instead, he accused outgoing President Leonid Kuchma of uniting with "representatives of the orange coup" to act against the interests of the people.

And in an almost direct reference to President Kuchma, Mr Yanukovych called on Mr Yushchenko to begin a dialogue to prevent what he described as "the old powers" from dictating their will.
"Do you agree to calmly sit down together with me before the poll and agree how do we live after the poll?" Mr Yanukovych asked, saying he wanted to avoid any splits and clashes.

The debate sometimes looked like a shouting match as the rivals interrupted each other to trade accusations.

However, after the closing statements they shook hands.

Given the high level of interest in the election, TV sets showed the debate in many bars and public places.
Interest in the election was further heightened earlier this month, when doctors confirmed that Mr Yushchenko's mysterious illness in September was caused by poisoning.

Tests revealed that a huge dose of dioxin had been used, leaving the candidate's face disfigured.
 
 Source 
 
 
 
Ukraine separatists given Russian arms, warns opposition

By Askold Krushelnycky in Kiev
22 December 2004

Fears are mounting that Boxing Day elections in Ukraine will be wrecked by an orchestrated campaign of violence after reports that pro-government "thugs" were being supplied with weaponry from a Russian naval base in Crimea.

Hryhoriy Omelchenko, an opposition MP, claims to have evidence that up to 300 AK-47 automatic rifles, as well as grenades and explosives, have been handed over to groups linked to separatist politicians in eastern Ukraine.

A spokesman for the Russian Black Sea fleet, based in the Ukrainian peninsula of Sevastopol, denied the allegations.

Mr Omelchenko, a former Soviet-era KGB officer who also served as a colonel in the Ukrainian intelligence service after independence, said he received his information from serving officers. "The intention is to use bloodshed to disrupt the election so badly that it is declared invalid," he told The Independent. Separatist politicians in east Ukraine threatened to declare the region autonomous and create "self- defence units" after the presidential election victory of their Kremlin-backed candidate, Viktor Yanukovych, the Prime Minister, was quashed and a new election ordered.

"[After the violence] they will argue that any new election should have neither [Viktor] Yushchenko nor Yanukovych as candidates and fix it for one of their people to win," he said.

Mr Omelchenko, the deputy chief of the parliamentary committee on organised crime and corruption, said the plan calls for police officers loyal to Mr Yanukovych from his eastern Ukrainian fiefdom of Donetsk, to lead "small groups of criminals" given guarantees of immunity.

"They will be in civilian cars, in convoys of about 10 cars with five people in each one," he said. "Their job will be to cause as much violence and mayhem as possible so the government declares the election invalid.

"I hope that if these people know their plans are no longer secret they will think twice about them and they will throw all these weapons down a well or an old mine shaft."

Volodymyr Lytvyn, the speaker of the parliament, said parliament would ask the prosecutor general's office and the SBU (Security Service of Ukraine) to investigate.

The pro-Western opposition leader, Mr Yushchenko, advocates Nato and European Union membership, and Vladimir Putin, Russia's President, has worked hard to prevent him becoming president.

Mr Putin visited Ukraine on the eve of both previous presidential election rounds, in October and November, to boost Mr Yanukovych's popularity among Ukraine's large Russian ethnic minority, and has been chastised by the West for unseemly interference.

There have also been reports that Russian special forces have been present in the country. Many of Mr Yushchenko's colleagues suspect Russia was involved in the poisoning, last September, of the opposition leader, which left him hideously scarred.

The opposition claims that as part of the scheme to use violence, the government has attempted to replace the chief of the civilian and paramilitary police in Kiev, the capital, with Vladimir Vorobyov, a general from Donetsk.

Yuriy Pavlenko, an opposition MP and Yushchenko ally, said government plans to unleash heavily armed paramilitary forces against pro-democracy protesters last month were only blocked by senior Kiev police officers who vowed to defend the protesters. He said the same people foiled the attempt to install General Vorobyov at a meeting last Friday night. Mr Pavlenko said: "I think they want bloodshed to start and for the police and special forces to stand by initially, and then to go in and attack the opposition supporters under the pretext of restoring peace."

The MP said that as part of an opposition compromise with the government last month, Leonid Kuchma, the outgoing President, was to fire the Minister for Internal Affairs, Mykola Bilokon, who has been accused of colluding in massive electoral fraud and of abusing his powers on many other occasions. Instead he was allowed to take leave. Mr Pavlenko believes General Bilokon may soon be reinstated.

"General Bilokon has proved in the past that he is ruthless and he knows that if Mr Yushchenko becomes president, he will be prosecuted. He has nothing to lose and the danger is that many of these people feel they have nothing to lose," Mr Pavlenko said.
 
 Source 
 
 
 
 
Ukraine separatists given Russian arms, warns opposition

 
 Source 
 

Another biased article thoughtlessly repeating the pre-election propaganda going from one side. Nonetheless it is very interesting as an example. There is so much hostility and unfounded accusations to their opponents that I am afraid it will be difficult for them to establish any acceptable level of relations with their current rivals after the elections. Lots of details are given to convince the reader that all this could be true. They even claim to know the number and type of guns "evil Russians" distributed among the "thugs" from the East. (AK-47 is an old type of Kalashnikov assault rifle of 7.42mm gauge. Where are they going to find a sufficient number of cartridges for them? The type the Russian army is equipped with is AK-74 of 5.45 gauge). Unfortunately the propaganda from the other side is no better: Yushchenko is called a nazi who is planning to deprive Russian orthodox believers of their churches, pays respect to SS veterans etc.
 
 
Well, SerSo, actually this article reports, quotes even the sources.

So, why do you think it is biased?

And by "another biased article" - are you referring to The Independent in totaliter or only to their reports about the Ukraine?
 
 
 
Well, SerSo, actually this article reports, quotes even the sources.

So, why do you think it is biased?

And by "another biased article" - are you referring to The Independent in totaliter or only to their reports about the Ukraine?
 

I am not referring to The Independent only. When I say “another biased article” I mean a whole series of suchlike reports from the Ukraine I have read. Unfortunately it would be extremely time consuming for me to go back and find all the links, sorry. But I will try to explain what I consider to be biased and why. For example: It looks like this article only recites sources in the Ukraine, but they know what sources to choose. If somebody reads a succession of such reports, he or she could think that all those who oppose Yushchenko are either gangsters or Russians who want the Ukraine to become a Russian province. Only one side’s point of view is valued, the other opinion is at best mentioned in one line, if not ignored at all. Unfortunately most references in this thread are of this sort. If somebody would like to understand the whole range of opinions existing in the Ukraine, this kind of reports is not the best way to do it. Fortunately I can read some Internet forums where different people from the Ukraine express their thoughts, and it helps me to understand the point of view of both parties there. Alas, I am not able to translate all this stuff into English and post here. But if the media chooses only one hero, and only his opinion is made the public domain with all allegations (even unfounded ones) he makes when speaking of the other side, I see such reports as one-legged, biased and at least non-professional. Unfortunately I am too familiar with this practice because all elections in Russia are accompanied by extremely biased media coverage. Life is not a piece of fiction where all characters are either good guys or villains, on the contrary it consists of real interests and different opinions, and each of them has certain reasons and is valuable.
 
 
Well, if there werent persuasive precedents, SerSo, it would be easier to dismiss stories like Omelchenko's, which might or might not turn out to just be political bravado.

I'm thinking, for example, of how the Russian army base in Moldova, then Lebed's fiefdom, furnished the Transnistrian separatists with arms and logistical support once the Moldovan nationalists got in a first election victory.

With such precedents, it's not strange that people are wary of such scenarios now.
 
 
But, for that matter, the Yanukovich supporters are not, in the papers here, described merely as Russians or gangsters - just so you know.

It's true that I've yet to see the first article that reports positively on the East-Ukrainian political leaders, but the supporters have been described in various reports (both from places like Donetsk and from the minority pro-Yanukovych rallies in Kiev) as people who just want stability, who appreciate the way Yanukovich has ensured prosperity for their region over the past years, who are loyal to their region's leader. People who are afraid of Ukrainian nationalism, and/or who say - "we've had turmoil and change for so long, the economy went down the drain - now we almost had achieved a certain stability, and these (Orange) people want to start changing everything again!". Better take a step in place and consolidate, was their take.

The reports from the Kiev rally also noted, by the way, how "orange" demonstrators - mostly students, cityfolk - mingled with the "blue-white" ones and started enthusiastically debating with them, with the different folks arguing, discussing, having a drink together, agreeing that there should be no bloodshed, then disagreeing again under whose leadership... all peacefully if agitatedly.

That was in the Dutch newspapers, anyway, alongside the enthused reports from the "orange revolution".

So perhaps not all that one-sided, after all... if not falling for the "they're both equally bad/unrepresentative/whatever" trap either.
 
 
When you look at The Guardian or The Independent coverage for the Ukraine (same for the BBC and e.g. most German papers), you'll certainly find as well what nimh described above.

However, German papers point the last two days especially at the discrepancy about what Putin said here durinmg his visit this week and happened/happens now.
 
 
Ukraine's Supreme Court has voided as unconstitutional part of the electoral reform package approved earlier this month by the Ukrainian parliament, just one day before the country re-runs its presidential election, the results of which were voided by the high court on grounds of fraud. This time the court struck down a provision limiting voting from home, which had been challenged by supporters of Ukrainian Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych as discriminating against the disabled and housebound. The International Labor Organization estimates that Ukraine's disabled population runs to approximately 8 million, or 14% of the population, a rate twice that of other industralized countries due to injuries from coal-mining (largely in eastern Ukraine, Yanukovych's base), the Soviet war in Afghanistan in the 1980s, and the Chernobyl nuclar disaster.

 
Ukraine's Constitutional Court says restrictions on home voting violate constitution; election to go on

Dec 25

KYIV (AP) - Ukraine's Constitutional Court ruled on Dec. 25 that parts of recent legislation restricting the voting rights of homebound people violate the country's constitution, clouding the presidential rerun vote one day before ballots were to be cast.

The decision by Ukraine's highest court won't delay Sunday's vote, but creates a headache for the Central Election Commission, which is required by law to implement the ruling, but has less than 24 hours to do so.

"We will fulfill the decision of the Constitutional Court," said Yaroslav Davydovych, head of the Central Election Commission. "We don't have another alternative. The vote must be held."

Supporters of opposition presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko had pushed for the restrictions saying they are necessary to prevent a repeat of the vote fraud that marred the Nov. 21 presidential runoff.

Ukraine's Supreme Court invalidated the results of the November vote, canceling the victory of Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych and ordering a new ballot on Dec. 26.

The Constitutional Court said in its ruling that the restrictions allowing only people with the most severe disabilities to vote at home were unconstitutional and must be lifted immediately.

It ordered the Central Election Commission to act immediately to implement its decision.

The move could benefit Yanukovych, who pushed for lifting the restrictions, saying they will deprive millions of their right to vote.

The United Nation's International Labor Organization website estimates that 14 percent of Ukraine's population, or about 8 million people, are disabled, which is twice the average of industrialized countries. According to the ILO, veterans of the Soviet Union's war in Afghanistan, the 1986 Chernobyl disaster, and the high number of accidents at coal mines in eastern regions of the country account for the high figures.

Nestor Shufrych, a lawmaker and Yanukovych ally, said the court's ruling would affect about 3 million people. He said Ukrainians who qualify have until 8 p.m. (1800 GMT) Saturday to notify their local election precinct that they want to vote at home.

However, it appeared unlikely that the cash-strapped Ukrainian government would be able to solve the major logistical problem of preparing those people to vote at the last minute.

That could become a basis for legal challenges to the election results.

"Of course, if one side or another is not pleased with the results of the vote, they will appeal on the basis of the Constitutional Court's decision," Shufrych said.

Yushchenko's spokeswoman, Iryna Herashchenko, insisted the ruling wouldn't harm the opposition leader's chances. "The decision of the court will not disrupt the election," she said.

Markian Bilinskyi, an analyst with the Kiev-based U.S.-Ukraine Foundation, said the ruling could "open a window for a substantial number of appeals."

"Depending on the margin between the two candidates, I think it gives ground for Yanukovych's people to question the legitimacy of the vote," Bilinskyi said. "It's a scorched earth tactic - to make sure Yushchenko does not get to the presidency if Yanukovych cannot win."

Yushchenko is considered the front-runner, with most poll results showing him easily defeating his rival, who was severely weakened by the court's annulment of his victory and massive opposition protests.

The Constitutional Court only began considering Yanukovych's appeal of the home-voting restrictions on Dec. 24, and it had not been expected to deliver a ruling so quickly.

A court official said the ruling would add legitimacy to the result of Sunday's vote.

"No one will ever be able to say that the president was elected illegitimately and illegally. It would have been a lot worse if we took the decision after the election," court chairman Mykola Selivon said.

Ihor Zdanov, a political analyst with Kyiv's Razumkov think tank, said the decision was not a victory for Yanukovych because it gives him too little time to react and the court upheld the other election law changes, making it more difficult to challenge the winner's victory in the courts.

Parliament passed the changes as part of a package deal that included political reforms initiated by allies of outgoing President Leonid Kuchma.

The court ruling didn't affect other parts of the deal. However, Yushchenko warned Dec. 24 that if his opponents sought to thwart part of the deal, his backers wouldn't hesitate to challenge the rest of the package, in particular reforms that weakened presidential power.

Tension is running high in Ukraine ahead of Sunday's vote, amid fears of violence. Police have pledged to maintain law and order during the rerun.

In a Friday night address to the nation, Kuchma - who has largely abandoned Yanukovych, his former protege - accused both candidates of turning the campaign bitter.

"Both sides succumbed to the temptation to attribute to oneself only glory and to accuse one's political rival of all sins, both unintentional and fictitious," Kuchma said.

"We must prove to ourselves and to the world that we are able honestly and without fear elect the person whom we consider the best, despite any pressure."

The vote will be monitored by 12,187 foreign observers from 43 international organizations and 31 countries.

Russia's fiery nationalist politician, Vladimir Zhirinovsky, was denied accreditation to help monitor the vote after missing the deadline by 24 hours, CEC's Davydovych said.
 
source:  Kyiv Post 
 
 
 
[..]It's true that I've yet to see the first article that reports positively on the East-Ukrainian political leaders [..]
 

This is what I was writing about.

At least, I think, good for them that they called for a peaceful settlement and dialogue, and being in power they never attempted to use violence against the protesters. It was known in advance that there would be protests if Yanukovych were declared a winner, and they had enough time to prepare all their riot police in order to prevent mass gatherings from the very beginning. Instead of it huge quantities of police forces were mobilized to protect all government buildings from intrusion (they feared the same scenario that had been earlier in Serbia and Georgia). I would call this reaction very moderate. Before the elections Yanukovych declared that he would recognize Yushchenko’s victory if it were the people’s choice and after the second ballot he affirmed he did not need a fake win. He also said that he felt sorry for his opponent to have been poisoned. Unfortunately Yushchenko’s team appeared to be much less tolerant. Before the voting they claimed that they actually had overwhelming popular support but the official results would be undoubtedly fraudulent, and under these circumstances those who made manipulations in favour of Yanukovych did him really ill service. If I were convinced that my candidate had been robbed of votes I would also go to protest. But Yulia Timoshenko’s numerous appeals to the protesters (and before the ranks of riot police) to take the power by any means – are not they simply acts of provocation? And were Kuchma’s pre-election fears so needless, especially given Yushchenko’s attempt to take the oath of office before the parliament at the same time? Fortunately Mr.Lytvyn, the parliamentary speaker, hastily announced the sitting to be over, what made the oath merely symbolic.

I am writing all this in order to make you try to view the situation from another point. Eventually it is up to the Ukrainian people to decide at the tomorrow’s run-off who will deserve to be their leader, and I hope their new president will be fully legitimate. However I strongly believe that democracy is the approach to solving problems fairly and without ignoring minority’s interests. I am afraid the situation of the recent weeks made me doubt that Mr.Yushchenko is a true democrat irrespective of how much democratic and pro-western he declares himself. Whom he reminds me most is Mr.Yeltsin (the first Russian president of the post-soviet period), who used to be very popular for his determination to fight all the inequities of the Soviet system. In words he proclaimed freedom and democracy, became very friendly to the West and never stopped to use force against opponents, interpreting the law very freely and changing it at his own discretion. The current situation in Kiev seems to me very similar to that in Moscow in 1991.

 
[..][Yanukovych] supporters have been described in various reports (both from places like Donetsk and from the minority pro-Yanukovych rallies in Kiev) as people who just want stability, who appreciate the way Yanukovich has ensured prosperity for their region over the past years, who are loyal to their region's leader. People who are afraid of Ukrainian nationalism, and/or who say - "we've had turmoil and change for so long, the economy went down the drain - now we almost had achieved a certain stability, and these (Orange) people want to start changing everything again!". Better take a step in place and consolidate, was their take.[..]
 

 
When you look at The Guardian or The Independent coverage for the Ukraine (same for the BBC and e.g. most German papers), you'll certainly find as well what nimh described above.[..]
 

I am really happy to hear this. Maybe my reaction was excessively emotional, it was mostly because I read too many one-sided reports lacking any thoughtful analysis and always blaming some evil forces in Russia. I hope the opinion of those who decided to back Yanukovych received the same detailed coverage as the actions and demands by Yushchenko’s supporters. BTW I do not think it was easy in a situation where the "orange" took to the streets and the "white and blue" remained more passive. But good journalism does not mean taking only what is on the surface.
 
 
 
Well, if there werent persuasive precedents, SerSo, it would be easier to dismiss stories like Omelchenko's, which might or might not turn out to just be political bravado.

I'm thinking, for example, of how the Russian army base in Moldova, then Lebed's fiefdom, furnished the Transnistrian separatists with arms and logistical support once the Moldovan nationalists got in a first election victory.

With such precedents, it's not strange that people are wary of such scenarios now.
 

At first sight the conflict in Transdniestria has nothing to do with the current situation in the Ukraine. But it is a good illustration of what may happen (Lord forbid!) if political opponents are too determined to achieve their goals. Unfortunately your words only prove how biased information can simplify and misinterpret complex and dangerous situations. As far as I know the former Soviet military depots in the Transdniestrian region used to be robbed by both sides in 1992 and when general Lebed was nominated in charge of what remained of the 14-th Soviet army he ordered to bring down fire on anyone who would attempt to intrude. Before it the officers simply did not know to which army they belonged and whose orders they had to obey. This conflict blazed up just when my fellow students were there on holiday and they told me much how everything started to happen. Unfortunately it was another conflict where the reluctance to hear "the other side" resulted in bloodshed. The central government in Chisinau was then controlled by the Popular Front of Moldova and declared their intention to re-unite with Romania. The first thing they did was a ban on the use of the Russian language. Many people in Transdniestria started to protest, because the region, unlike the rest of Moldavia, never belonged to Romania and had a mixed population. Many people simply did not know Romanian. In answer to these anti-Romanian rallies the government obliged the industrial managers there to immediately translate all technical documentation into Romanian and ordered a mobilization of volunteers to send them to Transdniestria and make people there obey orders from Chisinau. In the same areas there were police stations loyal to the nationalist government in Chisinau and those loyal to the local authorities in Tiraspol, who declared independence under a slogan: "If you want to go to Romania, go there without us!" Both sides were already heavily armed, unfortunately. After some very bloody clashes (can you imagine what bloody clashes are?) general Lebed announced that he would not allow any more bloodshed and was going to stop anybody who would try to shoot. The people from Tiraspol understood it as some kind of support to them because they did not plan to attack, they wanted to separate. Chisinau did not took it seriously first because the Russian military used to observe all the past clashes with indifference. But at another attempt by Moldavian volunteers to shell a Transdniestrian city Lebed commanded his artillery to fire. Since then the "hot" war was stopped. Regrettably the ceasefire was not followed by any fruitful dialogue. Until now they only exchange ultimatums and remain separated. The Moldavian government is now controlled by communists who rejected the idea of unification with Romania. The regime is rather liberal but the country is poor with nearly all industries left over Dniester and almost all energy imported from their enemy in Tiraspol. Most income in their economy originates from the export of wines mainly to Russia and the Ukraine. Transdniestria is governed by the same warlords who used to beat back Moldavian volunteers in 1992 (do not think their regime is very liberal). The area is very poor and most their plants and factories have been bought up by Russian "oligarchs". Who has won? Hotheads in the Ukraine and everywhere, behold and beware!
 
 
The Earthquake/Tsunami has sort of pushed the Ukraine out of the spotlight.

(Terrible over there, BTW)

But, look.

----------
All Exit Polls Give Yushchenko Major Lead

29 minutes ago Top Stories - AP

KIEV, Ukraine - All three exit polls tracking Sunday's presidential rematch in Ukraine projected opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko as the winner by a large margin over Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych.

The government -sponsored Ukrainian Institute of Social Research and Social Monitoring Center showed Yushchenko winning with 58.1 percent of the vote to 38.4 percent for Yanukovych. The margin of error was 2 percentage points.

The poll sampled 13,500 voters with face-to-face interviews at 360 polling stations throughout Ukraine. The survey was sponsored by nine state academic organizations, including sociologists' associations and six universities.

The Razumkov Center of Political Studies and Kiev International Institute of Sociology showed Yushchenko winning with 56.5 percent and Yanukovych collecting 41.3 percent of the vote. A margin of error was not provided.

The Razumkov poll surveyed some 30,000 voters in 360 polling stations using anonymous questionnaires. The center receives funding from numerous Western institutions including NATO (news - web sites), the United Nations (news - web sites) and the Soros Foundation.

A third exit poll, by Frank Luntz, a pollster for the U.S. Republican Party, and Douglas Schoen, of the Washington-based market research company Penn, Schoen & Berland, showed Yushchenko winning with 56 to Yanukovych's 41 percent, Schoen said. The margin of error was 2 percent points.

The latter poll surveyed about 10,000 voters on behalf of Ukraine's ICTV television, which is owned by outgoing President Leonid Kuchma's son-in-law Viktor Pinchuk.

Exit polls during the first two rounds of the election showed widely varying results, prompting questions about their validity.
 
 
Interfax-Ukraine published the following nearly 1 1/2 hours ago - no other results since then.

 
KYIV. Dec 26 (Interfax-Ukraine) - Exit polls indicate that Viktor Yushchenko has collected over 10% of ballots than his rival Viktor Yanukovych in the Sunday presidential runoff in Ukraine.

According to a poll taken by Sotsmonitoring,Yushchenko collected 58.1% of the vote and Yanukovych 38.4%, according to a poll of the Razumkov Center, 56.5% and 41.3% respectively and according to an Interfax poll, 53.0% and 41.3% respectively.

In addition in an exit poll conducted by U.S. Luntz Research Company for ICTV Yushchenko got 56% of the vote and Yanukovych 41%. [UA EUROPE EEU EMRG POL VOTE] ml
 

And from the Bulgarian newsagency:

 
Kiev. Pro-Russian candidate for President of Ukraine Victor Yanukovych did not recognize his loss at the Presidential elections in the country despite exit poll results after the end of the Election Day, AFP reported.
 
 Source 
 
 
I wonder what Putin's going to say?
 
 
 
I wonder what Putin's going to say?
 

Following the meeting with Schröder last week in Germany, Putin said, Russia does not have a problem with any of the leaders running for president in Ukraine.

You think, he changed his view by now?
 
 
According to Interfax [3 minutes ago], after counting 1.77% of the votes at the second round of the Ukrainian presidential elections, the central elections Commission reported that Viktor Yushchenko has 71.11% of the votes while Viktor Yanukovych has 25.6%.

This strengthens earlier reports, when even less votes had been counted.
 
 
KYIV. Dec 26 (Interfax) - After counting 9.68% of the votes at the second round of the Ukrainian presidential elections, the central elections Commission reported that Viktor Yushchenko has 61.4% of the votes while Viktor Yanukovych has 35.22%.
 
 
 
At first sight the conflict in Transdniestria has nothing to do with the current situation in the Ukraine. But it is a good illustration of what may happen (Lord forbid!) if political opponents are too determined to achieve their goals. Unfortunately your words only prove how biased information can simplify and misinterpret complex and dangerous situations.
 

SerSo

It is your take on Moldova/Transnistria that exemplifies as well as any how biased information can indeed, to lend your phrase, "simplify and misinterpret complex and dangerous situations".

It is rife with misinformation, but as such I assume it merely represents the take that was generally presented on the situation in Russian media. Yet that lends a certain irony to your off-hand dismissal that takes from outside Russia that you don't agree with (about a country that's as close to Austria as it is to Russia), must just be "biased".

The 14th army had "leaked" arms, many thousands of them, quite specifically - and logically enough - to the side in the conflict that was explicitly sympathetic to the Russian state and the region's Russian minorities. It assisted in instructing the Transnistrian troops. Hell - in December 1991, the 14th army's chief commander, General Gennadi Iakolev, accepted the position of Transnistrian defense minister! The 14th army actually involved itself in the fighting in Bendery in 1992, with witnesses testifying it to have sided unequivocally with the Transnistrian militias when the Moldovan army appeared to take back the city, instantly reversing the course of the fight and ensuring Transnistrian victory.

The 14th army also continued to provide the Transnistrian regime with logistical support after Lebed installed himself there. Lebed himself, who used his position in that outpost bulwark of the Russian army to make a name for himself as one of Russia's most prolific nationalist politicians, made it no secret whose side he was on.

Without the support of the Russian bases, the forces that took over Transnistria in name of a Russian and Ukrainian population that even on the Dnyestr's leftbank only ever constituted just the barest of majorities, would never have succeeded in doing so.

You fail to mention that "the central government in Chisinau [which] was then controlled by the Popular Front of Moldova" was also the first democratically elected government of the republic. Unlike Smirnov's regime in Transnistria, which never in its existence held demoratic elections and has in fact consistently and violently repressed its dissenters, imprisoning and torturing several.

Where you write that "The first thing [the Popular Front government] did was a ban on the use of the Russian language", you are plainly wrong. The PF government never "banned" the Russian language. The whole issue focused on declaring Romanian/Moldovan the state language. This did indeed make the Russian minority, which of course in Soviet times was never granted much opportunity or incentive to learn the majority language of the republic, very uneasy - the same it did in Latvia or Estonia. But by speaking of Russian being "banned" you conjure up scenarios in which people were no longer allowed to speak or use it. That's nonsense. The "worst" that was done was the resolution that in ten years time, all civil servants would need to be able to speak Romanian.

Your representation of the maverick General Lebed (who was long considered one of the main figureheads of nationalist opposition to Yeltsin, before his 11th hour sell-out in the 1996 presidential elections) as some sort of neutral, fair broker in the conflict is hard to imagine for any non-Russian. He defied both the Russian government and the various international diplomatic solutions that were in fact negotiated with great trouble by his refusal to live by their rules.

(In spite of your assertion that nothing was done but the "exchange of ultimatums", different diplomatic solutions were in fact arrived at, thanks to eg OSCE involvement. But one of the things they time and again eventually collapsed upon is the consistent refusal of the Russian government to withdraw its troops according to the agreements it had previously committed itself to.)

The current communist government of Moldova does indeed reject the idea of unification with Romania, as does, indeed, most of the opposition now (barring the Christian-Democrats). In fact, the idea of reunification (even if it was a natural enough one to come up in the wake of independence, since Moldova had after all simply been occupied and annexed by the Soviet Union in WW2) was shelved long before. You fail to mention how there were goverments in between the Popular Front one and the current Communist one, of centrist hues, which had already long made clear that unification was off the agenda. In fact, already in 1994, voters in Moldova proper overwhelmingly voted to retain an independent Moldova in its 1990 borders in a referendum. The same year, the Constitution was adapted in order to reinstate the notion, formulated in Stalin's times, that "Moldovan" is a separate language from Romanian. The "threat of unification" card was thus invalidated a long time ago as a justification for Smirnov's Transnistrian fiefdom.

The current communist government of Moldova proper is hardly "rather liberal" itself - it is one of the most frequent offenders of European human rights agreements. "Liberal" it would only be in comparison with Byelorussia or, of course, the Transnistrian outlaw regime, a dictatorially ruled enclave recognized by not a single country in the world.

 
Who has won? Hotheads in the Ukraine and everywhere, behold and beware!
 

Basically, you are here blaming a democratically elected government that, in the wake of independence, decided that the majority language rather than that of the erstwhile occupiers should be the language of government, for a violent, separatist insurrection, facilitated by the Russian army's covert support.

You are blaming the "hotheads" who dared want to realise the political programme they were elected in on by a persuasive majority for what, on the Dnyestr's left bank, rapidly devolved into a insurrectionist gangster's paradise.

In this, you - unconsciously perhaps - neatly represent the Russian state's strategy on what it likes to call "the near abroad" since the Soviet Union's dissolution. Destabilise nascent democratic, independent-minded governments by encouraging or arming rebel separatist groups (eg Abchazia), then insist on keeping an extensive military presence in the country to guarantee "stability".
 
 
 
 
I wonder what Putin's going to say?
 

Following the meeting with Schröder last week in Germany, Putin said, Russia does not have a problem with any of the leaders running for president in Ukraine.

You think, he changed his view by now?
 

I guess another question would be--do you take Putin at face value re Ukraine?

O'Bill--

I would imagine there will be an investigation about Russia's possible guilt in the voter fraud that marred the last election. That being, I doubt Putin would make any comment that may make him appear as if he had a dog in this fight.
 
 
 
I would imagine there will be an investigation about Russia's possible guilt in the voter fraud that marred the last election. That being, I doubt Putin would make any comment that may make him appear as if he had a dog in this fight.
 

Just your idea or do you have any information on this?

(The Ukrainian Prosecutor General's Office has initiated a criminal case of abuse of office by members of the Central Elections Commission already, but against Russia?)
 
 
Basic common sense.

FACT--
There was widespread fraud in the last Ukraine election.
REASONABLE OPINION--
There will likely be an inquiry into who took part in the fraud.
FACT--
Widespread speculation points to Putin as having had a hand in it.
REASONABLE OPINION--
Knowing he is suspect, Putin will not make public statements making himself look more guilty that he already appears.

Do you have information or an opinion that refutes any of these statements?
 
 
 
Do you have information or an opinion that refutes any of these statements?
 

Well, besides that the new General Prosecutor is just a short time in office (although he hold it before as well), I'm not that sure about the possibilities in the Ukrainian law regarding the prosecution of a foreign head of state.

Interesting opinion, though, Lash - I might be wrong, but I've heard that the USA (resp. US-agencies) had had quite some times theirs hands in some elections...
 
 
I don't think Putin's Russia actually had the means to involve itself in the massive voter fraud that was committed in the last round of Ukrainian elections. Logistically rather unfeasible (it's harder to enter the country to arrange a million false ballots without being noticed than to, say, hand-deliver an ampule of poison or something).

That said, it may well have encouraged the Ukrainian government in its intentions to commit fraud, or have it be known that it would not object, or something of the sort.
 
 
Serso,

I read your posts with interests and note the consistency and reasonableness of the views you expressed. Unfortunately we don't get enough of that perspective in our news reporting, The "Orange" movement in Ukraine has captured the imagination of the West. Many see in them the expression of their own political hopes and aspirations. That may or may not be true. Many initially attractive political movements were initially seen as similarly attractive an hopeful, including that of Fidel Castro and, as you pointed out, Boris Yeltsin. Others have lived up to their promises. Initial reports of the election so far suggest an Ortange victory. If so I will hope for the best.

It would be unfortunate if the European movement now underway ends up alienating both the United States and Russia. History is not yet over. We have merely seen the end of the chapter that opened in August 1914. We can only guess what will follow.
 
 
 
I might be wrong, but I've heard that the USA (resp. US-agencies) had had quite some times theirs hands in some elections...
 

What does one have to do with the other? Do you want to know if Putin manipulated the vote, or had part in Yuschenko's poisoning--or because the US has been guilty of manipulating elections--just turn a blind eye toward Putin?

Nimh--

Surely it is incredibly easy to financially support the stuffing of ballot boxes--money for bribes, manpower to perform whatever tasks would forward one side's goals, muscle to intimidate... I can't imagine a limit to what could be done with the approval of Putin. If the US was to do such a thing--it would hardly be brought before Congress. Does a country stand responsible, even if the operation is clandestine?
 
 
 
I guess another question would be--do you take Putin at face value re Ukraine?

O'Bill--

I would imagine there will be an investigation about Russia's possible guilt in the voter fraud that marred the last election. That being, I doubt Putin would make any comment that may make him appear as if he had a dog in this fight.
 
If he really goes from a close victor to a 2 to 1 underdog, that speaks volumes towards fraud. That's a lot of egg on your face, even for Putin. So, I wonder what he's going to say. I would think, all things considered, he almost has to say something. WHAT? :wink:
 
 
 
Nimh--

Surely it is incredibly easy to financially support the stuffing of ballot boxes--money for bribes, manpower to perform whatever tasks would forward one side's goals, muscle to intimidate... I can't imagine a limit to what could be done with the approval of Putin.
 

I sympathise with your position since, as will be clear by now, I strongly suspect covert Russian involvement in the attempt to derail Yushchenko's chances. It fits with the longer-term Russian policy on the near abroad and its further ideologification under Putin. But when it comes to the ballot-stuffing, we shouldn't forget that the Kuchma and Yanukovich sympathisers (to some extent two separate groups) had more than enough motive and opportunity to themselves take on all of that work.

Kuchma must have feared more than his political survival, seeing how some of Yushchenko's prominent supporters (like Tymoshenko) were saying he should be taken to court, for example for the murder of critical journalist Gongadze. And Yanukovich, of course, had his own political victory depending on it and his sympathisers, the guaranteed attention to their region's administrations and economic "machines" by a loyal government they would have helped into power. A lot was at stake, and with both the national and the local government apparatus and their financial resources fully at their disposal, the Yanukovich forces had ample opportunity for fraud, as has been recounted in detail (see  here  and  here  ).

I totally agree with you about Russian motive, but speculating on a division of tasks, I think Putin would have stayed away from anything that easily uncoverable. Besides, the Yanukovich and Kuchma machines would hardly have needed his money.
 
 
Yushchenko is in the lead, according to the latest media reports here:

 http://www.smh.com.au/news/World/Yushchenko-leading-in-Ukraine-votes/2004/12/27/1103996471365.html 
 
 
I think one of the major news sources (Reuters'...AP?) has called it.

I'll have a look.
 
 
Snippets from MSNBC article--

 Ukraine challenger headed toward victory
Dec. 26: In the Ukraine, opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko, recovering from dioxin poisoning, appears to have beaten outgoing Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych. NBC's Jim Maceda reports from Kiev.

3 exit polls give Yushchenko lead by wide margin
Bitterly fought campaign has divided the country; official results Monday

The Associated Press

Updated: 7:25 p.m. ET Dec. 26, 2004KIEV, Ukraine - Exit polls projected an easy victory Sunday for opposition presidential candidate Viktor Yushchenko in a bitter campaign that required an unprecedented three ballots and Supreme Court intervention to pick a new Ukrainian leader.

Elated opposition supporters flooded Kiev's Independence Square, the center of protests after the Nov. 21 election that was beset with fraud allegations and eventually annulled. Music blared from loudspeakers and fireworks lit up the sky. In Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych's home base of Donetsk, the streets were largely empty, with only a few people stumbling home from the bars.

The three exit polls projected Yushchenko winning by at least 15 percentage points, and with ballots from just more than 30 percent of precincts counted he was leading with 57.43 percent to 38.89 percent for Yanukovych, election officials said. Final official results were not expected until Monday.

A dejected-appearing Yanukovych, who had the backing of the outgoing Ukrainian president and Russian leader Vladimir Putin, refused to concede defeat in a newsconference begun before the polls closed.
 
 
 
The "Orange" movement in Ukraine has captured the imagination of the West. Many see in them the expression of their own political hopes and aspirations. That may or may not be true. Many initially attractive political movements were initially seen as similarly attractive an hopeful, including that of Fidel Castro and, as you pointed out, Boris Yeltsin.
 

Boris Yeltsin was never looked upon too gladly here in Western Europe actually... the media and most of the politicians here were firmly on the side of much-loved "Gorby". Gorby brought us peace and disarmament, after all, he let Eastern Europe go free. Gorbachev's subsequent drift to the right (ie, towards ever more orthodox communist allies) after 1989 was mostly blinked at and apologized for.

As Gorbachev's challenger, Yeltsin was seen as the irresponsible "elephant in the china cabinet", much too bold. He gained at most a grudging respect after the failed August 1991 coup, but remained portrayed mostly as a bit of a loose cannon, a drinker and of course oh so far removed from the refined intellectuality of Gorbachev. Never mind that Yeltsin at least had the guts to let the Baltic states and other breakaway Soviet republics go and actually call nation-wide free elections; two things Gorbachev ("I am the center") had always refused to do.

Of course, many of the fears about Yeltsin turned out to be well-founded; he was a bit of a loose cannon, and handled his newly acquired power irresponsibly. Still, he was an effective "destroyer" of what needed to be destroyed - the Soviet system; a system Gorbachev (who to the end called himself a communist) could not decisively cut loose from.

But, re: your point - I don't think Yushchenko evokes in anyone here the kind of idealist fervour a Castro once rallied. There is no starry-eyed, ideologically inspired fellow-travellerdom here. In fact, he'll get a honeymoon of at most a few months before the EU will show him the same "shopping list" of convergence criteria they presented to Kuchma and Kravchuk: economic liberalisation, human rights... The analysis here is that the EU is actually in a bit of a bind; they obviously want Yushchenko to win and feel that he should - but they're afraid of the imminent hope of EU accession his victory will evoke among Ukrainians, when the EU itself is not at all ready to grant yet another large, poor country on its eastern borders an accession date. At most, the Christian-Democrats want the Ukraine in as counterweight to Turkey - but probably not much sooner...

Same goes for the vox populi. On the one hand, TV images of cheering protestors chanting for their right to regain democracy, to return to 'European values', instantly evokes sympathy and solidarity. A new 1989! Havel, Walesa! On the other hand, to be brutally honest, I don't think much anyone here is actually waiting for Ukraine to quickly join the EU. Public opinion here is, as you can imagine, quite suspicious right now of yet more poor newcomers at the door of our prosperous Fortress.

The analogy you hint at is thus a false one. There is no fellow-travellerdom. The "Orange" people in the streets command our sympathy of course, but the movement lacks a clear political "hook" into our own debate. The far left is distrustful of the Ukrainian democrats because they're supported by the Americans, the far right resents the implied future EU enlargement. And middle-of-the-road liberals, christian- and social-democrats, whom the Ukrainian democrats have the most affinity with, by rule ain't so starry-eyed.

Everybody knows Yushchenko himself was an apparatchik. That his coalition is a very broad church, with all kinds of people in it. But what the "orange" uprising was about was not a prime belief in the all-knowingness of its leader - Yushchenko was a compromise candidate from the start. It was about being fed up with a President who bribed, fooled, repressed and conspired, a degeneration of the country's chances of proper modernisation that culminated in massive election fraud and, as it happens, the actual poisoning of the opposition candidate. When people rebel against that, it's not hard to choose sides, even if you do not necessarily have much illusions about the virginal purity of its leader.

 
It would be unfortunate if the European movement now underway ends up alienating both the United States and Russia.
 

I would submit that the common American-European support and sympathy for the "Orange" uprising is something that in part re-emphasises our common bonds again, that helps bring Europe and the US together again a bit. With Poland, America's new favourite son in Europe, in a star mediator role.

 
That's a lot of egg on your face, even for Putin. So, I wonder what he's going to say. I would think, all things considered, he almost has to say something. WHAT? :wink:
 

Same as always... "I am satisfied that the elections have taken place without major altercations and respect the choice made by the Ukrainian population. I look forward to a fruitful collaboration with the new Ukrainian President and hope that, as closely related nations, we will keep on developing close ties of co-operation." What else? ;-)
 
 
 
I think one of the major news sources (Reuters'...AP?) has called it.

I'll have a look.
 

Oh, I thought my source was rather "major", too, Lash. :wink:
 
 
From the article MsOlga linked in:

 
Both campaigns complained of violations, but monitors said they'd seen far fewer problems.

"This is another country," said Stefan Mironjuk, a German election monitor observing the vote in the northern Sumy region.

"The atmosphere of intimidation and fear during the first and second rounds was absent... It was very, very calm."
 
 
 
Yushchenko claims victory
From correspondents in Kiev
December 27, 2004

OPPOSITION leader Viktor Yushchenko today claimed victory in a re-run of Ukraine's presidential election.

"I want to say this is a victory of the Ukrainian people, the Ukrainian nation. We were independent for 14 years, today we became free," he said at his headquarters in the capital Kiev.

"Today, in Ukraine, a new political year has begun.

"This is the beginning of a new epoch, the beginning of a new great democracy."

Counting is continuing.

 http://www.news.com.au/common/story_page/0,4057,11790629%255E1702,00.html 

Dunno if this is a premature claim or not!!!

Searching - this was via Google
 
 
The previous story same source:

Yushchenko surges ahead
From correspondents in Kiev
December 27, 2004

OPPOSITION leader Viktor Yushchenko holds a strong lead over his opponent in a historic repeat of Ukraine's presidential election.

The central election commission today said that in counting so far the pro-Western Mr Yushchenko had taken 56.33 per cent of the vote.

That compared with 39.86 per cent for his Russian-leaning rival, Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich.

The results were based on reporting from 50.96 per cent of the country's polling stations, which number more than 33,000.

 http://www.news.com.au/common/story_page/0,4057,11790636%255E1702,00.html 
 
 
Nimh,   (The funny part is; you're probably right.)
 
 
The Kyiv Post  reports  from the Yushchenko rally:

 
Meanwhile, tens of thousands of Yushchenko supporters gathered in Kyiv's Independence Square, the site of last month's mass protests, to celebrate the anticipated victory of their candidate. [..]

Taras Korolyov, 28, brought his wife Lesya, 25, and three-year-old daughter Olena to the square dressed in orange ski suits to celebrate a victory they described as "100 percent certain."

"We brought our daughter here to see the birth of freedom," Korolyov said as his daughter waved a tiny orange flag and chanted "Yu-shchen-ko, Yu-shchen-ko."

A World War II-vintage motorcycle draped in orange ribbons drove through the crowd, honking.

"This bike saw the liberation of Kyiv [from Nazi Germany], and now is seeing another liberation of Ukraine," said Oleksandr, the biker, who gave his first name only.

The exits polls tracked an unprecedented third-round presidential election, which was watched by some 12,000 foreign observers in hopes of preventing the fraud that sparked massive protests inside the nation and a volley of recriminations between Russia and the West.
 

In what reads like a who's who of international funders, the article also runs through the details of the different exit polls:

 
All three exit polls showed Yushchenko with at least a 15-percentage-point lead.

The Social Monitoring Center's exit poll gave Yushchenko 58.1 percent, and Yanukovych 38.4 percent. The pollsters questioned up to 12,500 voters in face-to-face interviews at 360 polling stations throughout Ukraine. The Social Monitoring Poll was funded by a non-profit organization in France called Liase with Europe.

Results of the Razumkov Center of Economic and Political Studies and Kyiv International Institute of Sociology poll showed oppositionist candidate Yushchenko with 56.3 percent of the vote and Yanukovych garnering 41.3 percent. The poll surveyed some 30,000 voters in 360 polling stations using anonymous questionnaires the respondents placed in boxes. The poll was coordinated by the Kyiv-based non-governmental organization Democratic Initiatives and was sponsored by the embassies of eight countries: Switzerland, Sweden, Norway, Denmark, the Netherlands, Great Britain, the United States and Canada. Four foundations - the National Endowment for Democracy, the Eurasia Foundation, the Mott Foundation and the International Renaissance Foundation - also funded the poll.

According to results of the third poll - conducted by the Luntz Research Company - Yushchenko won 56 percent of the vote and Yanukovych won 41 percent. Frank Luntz, a pollster for the U.S. Republican Party, and Douglas Schoen, of the Washington-based market research company Penn, Schoen & Berland, polled up to 10,000 voters on behalf of Ukraine's ICTV television, which is owned by outgoing President Leonid Kuchma's son-in-law Viktor Pinchuk. The margin of error was two percent.
 
 
 
That was a good post, nimh. I've been watching the progress of the Ukrainian election thinking similar things: That "outsiders" are projecting their own hopes & their own political beliefs onto the situation. Black hats & white hats. Good guys & bad guys. Whereas the reality of the Ukraine is far more complex. I hope the new government has the courage to act in the long-term best interests of Ukrainians, particularly in the daunting task of tackling the economy of the country. It's going to be a long, hard haul.
 
 
From the  Moscow Times  site:

 
OSCE observer approves Ukrainian elections commission' work

Interfax. Monday, Dec. 27, 2004, 4:11 AM Moscow Time

MOSCOW. Dec 27 (Interfax) - Head of the OSCE observers' mission Gert Arens approved the work of Ukraine's elections commissions on all levels during the Ukrainian presidential elections.

Arens especially commended the work of the country's Central Elections Commission, the Ekho Moskvy radio station reported

Yushchenko declares he won elections

Interfax. Monday, Dec. 27, 2004, 4:01 AM Moscow Time

KYIV. Dec 27 (Interfax) - Viktor Yushchenko declared that he has won the Ukrainian presidential elections and called on his supporters to go out onto the Independence Square in the center of Kyiv.

"The first news is - it is done," Yushchenko said in his HQ on Monday morning. "It is a victory of the Ukrainian people, the Ukrainian nation," he added.

Yushchenko noted that a new political year is beginning in Ukraine. "The era of Kuchma, Medvedchuk and Yanukovych is going away, a new era of great democracy is beginning. Dozens of millions of Ukrainians dreamed about it. Today it is fashionable, stylish and beautiful to be a Ukrainian," Yushchenko said.

Yushchenko thanked "free journalists for letting the whole world talk about Ukraine."
 

The rundown of Interfax items does include Yanukovych's representative's complaints about "systematic violations" and those of Russian State Duma's first Deputy Speaker, who highlighted violations in Western Ukraine; but does not include any item on the reports of violations in Eastern Ukraine that were mentioned side by side with those in Western media.
 
 
Also from the Moscow Times, snippeting out from the article covering Putin's press conference last Thursday quotes that together tell a story (for full article click headline):

 
 President Lashes Out at the West 

[..] In his criticism of the West, Putin mostly focused on the European Union and particularly Polish President Aleksander Kwasniewski, who said in a recent newspaper interview that "Russia without Ukraine is better than Russia with Ukraine" for the United States.

[..] "If we interpret this [statement by Kwasniewski] as striving to limit Russia's ability to develop relations with its neighbors, then it means a desire to isolate the Russian Federation," Putin said.

"If that is the case, then the [Western] policy toward Chechnya becomes more understandable... [as] a policy aimed at establishing elements that would destabilize the Russian Federation," he said.

[..] Hard-liners in Russia have accused Kwasniewski -- who helped mediate talks between Yushchenko and Yanukovych -- of being Washington's proxy in a covert battle being fought over Ukraine. The two candidates square off in a repeat vote Sunday.

[..] Putin denounced "dangerous attempts to solve political issues through nonlegitimate means," in a reference to Ukraine's so-called Orange Revolution -- the well-organized opposition street protests that helped lead to the repeat vote -- and the Rose Revolution in Georgia last year that brought a U.S.-trained lawyer to power.

The president said revolutions in those former Soviet republics had been planned "in other places" and noted that U.S. billionaire philanthropist George Soros is now bankrolling the salaries of senior officials in the Georgian government.

[..] He asserted Russia's right to pursue policies to bring neighboring countries closer to Moscow and said the Kremlin will continue to push forward on a pact to create a common economic space between Russia, Belarus, Ukraine and Kazakhstan.

He also made it clear that Moscow will continue to maintain contacts with separatist regimes in neighboring countries. Asked by a Georgian TV reporter whether trips by Russian officials to mediate talks between rival presidential candidates in separatist Abkhazia was also a case of double standards, Putin said Russia supports Georgia's territorial integrity, but only if Tbilisi accommodates the wishes of ethnic groups.

[..] Most of Putin's domestic policy answers, however, were a reiteration of what he has said before, including his assertion that the elimination of gubernatorial elections will not turn Russia into a unitary state and that there is no crackdown under way on media freedoms. "A decent girl must resist, while a true man must keep insisting," he said, resorting to a phrase he has used before to explain why the authorities keep insisting that some restrictions must be placed on the media.
 

Not that Putin didn't score some clever points during his press conference, mind you. He made it an art form to return again and again to the issue of double standards. Thus he pointed out, as the Dutch Volkskrant reported, that the US chided the elections in-wartime in Chechnya - but themselves now insist on holding elections in Iraq.

Responding to questions about his decision to abolish elections for governors, he rebutted that he wasn't all too enthusiastic about election arrangements in America either - "do you think the electoral system in the US is faultless?".

Addressing European critics, he pointed out (after cleverly mentioning about Polish President Kweasniewski that "we still know him well from when he was still working for the Komsomol") that (quote Moscow Times):

 
the refusal of OSCE observers to recognize the results of Ukraine's runoff on Nov. 21, combined with their willingness to endorse elections in Afghanistan and Kosovo, show that the West is pursuing a policy of double standards. Those double standards are also applied to human rights issues, he said, pointing out that the EU has pressured Macedonia to set aside a quota for ethnic Albanians in the legislative and executive branches of power but spurned Moscow's requests for a similar quota for the sizable Russian diaspora in the Latvian capital, Riga.
 
 
 
Looks like this is one of those 'may you live in interesting times' times.
 
 
 
SerSo

It is your take on Moldova/Transnistria that exemplifies as well as any how biased information can indeed, to lend your phrase, "simplify and misinterpret complex and dangerous situations".

It is rife with misinformation, but as such I assume it merely represents the take that was generally presented on the situation in Russian media. Yet that lends a certain irony to your off-hand dismissal that takes from outside Russia that you don't agree with (about a country that's as close to Austria as it is to Russia), must just be "biased".[..]
 

Nimh, I make no pretence to being the only one who knows the truth. However if I encounter reports that disagree with what I think to be true I simply try to give my counterargument. I admit I can be misinformed. What makes me bitter is any attempt to find enemies.

Frankly speaking, I am not the one whose views simply mirror the opinion generally represented by the Russian media. Fortunately or unfortunately I gave up following it long ago and I find most information which is of interest to me in the Internet. My vision of the Transdniestrian crisis derives from what I heard from my friends who were there in the very beginning and those who sometimes come to Moscow from Moldavia. For instance I heard about televised parliamentary debates in Chisinau where they discussed if Romanian surnames should be subject to declension in the Russian language. Or how a crowd in Tiraspol was about to beat my friends because they did not look like locals and therefore they were taken for those volunteers who had been mobilized by the Popular Front. I did not know very much though about the political developments in Chisinau and Tiraspol after 1992. The facts you have shared here also contributed to my knowledge and I am always grateful to you for posting here even if my opinion does not agree with yours.

Our discussion over the situation in Moldavia in particular and the Russian policy toward the ex-USSR countries in general goes beyond the subject of this thread, hence I do not feel like continuing it here and contest your every statement I find fallible. I would only note that your approach unfortunately lacks understanding of what life used to look like in the early 90's when people merely did not understand what government administers the territory where they lived and also whilst the former Soviet army was falling apart and entire military detachments with all their munitions simply declared themselves as belonging to Russian, Moldavian, Transdniestrian, Ukrainian and other armies.

 
[..]Basically, you are here blaming a democratically elected government that, in the wake of independence, decided that the majority language rather than that of the erstwhile occupiers should be the language of government, for a violent, separatist insurrection, facilitated by the Russian army's covert support.

You are blaming the "hotheads" who dared want to realise the political programme they were elected in on by a persuasive majority for what, on the Dnyestr's left bank, rapidly devolved into a insurrectionist gangster's paradise.[..]
 

I do actually blame the then government of Moldavia because they thought that having majority behind them they could impose their will on the minority and use military force to make their opponents obey. Such approach could only lead to civil disorder, war and terror. I believe the true democracy implies respect for interests of minorities and should provide mechanisms to avoid violence. The only reason why I mentioned the Transdniestrian crisis here was my desire to demonstrate how ignoring this principle could lead to very undesirable consequences. I really hope for the best and think that people in the Ukraine will be wise enough to hear and understand each other. The fact that until now they relied on the law instead of force makes me optimistic.
 
 
 
 
I think one of the major news sources (Reuters'...AP?) has called it.

I'll have a look.
 

Oh, I thought my source was rather "major", too, Lash. :wink:
 

Here is a link to the official site dedicated to the presidential elections in the Ukraine with the first hand data from the central electoral commission:  http://www.cvk.gov.ua/wp0011e 
According to the preliminary figures Yushchenko is very likely to win, what makes me think the fraud during the second ballot on November 21 could be actually enormous. Hope they will thoroughly investigate every case of manipulation, punish everyone whose guilt have been proved in due course and eliminate the very possibility to do such things in future.

On the other hand at a slightly lesser turnout the reported percentage of votes given in favour of each candidate in every region (oblast) is almost similar to the results of the November ballot. It does not seem the country has changed up its mind radically and the Ukraine remains deeply divided geographically.
 
 
 
Boris Yeltsin was never looked upon too gladly here in Western Europe actually... the media and most of the politicians here were firmly on the side of much-loved "Gorby". Gorby brought us peace and disarmament, after all, he let Eastern Europe go free. Gorbachev's subsequent drift to the right (ie, towards ever more orthodox communist allies) after 1989 was mostly blinked at and apologized for.

As Gorbachev's challenger, Yeltsin was seen as the irresponsible "elephant in the china cabinet", much too bold. He gained at most a grudging respect after the failed August 1991 coup, but remained portrayed mostly as a bit of a loose cannon, a drinker and of course oh so far removed from the refined intellectuality of Gorbachev. Never mind that Yeltsin at least had the guts to let the Baltic states and other breakaway Soviet republics go and actually call nation-wide free elections; two things Gorbachev ("I am the center") had always refused to do.

Of course, many of the fears about Yeltsin turned out to be well-founded; he was a bit of a loose cannon, and handled his newly acquired power irresponsibly. Still, he was an effective "destroyer" of what needed to be destroyed - the Soviet system; a system Gorbachev (who to the end called himself a communist) could not decisively cut loose from.
 

Nicely stated. I agree fully.

 
But, re: your point - I don't think Yushchenko evokes in anyone here the kind of idealist fervour a Castro once rallied. There is no starry-eyed, ideologically inspired fellow-travellerdom here. In fact, he'll get a honeymoon of at most a few months before the EU will show him the same "shopping list" of convergence criteria they presented to Kuchma and Kravchuk: economic liberalisation, human rights... The analysis here is that the EU is actually in a bit of a bind; they obviously want Yushchenko to win and feel that he should - but they're afraid of the imminent hope of EU accession his victory will evoke among Ukrainians, when the EU itself is not at all ready to grant yet another large, poor country on its eastern borders an accession date. At most, the Christian-Democrats want the Ukraine in as counterweight to Turkey - but probably not much sooner...
Public opinion here is, as you can imagine, quite suspicious right now of yet more poor newcomers at the door of our prosperous Fortress.

The analogy you hint at is thus a false one. There is no fellow-travellerdom. The "Orange" people in the streets command our sympathy of course, but the movement lacks a clear political "hook" into our own debate. The far left is distrustful of the Ukrainian democrats because they're supported by the Americans, the far right resents the implied future EU enlargement. And middle-of-the-road liberals, christian- and social-democrats, whom the Ukrainian democrats have the most affinity with, by rule ain't so starry-eyed.

Yushchenko was a compromise candidate from the start. It was about being fed up with a President who bribed, fooled, repressed and conspired, a degeneration of the country's chances of proper modernisation that culminated in massive election fraud and, as it happens, the actual poisoning of the opposition candidate. When people rebel against that, it's not hard to choose sides, even if you do not necessarily have much illusions about the virginal purity of its leader.
 

That is an interesting and plausible perspective that I had not fully considered. Thanks.

 
 
It would be unfortunate if the European movement now underway ends up alienating both the United States and Russia.
 

I would submit that the common American-European support and sympathy for the "Orange" uprising is something that in part re-emphasises our common bonds again, that helps bring Europe and the US together again a bit. With Poland, America's new favourite son in Europe, in a star mediator role
 

I hope this is true, but frankly I doubt it. It has taken a long time for it to develop, but the old viewpoints that prevailed during the past century here have been replaced by something new. There is no longer the prevailing notion that we and the Western European states share the same goals and ambitions. Now the implicit assumption is that we are opponents on the world scene. This is a profound change - no doubt on both sides of the Atlantic, but I believe it goes much deeper here than many Europeans realize.. I fear that it will grow in the years ahead. Certainly I see nothing on the horizon that might dampen it. On the contrary, there are many more issues out there likely to increase the divide..
 
 
I, too, feel as though things can never be the same between the US and Europe.

The relationship is forever altered.

I would imagine both Russia and the EU are strongly compelled to throw in together. Whether or not they have to hold their noses to do so--
 
 
Just quickly responding to georgeob1 b/c I had something jotted down on it already... (So I'm not ignoring your post, SerSo, I'll be back later -- though I would already like to apologize for any impoliteness that may have crept into my previous post to you, as it was undeserved.)

 
 
I would submit that the common American-European support and sympathy for the "Orange" uprising is something that in part re-emphasises our common bonds again, that helps bring Europe and the US together again a bit. With Poland, America's new favourite son in Europe, in a star mediator role
 

I hope this is true, but frankly I doubt it. It has taken a long time for it to develop, but the old viewpoints that prevailed during the past century here have been replaced by something new. There is no longer the prevailing notion that we and the Western European states share the same goals and ambitions. Now the implicit assumption is that we are opponents on the world scene.
 

Perhaps, but I would think that this new sense of "being opponents on the world scene" would only actually persuasively play out when the ideological perspectives on an issue at hand do indeed differ starkly - not just for its own sake.

For example, when it comes to Israel, Iraq or Iran, Europe and the US do indeed have starkly different ideological instincts and visions. Diplomacy vs. war. War against terrorism versus conflict resolution. And of course those wholly different perceptions will come to the surface much more starkly now that there is so much less of a traditional strategic unity tying the parties across the Atlantic down as they used to do in face of a common enemy.

But in case of the continuing efforts to further democracy in the former Soviet Union, the two should by any normative criterium be on the same side. It feels artificial and awkward for some US conservatives to side with the authoritarians in the FSU, as some now do in eg the National Review or the Free Republic, just because of "the implicit assumption that [the US and the EU] are opponents on the world scene". Do you really want to exchange your traditional Reaganite loyalties to the insurgent democrats for one to their opponents, just for the sake of acquiring a strategic counterweight to the EU?

This is what I had already jotted down on that before turning on the computer:

 
I would submit that the common American-European support and sympathy for the "Orange" uprising is something that in part re-emphasises our common bonds again, that helps bring Europe and the US together again a bit. With Poland, America's new favourite son in Europe, in a star mediator role
 

Let me rephrase that.

It would be unfortunate if the American right, reasoning along the lines of a "the enemy of my enemy is my friend" kind of logic, would let its distaste of the EU lead it to embracing as its new ally a former KGB chief who's busily  recentralising and renationalising  Russia's politics and economy.

I see no consistent argument beyond the petty chess of political strategisms for Ronald Reagan's ideological descendants to surrender the positions so consistently expressed through the years of (post)communism by the likes of Radio Free Europe, Radio Liberty and Voice of America and suddenly welcome more authoritarian, collectivist regimes in the Former Soviet Union, just because of a shared resentment of a resurgent Europe.

American conservatives chided European opponents of the Iraq war for letting their instinctive anti-Americanism override what should be a clear and common cause against totalitarianism elsewhere in the world. Putting myself in the skin of a neo-conservative for a moment, I see no persuasive excuse for US conservatives to now make the same mistake in reverse.
 
 
<in the library>

In today's Guardian, amongst other things, there's Boris Nemtsov, in Yeltsin's later days the jeune premier of Russian democrats, now one of the leaders of Russia's (all too marginal) liberal opposition:

 
A liberal Russian MP, Boris Nemtsov, wearing an orange scarf to signify his support for Mr Yushchenko, said: "It does not matter who wins today, but that Ukraine is now a democratic country. The people have shown they are stronger than corruption and falsification."

He said the impact of the crisis would be keenly felt in Russia.

"Putin is in a state of shock," he said, adding that Ukraine's experience belied Mr Putin's contention that Russia was not ready for true democracy. "Ukraine has shown that a Slavic country can be a democracy. It is now the pioneer."
 
 
 
Rubbing chillbumps.

Its a beautiful day.
 
 
More acutely relevant, of course, is Yanukovych's refusal to concede:

 
But the latest report Mr Yanukovich promised to mount a legal challenge against the results which would mean another twist in the protracted battle for the divided former Soviet country's presidency.

Refusing to concede, he told reporters in Kiev: "I will never recognise such a defeat, because the constitution and human rights were violated in our country and people died."
 

"People died"?

Also in the Guardian, an election day report from a Yanukovych bulwark:

 
 Ukraine's latest threat: blue and white rebellion 

David Crouch in Yenakievo
Monday December 27, 2004
The Guardian

Voters in eastern Ukraine warned yesterday that they might mount a challenge to the country's new leadership if, as expected, their favourite son, Viktor Yanukovich, is defeated in the run-off presidential election.
A month after orange-clad opposition protesters forced a repeat vote because of fraud in the first ballot, the eastern industrial heartland signalled that it would not accept defeat lying down, amid ominous murmurs of a blue-and-white "revolution" of its own.

With members of Mr Yanukovich's camp already talking about legal challenges to the result before it came in, the contender's campaign slogan "We will defend our choice" was starting to take on a new significance.

The town of Yenakievo, 40km from the mining city of Donetsk, is where Mr Yanukovich grew up and worked in the vast metalworks whose fuming smokestacks tower above a jumble of coalmines and shabby homes.

Outside polling station number 37, a group of miners is discussing the tumultuous events of the past five weeks, which saw Mr Yanukovich declare electoral victory only to be forced into a rerun against Viktor Yushchenko because of widespread fraud.

Rumours catch on quickly here, and few are favourable towards the pro-western opposition leader. The latest word is that one of his local campaign officers has supposedly been caught offering bribes. The miners aren't surprised - it fits with the picture they already have of Mr Yushchenko.

"He destroyed the mines," says Sasha, 36. "When he was prime minister [1999-2001] we didn't get our wages or pensions; Yanukovich has raised both.

"If Yushchenko wins he'll crush us. He wants to import Polish coal. We'll end up selling chickens."

Igor, 29, is no more impressed. "When miners demonstrated in Kiev in 1998, where was Yushchenko then? Where were the free food and free blankets?" He said Mr Yushchenko's second-in-command, Yuliya Timoshenko, had "said she'll surround Donetsk with barbed wire, she told us to hang ourselves from our blue-and-white scarves. There's no way we'll accept a Yushchenko government."

Throughout the region Yushchenko supporters are a rarity, but in Yenakievo they are scared to come out. Local people have declined to fill the positions reserved for the opposition on the local electoral commissions, so Mr Yushchenko has had to bus in hundreds of people from western Ukraine to take their places.

Vera Kobilyanskaya, 46, a doctor from Rivno, is head of the Yushchenko campaign team in the town. She hasn't slept much: at 4am yesterday a large group of Yanukovich supporters held a meeting outside her hotel window, shouting "Yushchenko out!"

"At the second round of voting in November there were a great many falsifications in Yenakievo," she says. "The prosecutor is investigating." At one polling station the voting figures were dictated and handed out in advance; the electoral commission simply signed a blank piece of paper on which the results were then inscribed. At another, the turnout was 105%; at a third, 15 dead people turned up on the electoral roll.

"It's the same Yanukovich people in the electoral commissions from the second round," Ms Kobilyanskaya says. "But we are going to stick it out, there are more of us this time and we are tough. I will never forgive what the government has done to this country."

In Donetsk, Yanukovich supporters are defiant. The street protests in Kiev and western cities have set an example to the east. But political leaders in Donetsk have reacted angrily to accusations from the Yushchenko camp that Donetsk is arming itself to repel the new government.

"This is pure lies, it is simply stoking up tension," says the Donetsk mayor, Oleksandr Lukianchenko. "Before the second round they said Russian spetsnaz [special forces troops] were defending the government; this turned out to be false. Now they have shown once again what methods the opposition are using to sow fear and confusion."

On Lenin Square in the city centre, young people enjoying the unseasonably mild weather are united in their support for Mr Yanukovich. "If Yushchenko wins, there will be war," says Katya, 19, a student at Donetsk University of Economics.

Anton, 27, a rail worker, says: "There will be mass demonstrations. Yushchenko's people are mafiosi. But no one will have to pay us to come out and demonstrate, we will come of our own accord."
 
 
 
 
Too early to say Ukraine has overcome serious crisis

27.12.2004, 20.39

MOSCOW, December 27 (Itar-Tass) - The presidential election in Ukraine is over, but it is yet too early to say that Ukraine has overcome the most serious crisis of the past months, Konstantin Kosachev, the chairman of the committee for international affairs of the State Duma lower house of Russian parliament, said on Monday.

"This result is a necessary stage for Ukraine on the way of overcoming the crisis with which it has not yet fully coped," he said.

"The pace of settling the crisis," Kosachev said, "will wholly depend on the actions of Ukraine's new leadership. If Yushchenko is unable to overcome the inertia of the election campaign when he spoke from obviously radical positions of the refusal to accept the existing authorities and objected to plans of coming closer to Russia, then Ukraine is in for a serious split and opposition of one part of society to the other."

"If Yushchenko is able to be above sentiments and emotions of the election campaign, if he succeeds in working out a programme of actions of president of all Ukrainians and in the interests of all regions, both Eastern and Western, then Ukraine will have a chance to overcome the crisis".

The chairman of the Duma committee pointed with satisfaction to "some positive elements" in Yushchenko's positions. This refers to his intention to visit Russia first of all in his capacity as president, and also to sign the decree to withdraw the Ukrainian contingent from Iraq.

"I regard this as the indication of Yushchenko's striving to pursue the foreign policy independent of the United States and Europe and oriented at Ukraine's national interests." "This is a good omen, if not a mere declaration," Kosachev said.

Kosachev believes Ukraine "has chances to overcome the crisis if it is oriented at its own national interests and at the development of non-political and most pragmatic relations with all its neighbours, Russia, naturally, included," Kosachev said.
 
 Source 
 
 
Nimh,

I generally agree with your analysis, however there are a few important distinctions to be made.

The differences in the approaches favored by Europe and those of the USA in the Middle East are, as you said, often characterized by a preference for diplomacy and negotiation on one hand and direct action on the other. However that is a far from sufficient characterization of the actual encounters we face in world affairs. Some European states in executing their "preferred" diplomatic approach actively opposed risky actions we were taking both in the field and in the assembly of a coalition. While that situation may well contain elements of a preference for diplomacy vs. one for direct action, for the nation that has committed its forces, the other party is hardly distinguishable from an enemy. This is a salient issue in our relations with France today and to a lesser extent with Germany. (The fact that we have recovered enormous Iraqi stocks of French-made weaponry - of recent manufacture, is much discussed in our military circles.) It is my opinion that events already taken will have lasting effects on perceptions in this country of the nature of our relationship with those countries. Similarly it is clear that we are distancing ourselves at every turn from the present government in Spain. These things bring their own adverse momentum to the development of strategy in subsequent issues - as is amply demonstrated in history.

The matter of Israel & Palestine brings its own special elements. There is no doubt that the United States unwisely failed to pressure Israel after the 1967 war to quickly establish a political solution in the West Bank - either take the people and the territory, or let both go. This was likely a result of the political pressure American Jews are able to bring to bear on the matter. There is no comparable political element in Europe precisely because of the Holocaust, and the fact that Israel was populated by Jews who survived it fleeing their European homelands. In this area Europe bears a moral responsibility which it has never sufficiently acknowledged (except in Germany). Moreover the duplicity involved in the dismemberment of the former Ottoman Empire, the work of Britain and France, is still a salient factor in the political turmoil in the Middle East. In the light of these considerations, I believe that Europe has utterly failed to live up to its responsibilities for its own misdeeds. There are many Americans who understand all this. Now that the US has firmly declared its committment to a two state solution along with a rejection for the illusions if the Clinton-Barak scheme of 1999, anhas demanded that the Palestinians develop a real, responsible government as a precondition to the attainment of their political goals, it seems to me that a little constructive help from Europe is in order.

I agree that it would be both unfortunate and unwise for us to abandon our long-standing commitment to the liberated states of Central and Eastern Europe. How this situation unfolds depends on the choices both they and we will make in the months and years ahead. However, for those in U.S. Strategy analysis circles who take seriously Chirac's frequent expressions of an intent to lead the EU to a position from which it can challenge an America (in his view) badly in need of such challenge, and who see it as representing an enduring segment of European views, the choice in this area is for those Central and Eastern European states to make. If they adopt this EU strategic view, then the matter is already lost and we would have abandoned nothing of enduring value.

A great deal of attention is given to Putin's authoritarian initiatives: relatively less to those in China. If he achieves economic success in a manner that leaves open the prospect of evolutionary reform at a meaningful pace, he will have outdone China, and I think will be quite acceptable to all. Russia and the United States present certain similarities, particularly in their posture towards Europe. During the long Cold War the principal antagonists developed a certain interest and respect for one another. It is very easy for me to see a growing accommodation between the United States and Russia if the EU "grand strategy" begins to unfold. Europe too must make its choices. You can't have your cake and eat it too..
 
 
Winning is a second victory, IMO. What the people of the Ukraine have already done--gather together and stand against corruption--and refuse to leave-- this is an incredible victory to me.

It's the sheer courage, the brave refusal to accept oppression, corruption quietly. Something was more important to them than their own personal safety or comfort. When that happens on a large scale, its almost miraculous to me. That's one victory for them, for everyone, I think. Because it happened where it did ratcheted up the stakes. I'm still in awe of them.

I don't think they'll ever be quite the same there. And, they're better for it, IMO.

I sort of cooled on my blind Yuschenko praising a little while back--cause I realized I don't know enough about these two men to be so vocal for one over the other. I would assume Yuschenko would be closer to my preference--but I don't have enough information on the two to know.

But, what I do know is the Orange Revolution, no matter who eventually wins, was a very good thing for the people of the Ukraine. Do the Blue and Whites have any less right to get out in the street and voice their preference? I don't think so.

If it can just kept legal (non-violent) and remain driven by the people...
 
 
 
Winning is a second victory, IMO. What the people of the Ukraine have already done--gather together and stand against corruption--and refuse to leave-- this is an incredible victory to me.

It's the sheer courage, the brave refusal to accept oppression, corruption quietly. Something was more important to them than their own personal safety or comfort. When that happens on a large scale, its almost miraculous to me. That's one victory for them, for everyone, I think.
 

<sharing the feeling>
 
 
 
Ukraine minister found shot dead

Ukrainian Transport Minister Heorhiy Kyrpa has been found dead at his holiday home near the capital Kiev.
The minister is reported to have gun-shot wounds and officials said a gun was found near his body.

Mr Kyrpa, 58, appointed in 2002, was a staunch supporter of Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych.

There are no reports the death is linked to Mr Yanukovych's defeat by opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko in Sunday's presidential poll re-run.
 
 Source 
 
 
 
I agree that it would be both unfortunate and unwise for us to abandon our long-standing commitment to the liberated states of Central and Eastern Europe. How this situation unfolds depends on the choices both they and we will make in the months and years ahead. However, for those in U.S. Strategy analysis circles who take seriously Chirac's frequent expressions of an intent to lead the EU to a position from which it can challenge an America (in his view) badly in need of such challenge, and who see it as representing an enduring segment of European views, the choice in this area is for those Central and Eastern European states to make. If they adopt this EU strategic view, then the matter is already lost and we would have abandoned nothing of enduring value.
 

But isn't foreign policy more than strategic interests? I know that, asked of you, that risks being a rhetorical question, since you have long and articulately argued the case that no, it isn't. But you share your own political "camp" now with a new generation of neoconservatives that does, indeed, see the foreign policy arena as one to achieve more than loyal states and allied interests with - to better the world, in their own way. Their take-no-prisoners attitude re: Iraq exemplified a vision in which the US is ultimately benefited more by newly democratic states taking the place of previous authoritarian regimes, no matter what their future strategic loyalties, than by live-by-the-day strategic alliances with this or that existing regime of dubious credentials. In that respect I do recognize some of their, dare I say, idealism.

In such a vision, Central or Eastern European states overcoming or overthrowing the corrupt, authoritarian patterns of the Former Soviet Union in the 1990s and establishing functioning democracies and market economies is an end of "enduring value" regardless of whether they then join with France, Germany, the UK or America in the day's strategic arena.

In short - to once more evoke Reagan's spirit - did he want the wall to fall because he hoped to enlarge America's stock of allies - and would "nothing of enduring value" consequently have been gained if those behind the wall then turned out to choose another strategic camp to join? Or was there an idea bigger than that behind his rhetorics? I think there was, and it's one of the rare things I value in his legacy. From your quote I gather that, should the "liberated states of Central and Eastern Europe" choose the EU's side, they will therewith have "chosen" to lose US sympathy - regardless of their democratic credentials. I don't think Reagan would have approved of that line of thought.

The EU, even France, after all hardly equates with the erstwhile Soviet Union, loyalty to which would lose a country American support regardless of democratic credentials back in his day. In fact I think the threat to the US of a resurgent Europe has become overperceived in this last year or two of strife over Iraq. Of course I, personally, would like to see a strong EU in the international arena, one consistently pushing for a multilateral order with a strong intergovernmental component (UN), increasingly rooted in standards and principles rather than opportunism. We've come a long enough way on that compared to, say, 1914. That vision, of course, starkly differs from yours. (It would also require the new EU to somehow synthesize France's "strong-Europe" geostrategisms, but not its foreign policy unscrupulousness, with Germany's and Scandinavia's principle-driven politics, but not their passivity.) But seriously - when compared or confronted with totalitarian China, with today's outlaw-states, with rekindled xenophobic nationalism, we would still instinctively and ideologically end up on the same side, wouldn't we?

That, at least, is what I would be counting on. I realise that, to American conservatives, their sense of betrayal about Europe comes from feeling they counted on something similar re: Iraq, and got the opposite. I guess that, if and when a US government would indeed take the side of a (future) totalitarian regime in Russia or China against an EU that, however assertive, is after all just still trying to spread democracy and freedom - to spread the very same values you Americans brought here again after WW2 - it would feel like a similar kind of betrayal. But then, considering how much closer to home the Former Soviet Union is than Iraq, of a significantly more acute scope.

Needless to say, not the way to go imho.

 
Russia and the United States present certain similarities, particularly in their posture towards Europe. During the long Cold War the principal antagonists developed a certain interest and respect for one another. It is very easy for me to see a growing accommodation between the United States and Russia if the EU "grand strategy" begins to unfold.
 

You are right to point out that China's authoritarian excesses, committed away from the BBC and CNN cameras, far outdo anything Putin has been up to (though I doubt that was the point you were making). But when you proceed to sketch a future alliance between Russia and the US you kind of underline my point in my previous post, that such an alliance would seem to be based exclusively on a short-term strategic interest, the common dislike of Europe/the EU.

The question I asked in my previous post was basically about values. It strikes me that, in sketching the way the US and Russia might 'find each other', you propose no political values that Putin's Russia and GWB's America would actually share, beyond that fear or resentment of a resurgent EU (and probably the wish to each not be bothered in one's strategic designs). The question thus still stands: Do you really want to toss aside your traditional loyalties to the democrats of Eastern Europe, in exchange for ones to those who clamp down on them - just for the sake of acquiring a geostrategic counterweight to the EU? Wouldn't it be something of a betrayal to the ideological legacy that determined America's policy on Eastern Europe, Reagan's in particular, for so long? Would it really be worth it?

I do sense a deep if submerged division here between, say, the instinctively idealist, boisterous (neo)conservatism of Lash and O'Bill and the ease with which a more traditional conservative like you would relinquish ideological allies and affinities merely for the sake of tying, say, France down. I am for one glad that GWB, for now (and to a greater extent than in his first years as President, when he seemed overly impressed with what he saw "in Putin's eyes"), still seems determined to fuel and edge on the Sakaashvili's and Yushchenko's of today's Eastern Europe.

I think it's the right and proper thing to do. After all, the recent history of the very hotbeds your government has now been trying to establish democracy in, Iraq, Afghanistan, shows all too clearly that submitting to the temptation of supporting forces that share few of your values but stand against the same enemy, leaves a violent hangover to grapple with a decade later. As my sig used to say of realpolitik, it "sows the seeds of tomorrow's trouble in its tactics to tackle today's enemies". When it comes to the US and EU vis-a-vis (looming) authoritarianism in the east, it's better to keep things in perspective.
 
 
 
But isn't foreign policy more than strategic interests? I know that, asked of you, that risks being a rhetorical question, since you have long and articulately argued the case that no, it isn't. But you share your own political "camp" now with a new generation of neoconservatives that does, indeed, see the foreign policy arena as one to achieve more than loyal states and allied interests with - to better the world, in their own way.
 

Good point. I think that the foreign policy of most states tends to converge or revert towards its fundamental, cold-blooded strategic interests in the absence of specific forces that may disturb it. Long-term outcomes tend to favor the strategic interests, but excursions do occur. I don't argue that this is the way a world I created would work, but rather it is an observable fact of the history of the world in which we live.

It happens that neighboring or even opposing nations sometimes have different views of the strategic situation, and that can cause confusion and sometimes-needless conflict (WWI).

The Venetians and the French often found it beneficial to support the Moslems and later the Ottomans against their European neighbors when it suited them (Francis I and Charles DeGaulle were similar historical figures.). From the seventeenth through the nineteenth century Britain aligned itself with whatever continental powers were the rivals of the dominant one, seeking always to prevent the domination of continental Europe by any one power. Similarly when Britain or France feared Russia they supported the Ottomans: when they did not they sought to bring down the "Sick Man of Europe, and plunder his territories. When after escaping Hapsburg rule the Dutch proved themselves to be capable merchants, skillful seamen and adventurous explorers, the British and French wasted no time in cutting down what they saw as a serious rival for their trade and colonial interests. Even religious issues did not get in the way of these very cold-blooded materialistic interests.

I agree that the democratic or open societies in the world do have common strategic interests particularly in this age in which we are confronted with secular or theocratic authoritarian governments in Africa and the Moslem world and parts of Asia. I believe that President Bush is correct in observing that Democracy, if it can be achieved, is the right remedy for the dilemmas confronting many Moslem states. However, history strongly suggests this factor alone does not trump other strategic factors. A common taste for democracy does not necessarily make for allies. The mere fact that France and Germany lobbied actively to frustrate support of our efforts in Iraq by other European states and, in effect, told Turkey that their support of our planned northern front in Iraq would threaten Turkey's potential for EU membership, tells the tale. These are not the actions of states that prefer other methods of achieving the same ends: they are the actions of enemies. And that is how the situation is increasingly being seen in the United States - and deservedly so.

We showed France far more consideration than she deserved at the end of WWII. The fact is that for most of the war the French were active collaborators with the Nazis - they were not our allies at all. It would be difficult to make the case that we have been fairly repaid by this historically faithless nation. I would never wish to see American lives or treasure put at risk for the benefit of France - under any circumstances. Germany is far better in that it has truly confronted its own history - the good and the bad. Moreover Germany has paid the price for rebuilding a shattered economy and later restoring the former GDR to modern standards.

I believe that Europe's fascination with the UN and international treaties and judicial procedure is an illusion, perhaps enhanced by its internal experience with the European Union. It is understandably motivated by the facts of Europe's ghastly history since the Thirty-Year's War. Other parts of the world do not have such motivation, and the remedies that may be most appropriate in Europe are not necessarily even beneficial in other parts of the world. (Events in Bosnia suggest they may not work even in Europe when the stakes are high.) Moreover in its attempts to organize bureaucratic and administrative solutions to problems that do not admit such solutions, Europe not only does practical harm, it ignores its own major part in creating the very problems it attempts to wave away. Finally when it bites its former benefactor in the back while it attempts to deal with malignancies of Europe's own creation, Europe fully earns the contempt it increasingly gets from thoughtful people.

These are harsh words and I do not mean any personal attack on you, Walter, or any of the many engaging and thoughtful European posters on these threads. I am speaking to historical truths and judgements, which I believe, will become increasingly clear in the years ahead.
 
 
And he is trying to refuse to go:

Refusing to Accept Loss in Election, Ukrainian Premier Looks to Courts

By Peter Finn
Washington Post Foreign Service
Tuesday, December 28, 2004; Page A16

KIEV, Ukraine, Dec. 27 -- Ukrainian Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych refused to accept defeat in the country's presidential election and vowed Monday to ask the Supreme Court to overturn the result, claiming that millions of his supporters were disenfranchised and that there was systematic fraud.

"I will never admit defeat," Yanukovych said at a Monday evening news conference, where he sternly rejected suggestions that he should give up. "It's an appalling fact when millions of citizens didn't vote. They were stripped of that right to vote."

A supporter of Ukraine's Viktor Yushchenko, holding a Polish flag, shouts at a rally in Kiev. Polish President Aleksander Kwasniewski was among the leaders to congratulate Yushchenko. (Alexander Zemlianichenko -- AP)

With 99.84 percent of the ballots counted, opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko had a commanding lead, with 52 percent of the vote to 44 percent for Yanukovych. Early Monday Yushchenko claimed victory while speaking to his supporters as a resigned mood swept Yanukovych's camp.

The Central Elections Commission cannot declare Yushchenko the official winner until all legal challenges are heard by the country's Supreme Court. That process could take several more weeks. Yanukovych has seven days to file a challenge.

The prime minister said 4.8 million potential voters were not able to cast their ballots because of new electoral laws that restricted voting by the disabled and the use of absentee ballots by people unable to make it to the polls.

Those measures, adopted by parliament before Sunday's runoff, were designed to limit fraud, but Yanukovych said the new regulations violated the constitution and became an insurmountable barrier for the disabled. He claimed eight sick people died after arriving at polling stations.

"Who will take responsibility for the people who perished?" he said..........

Full story here:

 http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/articles/A28759-2004Dec27.html?nav=rss_world 
 
 
 
"I will never admit defeat," Yanukovych said
 

Sounds eerily familiar. Is it okay if I call him a scumbag?  
 
 
 
 
"I will never admit defeat," Yanukovych said
 

Sounds eerily familiar. Is it okay if I call him a scumbag?  
 

Well, I guess he's got as much right as Yushchenko had to challenge results he thinks are fraudulent... not that I think he's got a leg to stand on, considering the vote margin and the thousands of election observers from around the world saying things went more fairly / regularly this time round..
 
 
I shouldn't have posted that here. This thread contains one of the better discussions on A2K. Had I realized the conversation stopped there, I would have deleted it.  
 
 
 
Today the Supreme Court of Ukraine dismissed without consideration the first complaint of Yanukovych (in total, they seem to be four).

The first knock-down for Yanukovych from the Supreme Court

Today the Supreme Court of Ukraine dismissed without consideration the first complaint of Yanukovych (in total, they seem to be four).

This was reported by the chief of the press service of the Supreme Court, Liana Shlaposhnikova.
 
 source 
 
 
I also, off the cuff, wouldn't preclude Yanukovich's right to contest the elecion--but if what we've heard is correct--there was widespread fraud with tens of witnesses over a vast area in the Nov election. Good cause for the Orange Revolution.

No such fraudulent behavior has been reported in this recent election. (Of course, Yanukovich and some supporters accuse--but no widespread reports and exit polling disparities, as with the Nov election.)

Still watching with interest.

I trust their courts will weed it out shortly.
 
 
Watching - and waiting for my colleague from the Ukraine to get back to the office. I want to hear her stories.
 
 
Hope you'll share, ehBeth. I can't imagine what it must be like to experience times like these.
 
 
It's a bizarrely exciting time. I'm waiting for N to get back with her news about the Ukraine election (and her observations). At the same time, I'm talking to my ex-colleagues who have lost family in Sri Lanka (Toronto has a very large Tamil community). One friend called today - a section of his extended family lost at least 20 members - parts of 4 generations that lived in two neighbouring houses.

from my favourite site  h2g2 link 
 
 
<Poked at your sight. Looks innersting.>
 
 
Still waiting for N to return.
Getting anxious.

Interesting site - interesting times we live in.
 
 
AP is reporting that Ukraine's Supreme Court has rejected all appeals by Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych against Sunday's presidential revote, won by opposition leader Viktor Yushchenko.
 
 
 
Election commission rejects Yanukovych appeal

CTV.ca News Staff

Both the Ukrainian Supreme Court and the country's Central Election Commission have rejected complaints filed by Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych over last Sunday's presidential runoff election.

The Supreme Court rejected found complaints filed by Yanukovych's team over alleged voting irregularities, refusing to even consider two of them.

"Two complaints were not considered because the proper time frame for submitting them was not respected," spokeswoman Liana Shlyaposhnikova said. "One was turned down because the demands submitted by the plaintiff were not clearly drawn up."

The Central Election Commission soon followed suit, dismissing Yanukovych's 27 volumes of complaints. He alleged that thousands of eligible voters, mainly disabled and sick, were blocked from casting their ballots.

"The Central Election Commission rules that the complaint by presidential candidate Viktor Yanukovych on irregularities ahead of voting will not be considered. The other parts of the complaint are also rejected," deputy CEC head Maryna Stavniychuk said. All 15 members backed the decision.

Now that the Supreme Court has rejected all of Yanukovych's complaints, they are cleared to declare Yushchenko the winner of the latest vote.

Yanukovych has been refusing to accept the results of the runoff vote in which pro-Western candidate Viktor Yushchenko scored a solid majority victory of more than two million votes.

Yanukovych has vowed to never concede defeat and is expected to continue to challenge the result, despite Thursday's developments.

Despite Yanukovych's protest, there were few reports of fraud in Sunday's voting, in sharp contrast to criticism over November's runoff vote.

But Yanukovych refuses to step down. He has dismissed a Dec. 1 parliamentary vote of no confidence which gives him a maximum of 60 days to resign.

"It is a matter of my principle not to submit a resignation," Yanukovych told reporters. "I know why they insist on that... they are shivering with fear."
Ukrainian media reports Viktor Yanukovych may take a leave of absence, but the pro-Russian prime minister's team denies it, saying he'll continue in his role.

But, when it comes to official government work, Yanukovych said his finance minister and deputy prime minister were "directly in charge."

Yanukovych had been declared the winner of a second-round presidential vote on Nov. 21. But, when hundreds of thousands of Yushchenko supporters claimed electoral fraud during mass protests, the country's Supreme Court invalidated the result.

On Wednesday, Yushchenko's ally Yulia Tymoshenko, known for her radical stance, travelled to the eastern Ukrainian city of Donetsk, Yanukovych's hometown. She answered a series of hostile questions during a live television interview.

There are reports that Yushchenko will offer Tymoshenko the prime minister's job in his government. But Yushchenko denied it, saying on TV5, "It's too early to begin with names."

Tymoshenko has gained a reputation as a politician who delivers fiery rhetoric. Observers say giving her the job might exacerbate tension between the two sides.

With files from the Associated Press
 
 Source 
 
 
 
 
Gotta feelin' this is just the end of the openin' game. The middle game is where it all happens. 'Bout all thats happened so far is both players have sacrificed a couple pawns to fully unmask their cardinal pieces. Remember - whatever shirt they're wearin', these players are at end Russians, and know and love chess. Stay tuned for further developments.
 
 
 
It's over.
 

Good news good news. Way to start the new year.

 
Gotta feelin' this is just the end of the openin' game. The middle game is where it all happens. 'Bout all thats happened so far is both players have sacrificed a couple pawns to fully unmask their cardinal pieces. Remember - whatever shirt they're wearin', these players are at end Russians, and know and love chess. Stay tuned for further developments.
 

Well, although the geostrategics around all this have been an interesting thing to see emerged momentarily in the open, there's also the pesky matter of the Ukrainian people fighting election fraud, restoring their power over the process, their ownership of their state - voting (in intent, if nothing else), for radical change - of a rarely precedented show of popular engagement and commitment in the country's democracy and, dare I say, the people's heroic success... it's not all just the cynicisms of strategic chess players...
 
 
<heart swells>
 
 
 
Gotta feelin' this is just the end of the openin' game. The middle game is where it all happens. 'Bout all thats happened so far is both players have sacrificed a couple pawns to fully unmask their cardinal pieces. Remember - whatever shirt they're wearin', these players are at end Russians, and know and love chess. Stay tuned for further developments.
 

I greatly fear that you're right, Timber. It ain't over til it's over. And Putin's not the type to just resign from a chess game.
 
 
I guess I'm not sure what we're categorizing as over or not over.

The election is over. Surely, geopolitical wrangling of all kinds in all locations will go on as long as humans inhabit the earth.

Are any of you suggesting that Yuschenko will not be sworn in?
 
 
 
White House Withholds Ukraine Recognition

Thursday January 6, 2005

WASHINGTON (AP) - The Bush administration is withholding recognition of pro-Western Viktor Yushchenko as Ukraine's new president until all complaints and challenges filed by his opponent are resolved by the country's central election commission.

Even after Ukraine's Supreme Court on Thursday rejected opponent Viktor Yanukovych's appeal of the run-off election Dec. 26 that Yushchenko carried, the State Department said it was not ready to recognize Yushchenko as the new president.

Despite the court's ruling, the election commission still has not certified final results, said the department's deputy spokesman, Adam Ereli. ``Until it does, we are really not in a position to comment on the final results of the election,'' Ereli said.
 
 Source 
 
 
"I do not have a dog in this fight! See!" George Bush
 
 
Dubya doesn't want to offend his bosom buddy, Putin, who does have 'a dog in this fight.'
 
 
 
Karimov congratulates Yushchenko on his election victory

TASHKENT. Jan 8 (Interfax) - Uzbek President Islam Karimov has congratulated Viktor Yushchenko on his victory in the Ukrainian presidential elections, Karimov's office told Interfax on Saturday.

"It is a great pleasure to congratulate you on your election to the high post of Ukrainian president," says Karimov's message to Yushchenko.

Karimov conveyed "the feelings of profound respect to the people of Ukraine, who demonstrated their unbending character and political willingness to advance along the chosen path of independence, democracy and renewal in the dramatic elections."

"I am convinced that mutually advantageous cooperation between Uzbekistan and Ukraine, based on traditional partnership, will be further developed in the interests and to the benefit of our two nations," said Karimov.
 
 Source 
 
 
<breathing very cautiously>

This is still a bit of a delicate apple cart. That the second vote happened is marvellous. That the results are being accepted externally is grand. Now to keep an eye on the eastern regions. There's apparently still some fussing there. (nothing I can link to, since it's coming from my colleague's report on phone calls with friends inthe region <must google>) Hopefully, the opening up of the media in all areas of Ukraine will convince folks in the Eastern Region that this is truly going to be a good thing for them.
 
 
Of course in some respects it might simply not be going to be a good thing for them.

I mean - more democracy, more free information, less corruption (we're hoping those will be prime achievements of what's happened now and what a government-Yushchenko will accomplish) are all good for everyone. But the Easterners were not wholly being irrational. As Prime Minister, it appears Yanukovich has kinda gone out of his way to ensure a good deal, budget-wise, in terms of economic policy decisions, for his homebase regions in the East. Yushchenko will not.

Furthermore, Yushchenko, who when he did still co-operate with Kuchma as Prime Minister himself made a name for himself running a fairly strict and succesful market reform policy, can be expected to take that further now. And a market-oriented "rationalisation" of economic state policy might well turn out fairly disadvantageous for the East with its many coal mines, its concentration of heavy industry, etc.

Shopkeepers and small business owners for obvious reasons were for Yushchenko. Forgetting about democracy and just focusing on bread and butter issues, the miners in the East in turn, aside from fear-mongering, prejudice etc, also had rational enough reasons to support Yanukovych.
 
 
Thanks nimh. That helps make some of the recent comments from my colleage make sense (more for me than her - she's simply incensed that the Eastern Region might not be on board). More careful breathing - don't wanna tip anything over.
 
 
Former Ukrainian Prime Minister Viktor Yanukoych Friday filed one last appeal over the December 26 presidential re-vote with the Ukrainian Supreme Court a final legal bid to stop the inauguration of opposition leader and apparent election winner Viktor Yushchenko. Ukraine's Central Election Commission certified the vote last week, but the Supreme Court stepped in and halted formal publication of the results to allow Yanukoych's latest legal action. Yushchenko, who has directed his supporters to take down their tent-camp in downtown Kyiv that was the center of protests after the initial November run-off, has accused Yanukovych of "torturing" the country by his multiple appeals, of which there have been at least 12 to this point. The latest appeal, complete with 600 pounds of supporting documentation, was delivered to the court by min-van this morning. The high court judges now have five days to make a ruling.

 
Ukraine: Yanukovych Files Last Legal Appeal By Lisa McAdams
Kiev
14-January-2005

Ukraine's former Prime Minister, Viktor Yanukovych, has filed his last legal appeal with the Supreme Court over the December 26 rerun presidential election won by his rival, opposition candidate Viktor Yushchenko. The appeal has been eagerly awaited because once it is heard, it clears the way for the winner's inauguration.

Mr. Yanukovych's lawyer, Nestor Shuffrych, delivered more than 600 pages of documents to court officials Friday morning, arriving in a mini van to accommodate the large load.

Mr. Yanukovych, who had his first-round win annulled for fraud by the Supreme Court, alleges the second round was just as full of violations and is seeking that it too be overturned. The Supreme Court now has five days to examine the appeal and issue a ruling.

The justices have already ruled against at least 12 of Mr. Yanukovych's other appeals. But he has refused to concede.

Submission of this latest complaint has been repeatedly delayed in what Mr. Yushchenko's camp says is a deliberate attempt to prevent him from assuming office. Once the Supreme Court issues a ruling, parliament can set a date for the winners inauguration.
 
 Source 
 
 
I looked for updates on MSNBC. Can't find any--and Eurasia.net doesn't cover Ukraine.

Any updates, even though it may not be a blockbuster type story, would be appreciated.
 
 
The Ukraine Supreme Court announced Friday that on Monday morning Kyiv time it would hear the appeal filed earlier yesterday by former Prime Minister Yanukoych.

That's to latest re yesterday's post.

And today, the news is:

 
Charismatic Tymoshenko Says She Will Be Ukraine PM

By Ron Popeski

KIEV (Reuters) - Opposition leader Yulia Tymoshenko, who roused vast crowds during protests against election fraud, said on Saturday she believed she would be named prime minister once Viktor Yushchenko is finally inaugurated as president.

 
Leading Ukrainian opposition politician Yulia Tymoshenko gestures during a news conference in Kiev January 15, 2005. Tymoshenko, who roused crowds during mass demonstrations backing president-elect Viktor Yushchenko in November, told reporters she believed Yushchenko would nominate her as prime minister. (Gleb Garanich/Reuters)

Yushchenko, winner of last month's re-run of November's rigged presidential election, must weather a last legal challenge from loser Viktor Yanukovich before taking office. The Supreme Court is to examine Yanukovich's case on Monday, but the ex-premier said he has little chance of overturning the result.

Tymoshenko, 44, is seen as one of several possible candidates to take over government and begin implementing Yushchenko's agenda of cleaning up the ex-Soviet state's business affairs and moving closer to the West.

She said she believed her candidature would be put forward under an election pact she and Yushchenko struck last June.

"We concluded a formal agreement when we created our coalition, setting down our relations if we took power jointly," Tymoshenko, her blonde hair tied in a traditional Ukrainian braid, told a news conference.

"There is no ambiguity in this. It is all clearly written down in terms of the job of prime minister."

Asked whose name appeared in the accord, which reporters said they had not seen, she said: "I'll give you three guesses.

"I believe Viktor Andriyevich Yushchenko is an honest, moral politician and do not believe he will start by breaking a coalition agreement.

GAS PRINCESS

Known as the "gas princess" for her good looks and success in the energy business, she said her chances of being approved by parliament if nominated were "100 percent."

Yushchenko, a former prime minister, has accused Yanukovich of "torturing the nation" by persistently challenging the Dec. 26 vote. His staff hope to stage a grand inauguration which Tymoshenko said was likely to take place next Wednesday.

Yushchenko told an interviewer last month the coalition deal called for Tymoshenko's name to be put forward, but said a decision was subject to negotiation.

Hugely popular among nationalists, Tymoshenko is viewed with distrust by neighboring Russia and it is uncertain she could muster sufficient support in parliament. Her group controls 20 seats compared to about 100 for Yushchenko's Our Ukraine group.

Also viewed as a strong candidate is businessman Petro Poroshenko, a close aide of Yushchenko in Our Ukraine and head of parliament's budget committee. Others include two of the president-elect's campaign allies, Socialist Party leader Oleksander Moroz and technocrat Anatoly Kinakh.

Tymoshenko served as deputy prime minister while Yushchenko was head of government but was fired by President Leonid Kuchma, now leaving office after 10 years in power.

Charges of forgery and smuggling gas were brought against her in connection with her activities at the head of a private gas trading firm in the mid-1990s and an arrest warrant has been issued for her in Russia. She denounces the probes as baseless.
 
 Source 
 
 
Thanks, Walter. I guess its a good thing they're going to hear the complaint. The Yuschenko victory would be questionable in the minds of fewer people with an investigation.

Still, <concern>.

What impressions do people here have of this Gas Princess? Are the accusations against her baseless? Would value insights.

<Thanks for always being handy with a good article, Walter>
 
 
From an  January 4, 2005 article 

 
Before joining President Leonid Kuchma's foes, the 44-year-old Tymoshenko headed the now-defunct Unified Energy Systems, the country's predominant gas dealer, where she pushed through energy sector reforms that angered influential tycoons but won her praise from western observers.

Tymoshenko served as deputy prime minister under Pavlo Lazarenko, who was convicted in June in San Francisco of fraud, money-laundering and extortion. She was ousted from government in 2001, turning against Kuchma and forming a faction in the parliament.

Since 2001, prosecutors have opened several probes against her, and she was jailed briefly on charges of bribery, money-laundering, corruption and abuse of power while working for UES. She has dismissed the charges as politically motivated.

Tymoshenko warned Tuesday that some privatization deals would definitely be reconsidered under a Yushchenko presidency, including the sale earlier this year of Ukraine's largest steel mill, Kryvoryzhstal, to a consortium run by Kuchma's son-in-law. Several major international steel companies complained the auction was rigged.
 

Under the sam e date, a report by  Radio Free Europe/Radio Liberty 

 
Ukraine: Capable Or Crooked?
Yuliya Tymoshenko Leaves Few Unmoved
By Jeremy Bransten

Admired by her supporters as a charismatic leader and castigated by her opponents as a corrupt turncoat, Ukraine's Yuliya Tymoshenko leaves few people indifferent. Now, Tymoshenko, who does not mince words, says she expects to be Ukraine's next prime minister.

Prague, 5 January 2005 (RFE/RL) -- She has compared herself to Joan of Arc and called outgoing Ukrainian President Leonid Kuchma a "red-haired cockroach."

But Yuliya Tymoshenko can turn on the charm and win over an audience -- even in enemy territory -- as she demonstrated with a recent visit to the eastern city of Donetsk.

At the height of opposition demonstrations in Kyiv in December 2004 that forced a rerun of the presidential election, adoring crowds dubbed her the "Orange Princess."

Tymoshenko portrays herself as a tough-talking crusader, a passionate Ukrainian nationalist, and woman of the people who is on a mission to clean up the country's morass of government and business corruption.

It has been an amazing transformation.

A decade ago, Tymoshenko had no nationalist credentials. In fact, she spoke no Ukrainian and had no more than a pragmatic interest in politics. A trained economist from the eastern city of Dnipropetrivsk, she used her connections to former Prime Minister Pavlo Lazarenko to build a natural gas trading empire that made her the country's richest businesswoman -- until her ambitions ran up against the designs of President Leonid Kuchma.

RFE/RL regional analyst Jan Maksymiuk explains: "In the 1990s, Tymoshenko was generally perceived as one of the most powerful oligarchs in Ukraine. Reportedly, in 1996, when she was the chairwoman of Ukraine's Unified Energy Systems, her company controlled one-fourth of the Ukrainian economy. But then she got into conflict with other oligarchs who were supported by Kuchma, and her career as a businesswoman ended."

While her career as a businesswoman may have been cut short, she proved more deft than Lazarenko, who had to step down. He ended up fleeing the country, only to be tried and convicted on 29 extortion and money-laundering charges in the United States, which he is now appealing.

In 1999, Tymoshenko joined the new reformist cabinet of Prime Minister Viktor Yushchenko and turned against her former business partners with a vengeance. Tymoshenko was credited with forcing Ukraine's energy sector to pay back some $2 billion into state coffers and stripping the oligarchs of some of their power. "No doubt she's a pragmatist. But she's also a very passionate and determined pragmatist, and whatever she sets her eyes on, she goes for it in a big way."

Soon after she left the government in 2001, her legal troubles began. She was indicted on fraud and money-laundering charges and jailed for several weeks. A Kyiv judge eventually dismissed the charges against her.

Still, questions remain over what happened to Tymoshenko's share of the Unified Energy System profits.

"Nobody knows for sure. At one time, she was indicted for channeling more than $1 billion dollars abroad to foreign accounts. Some of those accounts were controlled by the infamous former Ukrainian Prime Minister Pavlo Lazarenko. She was also indicted for gas smuggling, tax evasion, and a lot of other crimes. But she was able to shake off all those allegations. Everybody believes that she's a very rich person in Ukraine. But apparently, she doesn't pursue any business activity right now," Maksymiuk says.

Observers say Tymoshenko's short time in prison and the destruction of her business empire by Kuchma's allies -- which she calls politically motivated persecution -- had a profound psychological impact.

While such events might have crushed weaker personalities, Tymoshenko used them as a springboard to forge a new identity as an opposition crusader and born-again nationalist advocate, complete with traditionally braided hair and flawless Ukrainian.

So who is the real Tymoshenko? Cunning business woman or genuine reformer?

That has yet to be determined. But one thing is for certain. She is one of the smartest public figures in Ukraine and has always been fiercely determined to attain her goals -- be they in business or politics.

"No doubt she's a pragmatist. But she's also a very passionate and determined pragmatist, and whatever she sets her eyes on, she goes for it in a big way -- in a very determined, systematic, and effective way," says Kataryna Wolczuk, a Ukraine analyst at Britain's University of Birmingham. "So from that point of view, when she was a 'gas princess,' she did it in an extremely competent way -- milking the system to the extent it was possible under Lazarenko. When she became the deputy prime minister and tried to deal with the system which was created in the mid-1990s, again she was extremely competent and effective. And she trampled on many vested interests in Ukraine. So, in a way, she is a pragmatist, but whatever she does, she does it without compromising, and that's perhaps her greatest strength. But from the outgoing regime's point of view, it's the greatest threat she presents to them."

Tymoshenko told The Associated Press that she has a formal agreement with Yushchenko that leaves no alternative than for her to become prime minister after he is inaugurated as the country's new president.

Wolczuk says this demand poses a dilemma for Yushchenko. She is more than competent, but her polarizing nature means it could be difficult for the Yushchenko camp to win enough support among former Kuchma backers, who fear her.

Ironically, says Maksymiuk, Tymoshenko could also prove a threat to Yushchenko himself -- especially if reforms that cut the president's powers are enacted as planned.

"In the longer term, yes. If Tymoshenko becomes prime minister and if the political reform goes into action, as it is planned in 2006, then, of course, Tymoshenko could become the most powerful figure in Ukraine. So, that's perhaps why she's willing to be prime minister," Maksymiuk says.

Yushchenko's office has so far declined to say who will be nominated for prime minister.
 

 Build Ukraine: Interview with Yuliya Tymoshenko (2003) 

 Ukraine Decission Makers: Tymoshenko Yulia [Blog] 

 BBC: Ukraine's 'goddess of revolution' 

 Yulia Timoshenko - personal website 
 
 
Thanks, Walter. I will read each one--but I'm really interested in your opinion. Which story do you find more credible about this woman who wants to be PM? Anybody?

Walter's articles certainly provide a lot of information to base an opinion on.
 
 
Russian authorities said todaythat they will pursue a bribery case against Yulia Tymoshenko, new Ukraine President Viktor Yushchenko's pick for prime minister.
Tymoshenko faces allegations that she tried to inflate the price of supply contracts with the Russian military when she headed Ukraine's energy grid. A Russian court has already issued an order for Tymoshenko's arrest should she ever visit Russia, and Russia's prosecutor-general has said that his office will continue to pursue the case, despite Tymoshenko's position as prime minister-designate.

 
Russia to pursue Tymoshenko case
By Damian Grammaticas
BBC News, Moscow

Russian authorities say they intend to pursue a criminal case for bribery against Yulia Tymoshenko, the Ukrainian MP nominated as prime minister.
Ms Tymoshenko was one of the leaders of the street protests that forced a re-run of the presidential election.

The announcement comes two days after the presidents of Ukraine and Russia staged a public show of reconciliation.

But it appears there will be serious difficulties in their relations after Ukraine's so-called orange revolution.

Russia's prosecutor-general says his office will continue to pursue a criminal case against Ms Tymoshenko, even though she is now Ukraine's prime minister-designate.

A court has already issued an order for her arrest if she visits Russia.

Radical's reward

Ms Tymoshenko has dismissed as politically-motivated accusations that she attempted to bribe officials in Russia's defence ministry when she was head of Ukraine's energy grid back in 1996.

It is alleged she wanted the officials to inflate the price of supply contracts with the Russian military by $80m (£42.5m).

At the start of this week, Ukraine's new President, Viktor Yushchenko, visited Moscow in an attempt to smooth over differences with President Vladimir Putin, who had openly backed his rival in the disputed election.

It surprised many that on the same day, Mr Yushchenko announced he had chosen Ms Tymoshenko to head his government. The choice is controversial and was bound to irritate Russia.

Ms Tymoshenko was one of the most radical and most prominent leaders of the month-long street protests in Ukraine's capital Kiev during the dispute over the presidential elections.

It is thought Mr Yushchenko has picked her to be prime minister to reward her for her role, and in the belief she can force through radical reforms.

But she is seen as an Ukrainian nationalist, and so is likely to alienate people in the Russian-speaking east and south of the country who backed Mr Yushchenko's rival in the election and who have close ties to Russia.
 

source:  BBC 
 
 
 
 
Yulia Timoshenko / Frame from First Channel

Created: 26.01.2005 MosNews

Russia's Prosecutor General said that Ukrainian acting Prime Minister Yulia Timoshenko still faces criminal charges in Russia, and that a court would decide whether to press forward with an arrest warrant.

"(Timoshenko's) criminal case will be investigated under the law," Prosecutor General Vladimir Ustinov told reporters, referring to charges of bribery involving Russian military officials.

Timoshenko was appointed by President Viktor Yushchenko on Monday after he won an election against the Kremlin-backed Viktor Yanukovich. Shortly after meeting President Vladimir Putin, Yushchenko said that he was certain his aide would not face problems from Russian authorities and that the matter was settled. Russian news agencies, meanwhile, quoted Kremlin officials as saying Putin was most likely to let the Timoshenko case go.

Ustinov on Wednesday was questioned on the issue by reporters, who wanted to know specifically whether Timoshenko faced a threat of arrest if she visited Russia. "It is the court, rather than the prosecutor's office, which orders an arrest," Reuters quoted him as saying.

Timoshenko has denied charges of bribing Russian military officials when she headed the Ukrainian electric power grid. She says the charges were politically motivated by enemies of herself and Yushchenko.

Officials, whom Timoshenko was alleged to have bribed according to the initial charges made in 2001, were themselves cleared by a Russian court in 2003.
 

source:  MosNews 
 
 
Thanks for the update. What do you think Walter? Politically motivated or not I mean?
 
 
I suppose, both sites can't wash their hands of it: seems, she was deeply connected with bribery, and Russia and oil/energy and justice..., well...  
 
 
Thanks for the take. I have no clue what to think... accept that... an ambivalent odor of possible corruption.... smells like true democracy to me!

 
 
 
Hey, Cheesehead! Where's your slabba chedda?
 
 
Had to package it up for safe keeping till next year. Worry not, it will be back! (I think the sight of it was torturing others, like Soz, as well as myself. :sad:)

 
 
 
Yep--Walter and OBill-- I was thinking she doesn't sound too nifty.

But, who does anymore...
 
 
the bribery/corruption was quite widely reported on in north-american business magazines some time ago. i don't think we can use a european or north-american point of view when looking at business practices in other countries (and even in north-america and europe there is plenty of corruption in business circles. all one has to do is open the business pages of the newspapers to read about the latest scandal). i think it'll take a few years - at least - before we can expect business practices in the ukraine(as an example) to become relatively free of corruption. hbg
 
 
Quite right, hamburger. In my experience with former USSR republics (and, frankly, that experience is extensive), their understanding of Western style capitalism in the early days was that it's a system where anything goes. I remember taking a group of Latvian educators from the new "schools of commerce" to a seminar at Harvard Business School in 1991 or 1992. They were surprised there was a course taught in "business ethics." To them, that seemed like an oxymoron. What I'm getting at is that laTimoshanka might well have violated some laws as well as standard business practices without being aware that she was doing anything wrong.
 
 
...without knowing she was doing anything wrong...

You're right, hbg and Merry. I would never have imagined one wouldn't know-- but, I guess if the whole thing is new...

<shrugs>

<feels like someone kicked me in the shin, and got away with it>

<However, they may be right about "business ethics">
 
 
 
A House Divided
The Orange Revolution is carving new fault lines between Old and New Europe that have nothing to do with war in Iraq.
 
 Source 
 
 
Ukraine prosecutors announced today that the criminal investigation into President Viktor Yushchenko's nominee for prime minister Yulia Tymoshenko and her family will be closed.
The investigations began in May 2004 following allegations that Tymoshenko attempted to bribe a judge to end court proceedings against a former associate. Prosecutors have also dropped fraud, embezzlement and tax evasion charges against Tymoshenko's husband and father-in-law.
Criminal charges are still pending against Tymoshenko in Russia, where she has been accused of bribing Russian Defense Ministry officials in the mid-1990s.

 
 

Prosecutor General closes criminal cases against Tymoshenko and her relatives
Jan 28, 15:10

Ukraine's Prosecutor General's Office has closed all criminal cases touching on acting Prime Minister Yulia Tymoshenko. Some of the cases go back eight years.

"It's enough. Let's put an end to it," said Prosecutor General Svyatoslav Piskun.

Piskun made the announcement on Jan. 28 in Kyiv.

He said that the cases were initiated in 1996, and looking into them has taken eight years. He said charges relating to Tymoshenko have been dropped in the United States.

Piskun underlined that criminal proceedings relating to Tymoshenko's relatives and closest circle had earlier been closed by the courts because of a lack of a corpus delicti.

"Having weighed the situation, we also dropped charges pertaining to Yulia Tymoshenko, because there isn't a corpus delicti in what she did," Piskun said.

Piskun said that the fact that the Rada had refused to countenance PGO appeals to arrest Tymoshenko testified that the charges were without basis.

The Prosecutor General also said no one is to blame for the long duration of the investigations, because the "process was moving along."

"A person shouldn't be terrorized for eight years. A person can't live his whole life under investigation," Piskun said, adding, "Therefore, I said enough. Let's put an end to it."

The Prosecutor General mentioned that the law is supposed to function under a presumption of innocence, and that if law enforcement organs aren't able to prove the guilt of the accused, then the case should be closed.

Piskun said the case had been closed before President Viktor Yushchenko named Tymoshenko acting prime minister. The decision, he said, had been taken in December, right after he became the Prosecutor General.

Despite the scotched cases in Ukraine and the possibility that she'll get to run the government, Tymoshenko remains in trouble in Russia. She's been mentioned in a Russian Interpol probe, in connection with charges that she allegedly bribed members of the Russian security services.

On Wednesday, Russia's Prosecutor General Vladimir Ustinov announced that charges would not be dropped against Tymoshenko, and that decisions about possibly arresting her would be made by Russian courts.

Asked whether the Tymoshenko investigations were politically motivated, Svyatoslav Piskin said: "I don't know. I didn't start them. I ended them, and thank god."
 
 Source 
 
 
Ukraine's attorney general, Svyatoslav Piskun, said Wednesday in an article published in Austria's Der Standard newspaper that he has evidence that newly-elected President Viktor Yushchenko was deliberately poisoned last year, and that it was probably a government plot. Last October, Ukrainian prosecutors dismissed Yushchenko's health as a case of food poisoning, but reopened their investigation after doctors in Vienna said that Yushchenko had suffered dioxin poisoning. Yuschenko later went on to defeat former Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich in a rerun presidential vote late last year.

 
Thursday February 10
Ukraine's Yushchenko probably poisoned by government: attorney general [/size]

Ukraine's attorney general reportedly says he has gathered proof that President Viktor Yushchenko was deliberately poisoned in a plot probably involving the government.

"There is no doubt that this was a planned act, which probably involved people from the government. Not everybody has access to such substances," Svyatoslav Piskun was quoted as saying in the Thursday edition of Der Standard daily, published on its website late Wednesday.

Piskun said he was in Vienna to speak with the doctors here who treated Yushchenko after he fell ill on September 6 while campaigning in the country's bitterly contested presidential vote.

The same doctors said in December that tests had shown Yushchenko, who was left with blisters and scars on his face, had suffered dioxin poisoning and said they suspected foul play.

"Today I obtained documents here that give us the medical proof that Yuschenko was poisoned," Piskun said, adding that the medical reports were compiled by experts in Austria, Britain, Germany and the Netherlands.

Yushchenko was probably poisoned around the time he attended a dinner in early September at which the former deputy chief of the Ukrainian secret service was present, he said.

"We have always known roughly when the poison was administered. But the meeting today with Doctor Nikolai Korpan, the doctor of President Yushchenko, brought us some proof. The time probably coincides with the dinner, but we cannot say that it was exactly this day," he told the newspaper.

Asked whether he had specific poisoning suspects in mind, he said: "The circle of suspects is so big that I do not want to leave anybody out and hurt their feelings."

Ukrainian public prosecutors in October dismissed Yushchenko's health crisis as a case of food poisoning but reopened their investigation after the Austrian doctors revealed their findings, shortly before he went on to defeat Viktor Yanukovich in a rerun presidential vote late last year.

Yushchenko claimed from the start that he was the victim of poisoning by political opponents, telling reporters: "The aim was to kill me."
 
 Source 
 
 
May God bless Ukrainian.
 
 
I'm not buying the "she didnt know" line re: Tymoshenko. Corruption and mafia-like bizness practices were rampant, of course, even considered "just the way one does business", but that doesnt mean that they sincerely believed it was innocent. Perhaps Merry Andrew's trainees, but not the major oligarch stuff. It was just that, you know, thats how a biznessmen got rich, standard practice. If you'd ask someone like Tymoshenko why she did it, I'm sure her most honest answer would be the classic "because I could" or "because everybody did it". But the papers, public etc were then already furious about it - one of the main reasons why Russians, for example, have turned away from Western-style democrats is that they've come to associate it with massive corrupt self-enrichment. I mean, everybody knew about Tymoshenko.

But - you know. You have to row with the oars you have, as we say here, I suppose. The traditional dissident intellectual type democrats, who did mostly keep their hands clean, they're just too marginal to ever get a hold on power in Russia or the Ukraine. I suppose that, whether you choose the Western-democratic orientation or the nationalist-authoritarian one, you just cant go around those oligarchs in these times. Sad but true. The other side is just as corrupt, and Tymoshenko at least as reinvented herself as the champion of some of the main political causes we'd sympathise with. But yeah - stay wary, and keep an eye out.
 
 
Since I just recounted this news snippet for my "Choose the news headline for the day" thread, I might as well post it here by ways of update to this thread:

 
On page 11 [of Dutch newspaper Trouw], " Doubts about 'resolution' Gongadze murder "; Gongadze was the critical Ukrainian journalist who was found beheaded in a forest a few years ago. Tapes that turned up soon after featured then-President Kuchma ordering to have Gongadze silenced; protest demonstrations, then still unsuccessful, followed. Post-Orange revolution, the new President Yushchenko ordered the case reopened and last Tuesday the Justice department announced the arrest of two former high-ranking police officials - a colonel and a general. Gongadze's car was found yesterday. The presidential bodyguard who 'outed' the Kuchma tapes and Gongadze's widow, both now in the US, still expressed scepticism about whether those who ordered the murder would be punished too, however; the former, Melnichenko, is refusing to return to testify because he fears for his life.
 
 
 
This amazingly interesting event, of course, took place just after I left The Netherlands. So I didnt get to be there. But I got the newsletter. Which is a very interesting and recommended (if long) read! And (Americans) don't let yourself be put off by the cheeky-cheeky choice of quotes to highlight the story - just a little provocation to catch your attention ;-).

The event was organised by the Alfred Mozer Stichting, the Dutch Labour Party's Eastern Europe bureau. (It's named after a Jewish socialist who fled to Holland and later became a prime mover for the Labour Party's then - strongly anti-communist - Eastern Europe policy).

 
AMS Newsletter
The digital newsletter of the Alfred Mozer Stichting

Extra edition: report on a unique event!
May 19th. 2005

Wave of Resistance: the birth of a new International!

On Saturday 14th. May De Balie in Amsterdam was filled with an audience of almost 300 people, to experience debates and documentaries about the rise of civic movements in Eastern Europe, the Caucasus and Central Asia. An impression of this sold-out event was also shown on  NOVA  national Dutch television.

By: Arjen Berkvens; Director & Alma Balesic, Maartje Schrama, project assistants Alfred Mozer Stichting

Wave of resistance Quotes:

-> Girgi Kandelaki (Kmara, Georgia): as Lenin said; revolution is organisation, organisation and organisation."

-> Vasila Inojatova (Birlik, Uzbekistan)since 9/11 you can blame Muslims for everything. That is what Islam Karimov does: he misuses the war against terrorism. Freedoms? Freedoms do not exist. In Uzbekistan the authorities fill in the ballot papers."

-> Oleh Kyriyenko (Pora! Ukraine) in reaction to the accusation that Pora! Accepted American funds: In case a child is dying and the only thing that can safe it is the kidney of a serial killer: would the mother refuse the kidney out of principle?"

-> André Gerrits (University of Amsterdam): International democracy promotion is partly altruistic and partly foreign policy self-interest. The idea is that it is advantageous to all: for a fist full of dollars democracy promotion strengthens the spread of democracy creates international stability and prosperity."

-> Mike Staresinic (Freedom House, Serbia Director): Congratulations on an outstanding forum for exploring this specific type of political change."

-> Arjen Berkvens, Maartje Schrama and Alma Balesic (AMS) Our conclusion is that money isn't everything. Without the power, bravery and sheer persistence of the people of these countries, nothing is possible. The credits for change therefore should go to the people of Serbia, Georgia and Ukraine and not to foreign powers."

Introduction

After the "electoral revolutions" in Serbia (2000), Georgia (2003) and Ukraine (2004), the civic youth movements that were in the frontline of the successful democratic revolutions received full attention. Representatives of  OTPOR!  (Serbia),  PORA!  (Ukraine),  KMARA  (Georgia),  Yox  (Azerbaijan),  Zubr  (Belarus), and activists from various organisations from Kyrgyzstan, Uzbekistan,  Albania , Turkmenistan and the Russian Federation were therefore invited to The Netherlands to talk about their long and painful struggle, their successes and their failures. Wave of Resistance was an event where they met representatives of political parties, universities, NGO's and political foundations. In workshops, private talks and after documentaries they debated their similarities, differences, allies and enemies, past, present and future. 300 people were present to share their experience and trigger them with arguments and questions.

Where activists learn, the regimes learn too!

Their struggle is still going on, under varying circumstances; sometimes under almost absolute dictatorship, sometimes in a more hybrid society where elements of liberal democracy and presidential authoritarianism go hand in hand. The fact that these circumstances differ so much makes it hard to generalise, but still some common elements are present in all countries. It seems that an "International Movement" of civic youth organizations has been created. Kmara in Georgia learned from OTPOR! in Serbia. ZUBR activists from Belarus and KMARA and OTPOR! veterans went to Ukraine to help out PORA! to spread their philosophy of non-violent resistance. The shadow-side is also visible. Where activists learn, the regimes learn too. They know what to expect and take measures to counter newly founded civic youth movements. They also take measures to stop international interference. International democracy support is a growing "industry" and receives more and more attention. The Alfred Mozer Foundation supported PORA! with training for instance. Freedom House supported OTPOR! and others. Critical questions are raised about this involvement. Is it morally right that democracy support is in the self-interest of the main western powers: the USA and the EU? Why do we support some and hesitate to support others? Is democracy more important than stability? Should the EU and the USA interfere in countries where The Russian Federation also has an interest? Do we harm these movements by paying too much attention to the international support, while in fact it is only a small contribution that can only have an effect in fertile soil?

The documentaries

The documentaries provided an intriguing insight in the movements in Serbia (Bringing down a Dictator by Steve York), Georgia, Serbia and Ukraine (The Anatomy of a Revolution by Alex Shprintsen), Ukraine (Pora!/ It's time! By Arnold van Bruggen a.o.) and Belarus (Ne Tarmazi by Gerhard Stoel a.o.) Interesting was that the documentaries also showed the differences in approach by the filmmakers and the countries they came from. From The Anatomy of a Revolution, a sceptic Canadian Documentary criticizing the US involvement in Serbia, Georgia and Ukraine, to a fast non-critical American promotion documentary:  Bringing down a dictator  showing the strategy and inspiration of Otpor! presented by Martin Sheen.

 The Anatomy of a Revolution  (introduced by Alex Shprintsen himself) compared the strategies of the three movements. This led to a discussion about the supposed similarities between these movements and whether the revolution in Serbia was a blueprint for revolutions elsewhere in Eastern Europe. Pora!/It's Time experienced its premiere at this event. The makers of the film went to Kiev during the demonstrations at Maidan, the main square in Kiev, and filmed the demonstrators, their activities, the tent camp and how they eventually won. This short film will be used as a campaign instruction movie for  BKB Campaign Company . It clearly gives you an insight in the enormous creative capabilities of the young PORA activists.

 Ne Tarmazi  compared the three student associations in Belarus, Zubr, The Belarus Student Association (BSA) and the Belarusian Patriotic Youth Union that is loyal to Lukashenka. This documentary was probably the most impressive. It showed under which circumstances Zubr and BSA fight against the so-called Lukashism of the regime. It gave an impression of underground actions and the difficulties of fighting for democracy under circumstances where there is almost no freedom to manoeuvre. It also raised questions about the use of Belarus national symbols (red and white flag and language) as opposed to the Soviet symbols and the use of the Russian language by the regime.

In addition, two short documentaries were presented to our audience, which were made by Otpor! and Zubr about their respective movements.

The debate

The debate started at 20.00 hours and lasted till 22.30. It included three sessions. First was titled Success Stories, activists from Otpor!, Kmara and Pora! answered questions from the chairman Arjen Berkvens (Director AMS) and the audience. The second session, Inspired Movements, was led by our guests from Zubr, Yox and Yabloko.

Although these movements had and have to operate under different circumstances, the similarities were striking. All are non-hierarchical, use humour as their main weapon, are non-violent and are not connected to any political party (except in the very specific Russian case.)  Gene Sharp  Concluding remarks

Although everybody agrees that substantial support is given (estimates are that almost 2 billion euros is spend on all sorts of democracy support annually), the effects of it are strongly debated. Some like to play it down, some like to exaggerate the importance. Others stress the fact that money isn't everything. Transfer of knowledge, training and facilitating the dissemination of information all play a major role. Besides that the human capital is crucial. Later that evening the Dutch news programme NOVA showed an item on the Wave of resistance with interviews and impressions. Their main argument was that these revolutions are instigated by the USA and strongly backed by US money. This is certainly a too simplistic way of looking at the events and does not take into account the influence the European Union and The Russian federation also have in the countries discussed. The Russians spend more than one billion dollar to back Yanukovich in Ukraine, outspending the USA and the EU by far. Still Yushchenko and his coalition won. We have to avoid simplistic schemes and overcome our ideological biases.

Our conclusion is that money isn't everything. Without the power, bravery and sheer persistence of the people of these countries, nothing is possible. The credits for change therefore should go to the people of Serbia, Georgia and Ukraine and not to foreign powers.
 
 
 
Concluding remarks are right on!

<at least from what I hear from my friends from the Ukraine. Family and friends of one are coming over soon, and I can't wait to talk to them about what's been going on - from their perspective>
 
 
Re: Ukraine's Yushchenko probably poisoned by government

 
THE TIMES
July 01, 2005

Suspicion shifts from Russia over poison used on leader
BY GILES WHITTELL
The investigation continues but Viktor Yuschenko's would-be killer found his dioxin in Ukraine TOXIC WASTE
399BC Socrates was forced to drink a vial of hemlock when condemned for corrupting the youth of Athens with his teachings
AD54 The Roman Emperor Claudius was murdered by his wife Agrippina, who fed him a dish of mushrooms laced with poison. Her son, Nero, succeeded him
1815 Napoleon Bonaparte died in exile on St Helens. A study found abnormal traces of arsenic in his hair, suggesting that he had been given non-lethal doses to hasten his death

 

Source:
 TIMES ONLINE: Suspicion shifts from Russia over poison used on leader, Page 1  and
 TIMES ONLINE: Suspicion shifts from Russia over poison used on leader, Page 2 
 
 
 
Simferopol Stories: Bent cops and language wars in a divided town

By Mary Dejevsky
Published: 17 July 2005

If charm and elegance define your idea of a desirable city, Simferopol will not meet your requirements. It is almost as though this scruffily rambling conurbation has been called upon to balance the delights of the increasingly chic resorts just an hour's drive over mountains to the south. In so many ways, the capital of the Crimea has caught the short straw.

It has the airport, railway station and road junction through which most holiday-makers must pass to reach the sea; at any one time a large number of those thronging its streets are just passing through. It was only lightly touched by Ukraine's Orange revolution. Lenin still lords it over the square in front of the government buildings. And, although capitalism has made its mark, with casinos, money-changing booths and cafes every few yards, the city is undisguisedly poor. Jewellery shops tempt customers inside with offers to exchange old baubles for new and a store has cornered the market in "second-hand European clothes".

Its mixed identity falls short of feeling cosmopolitan. While the rest of Ukraine is divided relatively neatly, with Russian-speakers predominating in the east and Ukrainian-speakers in the West, in the Crimea there is a three-way split: Russians, Ukrainians and the Tatar population compete for public money, space and political power. After the Orange revolution, the Russians, at almost 60 per cent, feel displaced. The Ukrainians feel at once vindicated and apprehensive, while the Tatars, who started returning in the 1980s from the Central Asian exile into which they had been brutally forced by Stalin, are trying to reclaim their old land, or any land at all. All these tensions converge in Simferopol.

* * *

Two blonde girls in their late teens sit at a card table on Rosa Luxembourg street, chatting and preening in the sunshine. The placard behind them explains that they are collecting signatures for a petition; 220,000 already collected in two weeks. Its purpose is to press for an amendment to the Ukrainian constitution that would enshrine Russian as joint official language with Ukrainian. To pass, an amendment needs the support of three-quarters of Ukraine's 400 MPs.

The petition is designed to put pressure on local MPs. "If they don't support it, we'll campaign to throw them out," says one girl. With parliamentary elections in March, and Ukraine still a simmering political cauldron, this is no idle threat. An elderly woman stops to sign. She complains that all prescription labels are now in Ukrainian and she cannot understand them.

* * *

Russians have treated the Crimean resorts as their summer playground since the 19th century, and still do, even though they now have to cross a border, change their roubles into hryvny and pay Ukraine's higher prices. With car ownership now common, thousands of Russians make the long trek south at this time of year. Reading between the lines of the local newspaper, it seems that their passage through Simferopol and its environs has become a nice little earner for the local traffic police.

After complaints from Russian drivers that they were being importuned by bent Ukrainian cops - accusations hotly denied by local police chiefs - encounters between police and drivers were secretly recorded.

The result? More than 500 "breaches of discipline" registered across 365 encounters. The police authority is now appealing to holidaymakers not to "tempt" the cops or to break the law by "offering a bribe".

If things don't improve, Ukraine's Interior Minister, Yuri Lutsenko, has threatened to drive around in a Russian-registered car to test the southern charm of his officers for himself. He says that if he comes across any rude or corrupt behaviour, he will withdraw all the traffic cops from Crimea for the summer.

"Whoopee," says a local reporter, "then we really will have a ball."

If charm and elegance define your idea of a desirable city, Simferopol will not meet your requirements. It is almost as though this scruffily rambling conurbation has been called upon to balance the delights of the increasingly chic resorts just an hour's drive over mountains to the south. In so many ways, the capital of the Crimea has caught the short straw.

It has the airport, railway station and road junction through which most holiday-makers must pass to reach the sea; at any one time a large number of those thronging its streets are just passing through. It was only lightly touched by Ukraine's Orange revolution. Lenin still lords it over the square in front of the government buildings. And, although capitalism has made its mark, with casinos, money-changing booths and cafes every few yards, the city is undisguisedly poor. Jewellery shops tempt customers inside with offers to exchange old baubles for new and a store has cornered the market in "second-hand European clothes".

Its mixed identity falls short of feeling cosmopolitan. While the rest of Ukraine is divided relatively neatly, with Russian-speakers predominating in the east and Ukrainian-speakers in the West, in the Crimea there is a three-way split: Russians, Ukrainians and the Tatar population compete for public money, space and political power. After the Orange revolution, the Russians, at almost 60 per cent, feel displaced. The Ukrainians feel at once vindicated and apprehensive, while the Tatars, who started returning in the 1980s from the Central Asian exile into which they had been brutally forced by Stalin, are trying to reclaim their old land, or any land at all. All these tensions converge in Simferopol.

* * *

Two blonde girls in their late teens sit at a card table on Rosa Luxembourg street, chatting and preening in the sunshine. The placard behind them explains that they are collecting signatures for a petition; 220,000 already collected in two weeks. Its purpose is to press for an amendment to the Ukrainian constitution that would enshrine Russian as joint official language with Ukrainian. To pass, an amendment needs the support of three-quarters of Ukraine's 400 MPs.
The petition is designed to put pressure on local MPs. "If they don't support it, we'll campaign to throw them out," says one girl. With parliamentary elections in March, and Ukraine still a simmering political cauldron, this is no idle threat. An elderly woman stops to sign. She complains that all prescription labels are now in Ukrainian and she cannot understand them.

* * *

Russians have treated the Crimean resorts as their summer playground since the 19th century, and still do, even though they now have to cross a border, change their roubles into hryvny and pay Ukraine's higher prices. With car ownership now common, thousands of Russians make the long trek south at this time of year. Reading between the lines of the local newspaper, it seems that their passage through Simferopol and its environs has become a nice little earner for the local traffic police.

After complaints from Russian drivers that they were being importuned by bent Ukrainian cops - accusations hotly denied by local police chiefs - encounters between police and drivers were secretly recorded.

The result? More than 500 "breaches of discipline" registered across 365 encounters. The police authority is now appealing to holidaymakers not to "tempt" the cops or to break the law by "offering a bribe".

If things don't improve, Ukraine's Interior Minister, Yuri Lutsenko, has threatened to drive around in a Russian-registered car to test the southern charm of his officers for himself. He says that if he comes across any rude or corrupt behaviour, he will withdraw all the traffic cops from Crimea for the summer.

"Whoopee," says a local reporter, "then we really will have a ball."
 
 Source 
 
 
Part two of above

 
Revolutions are dangerous things, even when they are peaceful and bathed in an orange glow. Six months after Viktor Yushchenko's inauguration as democratically elected president of Ukraine, his government seems to have lost much of its early sense of purpose.

On the surface, the capital, Kiev is still high on the euphoria of "people power". Independence Square is a dawn to dusk festival starring hundreds of Ukrainians from all over the world feeling good about being Ukrainian.

You want a book by or about Yushchenko? No problem. A bust, a portrait? Pick the size, and take one of the Prime Minister, Julia Tymoshenko, while you are at it. The religious pictures and small, reproduction icons are laid out adjacent to the portraits of the revolutionary duo: the icons of yesterday and today, side by side.

But the chat behind the stalls is no longer uncritical. "Were you there?" One excited visitor asked a rough-hewn seller of folk music CDs. "Yes," he replied slowly, "and the crowds were unbelievable: they covered the square and went way down the Khreshchatik" (Kiev's renowned main thoroughfare). He went on: "And you know what: they set up stalls selling beer every few yards and there weren't any loos, and you can just imagine what it was like."

The disappointment is echoed in the columns of newspapers that had once been lavish in their support for the orange batallions. The revolution belonged in part to them, because it was they who insisted the elections conform to the law and then ensured that they did.

But it also belonged to Ukraine's young urban population, who saw in Mr Yushchenko and Ms Tymoshenko not only a different future for themselves and their country but a future in which they and Ukraine would be part of Europe. Of course, it was always going to be hard for the orange revolution to live up to the expectations invested in it. And, like the somewhat hazy and idealised vision of Europe, those expectations were often ill-defined. So far as the intelligentsia was concerned, they hoped above all for an end to the pervasive corruption. Many journalists hoped for the freedom to report as they wished, and without any financial constraints.

Such aspirations were utopian. But many Ukrainians - not only those who had flocked in person to Independence Square - had convinced themselves they had accomplished a revolution and thought that after December everything would be possible.

For those now swelling the ranks of doubters, all that the new government has produced to reward their heroic efforts in the snow are price rises, leadership squabbles and a series of excited and ill thought-out policy moves based on a free-market ideology very few Ukrainians fully understand.

Top of the list of misfired government initiatives is the review of earlier company privatisations, which were widely seen as corrupt. To the population at large, it seemed so simple: just confiscate the ill-gotten gains from the millionaire oligarchs and spread the largesse around. For an elected government, operating - or trying to operate - in an international context, however, it is not so easy. How can privatisations be reversed without destabilising Ukraine's fragile market and discouraging wary foreign investors? The prime example is the country's largest steel mill, Kryvorizhstal, sold last year for what was regarded as an unfairly low price to a consortium that included the then president's son-in-law and, in effect, renationalised last month. A new auction has been promised but the timing and mechanics seem to change by week, if not by the day, and lawsuits are already looming. Responsibility for reviewing privatisations rests with the prime minister, Julia Tymoshenko, herself a first-wave "oligarch" who has sworn henceforward to work by the book.
The President and Prime Minister had intended that 14 economic bills would be passed into law before the summer recess. They were crucial to fulfilling the conditions for membership of the World Trade Organisation and an integral part, too, of the "action plan" drafted by the European Union as a preliminary to agreeing a start date for talks on EU accession.

In the last week before the recess, however, the Rada descended into shouting and brawling between pro-Yushchenko reformers and their opponents.

Worse, all the antagonism produced only eight new laws. The one regarded as most crucial for WTO membership, on copyright, was passed but the rest have been held over until the autumn.

If, as some expect, the March elections reflect disillusionment with Mr Yushchenko and do not produce a more reformist parliament, then any chance of legislating for serious restructuring of the economy, let alone of early EU accession, could be lost for several years.

Among Mr Yushchenko's many foreign patrons, there is deep concern that progress is not nearly so fast as had been hoped. One visiting US dignitary with an interest in the success of the "revolution" said: "These people just don't know how to do politics. They are not schooled in the techniques and the necessary give and take".

He was not alone in his frustration. There is a growing consensus in Ukraine that Mr Yushchenko and Ms Tymoshenko have frittered away much of their political capital. If they cannot regain momentum in the autumn, there is a real risk Ukraine will sink back into inertia.

After a series of political and diplomatic gaffes last December, President Putin has left Ukraine to its own devices. Suggestions that Russia was involved in the murder of Ukraine's most celebrated investigative journalist, Georgy Gongadze, or in the dioxin poisoning of Mr Yushchenko before the election have been rebutted. Probably it was always unreasonable to expect tangible results from the Orange revolution so soon. But Mr Yushchenko's options for rallying his disappointed cohorts are decreasing. His call earlier this week for a comprehensive reorganisation of law enforcement, to include the disbanding of the notoriously corrupt traffic police, looked more like a crowd-pleaser than a serious blueprint for change.

Challenged to say what the government had achieved, the head of the Crimean administration, Ivan Matvienko, snapped at a local reporter: "You don't plant a potato one day, then dig it up the next because you are feeling peckish."

 
 source 
Part two to follow
 
 
Andriy Yushchenko -- Son of God?
Here is an article that has recently caused much debate in the Ukraine (nothing is new in this world!):

 
 

Source:  Andriy Yushchenko -- Son of God? 
 
 
<double post>
 
 
Thanks for reminding us to pay attention, SerSo and Walter. You double printed that last story though, Walter. I must say; I like the "Son of God" thing. It kind of screams "free press", doesn't it?
 
 
Thanks, Bill!
 
 
Walter, I think you need not have deleted your previous post. Occom Bill has only said that you just made a double copy of that article from "The Independent".
 
 
Yes Walter, the quote was a very good read, but repeated in it's entirety within the quote is all.
 
 
In the category "weird" (translated from German):

Porn movie about heroes of the revolutions in Georgia and the Ukraine

Moscow (AFP) - Russian nationalists have found an unconventional way to avenge the democratic revolutions in the neighbouring states Georgia and the Ukraine: they have made two of the revolutions' leaders, Georgian President Michail Saakaschwili and Ukrainian Prime Minister Julia Timoschenko, main actors in a porn movie. In the film, the two secretly meet for political talks in Moscow and subsequently for some hands-on boy-on-girl action in a chopper above the Russian-Georgian border. According to producer Alexander Walow the recording of the film, "Julia", will start in Moscow next week.
 
 
Do they have libel laws over there?
 
 
Since this thread has at times also become a place to discuss democratic change in other former Soviet countries, I want to post this here; it's a fascinating article about Byelorussian dissident rock musicians, the banning of century-old church communities by Lukashenka, the power of Poland's old Solidarity as a symbol and a source of inspiration, and the bold efforts of the Polish government to use its new clout to push the EU into a much more assertive line on Byelorussia. (And its written by someone who shows off being well versed in the region's cultural landscape, even digging out a parallel to Czechoslovakia's legendary underground band, the Plastic People of the Universe.)

 Letter from Warsaw: Belarussians hoping to rock toward change 
 
 
 Corruption?....already making public accusations... 

cynical sardonica/A true sign they have installed a proper democracy./cynical sardonica
 
 
Interesting observation on a radio programme I heard this morning that it's easy to sack bent traffic cops but the will to sort out the rest of the political corruption in Ukraine seems to be difficult. Given the success of the Orange Revolution and its hopes and dreams I find that very depressing.
 
 
Excerpts from a good AP story...

 
 Yushchenko's Popularity Slides in Ukraine 

By MARA D. BELLABY, Associated Press Writer

KIEV, Ukraine - Maria Onishchuk rushed to Kiev's Independence Square last fall to stand shoulder to shoulder with tens of thousands, waving orange flags and chanting "YU-SHCHEN-KO!"

Nine months later, she's back. But now, the 60-year-old grandmother is standing under the red flag of Ukraine's Socialist Party, demonstrating against the man she helped usher into the presidency.

Disappointment is catching up with President Viktor Yushchenko, whose 7-month-old government is being battered by corruption allegations, political infighting and economic problems.

"We thought life would get better... but it turns out the Orange Revolution was just a fairy tale," Onishchuk said at a protest this week.

Prices are rising, and the economy is slowing. Yushchenko's chief of staff quit, warning that a corrupt circle of advisers surrounds the president. The head of the powerful Security and Defense Council resigned Thursday for the same reason. [..]

The center's latest poll, conducted a month ago, found that for the first time since the Orange Revolution, the percentage of Ukrainians who think the country is headed in the wrong direction exceeds those who think it is in good shape.

Forty-three percent said Ukraine is on the wrong path, a jump from 23 percent in April. About 32 percent felt the country is doing well, down sharply from 54 percent last spring. [..]

The poll was conducted before the latest corruption allegations against Yushchenko's administration, which was swept to power largely on his promise to root out the corruption that thrived under his predecessor, Leonid Kuchma.

Yushchenko also promised to create a million jobs a year, raise living standards and put Ukraine's 48 million people on equal footing with their powerful neighbor, Russia.

Even supporters say he overreached.

"No government in the world could deliver on all the expectations. Some were really irrational," said Inna Pidluska, a political analyst at the Europe Foundation. [..]

Prime Minister Yulia Tymoshenko, responsible for the government's day-to-day business, decided on a populist course of raising monthly pensions, paying off salary arrears and boosting other spending.

But as the government bumps up its spending, the economy is slowing. The official projection now says the economy will grow by about 6 percent this year, half the gain of 2004.

Analysts think Yushchenko is likely to opt for more short-term spending programs to appease voters because he needs to do well in March parliamentary elections. Constitutional changes will hand many of his powers to lawmakers.

But another populist budget could derail economic reforms being demanded by foreign investors. Parliamentary Speaker Volodymyr Lytvyn warned that Ukraine can't afford another year of such a "social budget."

Ukrainians are gloomy over the rising cost of food, utilities and fuel. The government's decision to strengthen the currency, the hryvna, against the dollar ate away at the buying power of its salary and pension increases.

"Even salo is becoming unaffordable," complained Onishchuk, referring to the seasoned lard that Ukrainians consider a staple. The price for a pound has jumped from 72 cents to $2.55, she said. [..]

For all the disappointment, Ukrainians still like Yushchenko significantly more than Kuchma, whose approval rating was around 10 percent. Yushchenko's ratings vary, but most polls say more than 50 percent of Ukrainians approve of at least some of his moves [..].

"I'm not a romantic, I understand it takes time," said Oleh Skripka, lead singer of the popular band Vopli Vidoplyasova, which performed on Independence Square during the Orange Revolution protests.

This year, Skripka turned down a request for a repeat performance for the parliamentary vote.

"I do want to help the new government... but (it) needs to get back in touch with the people who really took it to heart, who suffered for its success," Skripka said.
 
 
 
This is how  Mosnews  reports:

 
Ukraine's Yushchenko Fires Tymoshenko's Government
Created: 08.09.2005 13:58 MSK (GMT +3), Updated: 14:03 MSK

Ukrainian President Viktor Yushchenko said on Thursday he was sacking the government of Prime Minister Yulia Tymoshenko, Reuters reports.

He made the announcement at a news conference called amid allegations of high-level corruption that led to the resignation of two top officials earlier in the day.

Yuri Yekhanurov, currently governor of the Dnipropetrivsk region, will now take the office. Yekhanurov is a close ally of Yushchenko and has strong reformist credentials. He was deputy PM under Yushchenko in 2000-2001. He is not a political heavyweight though and has no political group of his own.

"The team started to decay," Yushchenko told journalists Thursday.

"I am signing the government and the Security Council Secretary's resignations. I entitle Yuri Yekhanurov to form a new government. I set the new team the one task of working together as a team," Reuters quoted Yushchenko as saying.

Yushchenko took office in the ex-Soviet state of 47 million in January after a pro-Western "Orange Revolution" forced officials to overturn his defeat in a previous presidential election.

The crisis is the more serious for him since Yushchenko pledged to stamp out the corruption widespread under former president Leonid Kuchma.

Earlier Thursday Yushchenko's close aide Petro Poroshenko said he had stepped down as secretary of the National Defense and Security Council. Viktor Boyko, head of Ukraine's State Reserves Committee, also submitted his resignation Thursday.
 

And from  Interfax Ukraine 

 
BREAKING NEWS

This is brief version.
Full version is available for subscribers only.

Yuschenko appoints Yekhanurov acting prime minister

Kyiv, September 8 (Interfax-Ukraine) - Ukrainian President Viktor Yuschenko has appointed Yuriy Yekhanurov acting prime minister of Ukraine.

The presidential press service reports this on Thursday.
 
 
 
What Walter said:

 That woman with the goofy braid wrapped around her head is sacked. 
 
 
Holy Moley Cannenoli.

The braided chick sides with the opposition.

 Yuschenko's Orange Revolution...in swan song...??? 
 
 
 
'Orange princess' defects to Ukrainian opposition

By Andrew Osborn in Moscow
Published: 10 September 2005

A day after he sacked his scandal-riven government, the Ukrainian President, Viktor Yushchenko, was accused of having destroyed the political alliance that swept him to power in the orange revolution.

His former prime minister, who was fired along with the rest of the government on Thursday, signalled in a television appearance that she was joining the opposition to the President. "Today we are two different teams," she said. "I think these two teams will go their own way."

Julia Tymoshenko's supporters indicated that they no longer had faith in Mr Yushchenko after his decision to fire the government over allegations of corruption and infighting. Known as the "orange princess"because of her pivotal and glamorous role in the orange revolution, Ms Tymoshenko said her dismissal was "very unfair".

At a cabinet session on Thursday she lamented the fact that what she viewed as a crusading government had its term cut so brutally short. "Our orange government did more in its seven months than other governments did in 14 years," she said.

Her supporters said she had fought against the corruption that apparently tainted some of her ministerial colleagues.

Ms Tymoshenko said of the President: "He practically ruined our unity, our future, the future of the country. I think this step is absolutely illogical."

Mr Yushchenko tried to avoid controversy and held talks with parliamentary factions to try to get approval for his choice of prime minister, a low-profile Russian-born technocrat called Yuri Yekanurov. Mr Yekanurov's job will be to run an administration that the long-suffering Ukrainian public perceives to be free of corruption, cronyism and power struggles, flaws which steadily ate away at the credibility of the "orange" government.

Mr Yushchenko's newly appointed chief-of-staff, Oleh Rybachuk, promised change. He vowed that the incoming government would be wholly transparent and that its new members would not have significant business interests that may affect their decision-making. "We will keep our promises," he said.

Mr Rybachuk also signalled that the President would be putting his own house in order and would be drawing a line under an embarrassing scandal that has embroiled Andrei Yushchenko, his son. Mr Yushchenko Jnr has raised eyebrows by driving a sports car he could not afford on his modest income, and by living a high-profile sybaritic lifestyle. But Mr Rybachuk said the President would fully declare his family's income. "I don't know what his family budget balance is like, but you will see it. The public has the right to know." Nor, he added, would Yushchenko Jnr continue to lead his high-rolling lifestyle.

Mr Yushchenko's main problem now is his erstwhile ally Ms Tymoshenko. The newspaper Ukrainskaya Pravda said he would have to be on his mettle. " The revolution is over," said the paper. "Evolution has begun. That there is no love lost between the President and the Prime Minister has been a well-known fact. The main danger for President Yushchenko now is that Julia Tymoshenko may develop into a rival in next year's election as she will represent the parties symbolising the orange revolution."

A day after he sacked his scandal-riven government, the Ukrainian President, Viktor Yushchenko, was accused of having destroyed the political alliance that swept him to power in the orange revolution.

His former prime minister, who was fired along with the rest of the government on Thursday, signalled in a television appearance that she was joining the opposition to the President. "Today we are two different teams," she said. "I think these two teams will go their own way."

Julia Tymoshenko's supporters indicated that they no longer had faith in Mr Yushchenko after his decision to fire the government over allegations of corruption and infighting. Known as the "orange princess"because of her pivotal and glamorous role in the orange revolution, Ms Tymoshenko said her dismissal was "very unfair".

At a cabinet session on Thursday she lamented the fact that what she viewed as a crusading government had its term cut so brutally short. "Our orange government did more in its seven months than other governments did in 14 years," she said.

Her supporters said she had fought against the corruption that apparently tainted some of her ministerial colleagues.

Ms Tymoshenko said of the President: "He practically ruined our unity, our future, the future of the country. I think this step is absolutely illogical."

Mr Yushchenko tried to avoid controversy and held talks with parliamentary factions to try to get approval for his choice of prime minister, a low-profile Russian-born technocrat called Yuri Yekanurov. Mr Yekanurov's job will be to run an administration that the long-suffering Ukrainian public perceives to be free of corruption, cronyism and power struggles, flaws which steadily ate away at the credibility of the "orange" government.
Mr Yushchenko's newly appointed chief-of-staff, Oleh Rybachuk, promised change. He vowed that the incoming government would be wholly transparent and that its new members would not have significant business interests that may affect their decision-making. "We will keep our promises," he said.

Mr Rybachuk also signalled that the President would be putting his own house in order and would be drawing a line under an embarrassing scandal that has embroiled Andrei Yushchenko, his son. Mr Yushchenko Jnr has raised eyebrows by driving a sports car he could not afford on his modest income, and by living a high-profile sybaritic lifestyle. But Mr Rybachuk said the President would fully declare his family's income. "I don't know what his family budget balance is like, but you will see it. The public has the right to know." Nor, he added, would Yushchenko Jnr continue to lead his high-rolling lifestyle.

Mr Yushchenko's main problem now is his erstwhile ally Ms Tymoshenko. The newspaper Ukrainskaya Pravda said he would have to be on his mettle. " The revolution is over," said the paper. "Evolution has begun. That there is no love lost between the President and the Prime Minister has been a well-known fact. The main danger for President Yushchenko now is that Julia Tymoshenko may develop into a rival in next year's election as she will represent the parties symbolising the orange revolution."
 
 Source 
 
 
 
Democracy in Ukraine: The bitter taste of the orange revolution

Amid scandal and political paralysis, the promise of a new era for Ukraine under Viktor Yushchenko has already begun to look hollow. Now Amnesty International has joined the chorus of critics with allegations of police torture.

Andrew Osborn reports
Published: 28 September 2005

The Ukrainian President Viktor Yushchenko will be feted by the Queen in London next month and lauded by Cherie Blair for his role in last year's "orange revolution", which ended a decade of Soviet-style authoritarianism. The Royal Institute of International Affairs has decided to make him the first recipient of its prestigious Chatham House Prize, an honour bestowed on "the individual deemed to have made the most significant contribution to the improvement of international relations in the previous year".

The veteran Ukrainian politician has become accustomed to international plaudits since last December, when he succeeded in overturning the results of a rigged election by bringing thousands of protestors onto Kiev's streets before going on to decisively defeat his discredited rival in a re-run. Time magazine has since named Mr Yushchenko among the 100 most influential people in the world and he has received substantial recognition in America, including the sought-after John F Kennedy Profile in Courage award.

Few leaders of former Soviet republics get the chance to address the US Congress or receive the rapturous reception which he did. Fewer still find themselves in the running for this year's Nobel Peace Prize. However, Mr Yushchenko appears to be falling victim to a phenomenon which plagued a past winner of the Peace Prize, Mikhail Gorbachev. He was admired in the West for his role in peacefully bringing about an end to Communism but despised at home.

Mr Yushchenko is sliding ever closer to the same paradox. Respected abroad, many are already accusing him of betraying the ideals of the orange revolution he fathered. His critics allege that he has become so dazzled by international praise that he has taken his eye off the ball and presided over the replacement of one corrupt elite with another. That he has broken his revolutionary promises, befriended the very people he railed against during the revolution, failed to stamp out corruption nationally let alone among his own inner circle and not made a sufficient break with the discredited methods of his Soviet-era predecessor Leonid Kuchma. His critics' message is stark: the revolution has not delivered on its early promise and shows no signs of doing so.

Amnesty International yesterday added its voice to a growing chorus of criticism, accusing him of doing too little to stamp out police brutality and torture. The human rights group said that, although Mr Yushchenko's government had paid lip service to its concerns, little had been done since January when he took office. "Despite promising words from the new government, Amnesty International and local human rights organisations have received allegations of torture and ill-treatment in police detention in the six months since the new government came to power," it said in a statement. The Ukrainian authorities said they were not yet ready to respond to the report.

Mr Yushchenko is unlikely to welcome Amnesty's findings but what is likely to worry him more is the serious disenchantment setting in among many of his supporters. His main problem is that the "orange government" he put together at the beginning of the year no longer exists. Earlier this month he sacked his entire government after cabinet members began to publicly accuse one another of corruption and cronyism. Mr Yushchenko said petty infighting had brought the government to a standstill.

The most high-profile victim of his house-cleaning was his charismatic yet controversial prime minister, Julia Tymoshenko. Known as the "orange princess" because of her glamorous looks and decisive role in marshalling the crowds last year, Ms Tymoshenko was for many Ukrainians a symbol of the revolution. Analysts argue that Mr Yushchenko's decision to dismiss her and many of her closest aides from government has riven the orange movement in two and cost the president valuable support.

Apparently undeterred, Mr Yushchenko yesterday continued the process of naming members of his new government without Ms Tymoshenko's involvement. A relatively obscure Russian-born technocrat called Yuri Yekhanurov has taken her job as premier and Mr Yushchenko now faces the unsettling prospect of facing off against Ms Tymoshenko at the ballot box in elections at the end of March.

Once comrades-in-arms, the two have metamorphosed into bitter political enemies and Ms Tymoshenko makes no secret of the fact that she wants power at Mr Yushchenko's expense. In his bid to claw his way back to contention the Ukrainian President has struck a pact which appears to negate at a stroke the purpose of the orange revolution.

In essence, the revolution was about overturning the rigged election victory of Viktor Yanukovych, Mr Yushchenko's pro-Russian rival. Many of those who gathered in Kiev's Independence Square wanted Mr Yanukovych jailed for election fraud and other alleged crimes. Yet last week Mr Yushchenko was pictured on Ukrainian TV shaking his rival's hand after signing a deal with him which secured 50 extra votes in order to win a parliamentary vote on the appointment of his new premier.

In the eyes of his disillusioned supporters, he paid too high a price for the 50 votes when he granted Mr Yanukovych and his supporters a legal amnesty. Writing in the authoritative The Ukraine List, the analyst Mychailo Wynnyckyj said it was a betrayal. "Nine months after leading hundreds of thousands of Ukrainians into the streets to protest against falsified elections, the President signed 'a memorandum of understanding' with his former adversary... in which he agreed to support the drafting of a law that grants amnesty to all those who committed or were complicit in falsifying the results of Ukraine's November 2004 vote!"

The pro-government daily Ukrayina Moloda also raised an eyebrow. "This alliance will dismay many supporters of both Yushchenko and Yanukovych," it wrote. "One of these politicians symbolises democracy, the other authoritarianism. This means that once more East and West and business and power will be mixed up. Many of those who stood on Independence Square will view this as a betrayal."

Many of the original revolutionaries also wanted Mr Kuchma, Mr Yushchenko's predecessor, to be held to account for alleged corruption. But according to Ms Tymoshenko, speaking in a recent interview with the Russian daily newspaper Izvestia, a decision has been taken to let him off the hook. She said: "Yushchenko has explained to everyone that Kuchma is not to be touched. He said that Kuchma is a former head of state and is therefore not to be hunted like a rabbit. He will be allowed to keep all his property, even unlawfully acquired property. In effect Kuchma has been granted a pardon."

Ms Tymoshenko also accuses her former boss of knowing "in detail" about corruption at the heart of his inner circle and doing nothing to stop it. She singles out the activities of Petr Poroshenko, a confectionery tycoon who headed the country's National Security Council until the government's recent dismissal and who came into open conflict with her. Mr Poroshenko, a close friend of Mr Yushchenko's, categorically denies her accusations that he was trying to block the renationalisation of key state assets so that they could be sold to wealthy Russian businessmen. An investigation is underway.

Mr Yushchenko has also seen his corruption-busting image tainted by revelations about the lifestyle of his 19 year-old son, Andrei, who is known in the Ukrainian media as "the Son of God". Last summer, Yushchenko Junior was revealed to be enjoying a sybaritic lifestyle, driving a rare BMW around Kiev, and brandishing a mobile phone and a watch beyond the wildest dreams of most Ukrainians. Mr Yushchenko weathered the scandal by publicly berating his son but the damage was done. There is also the troubling unsolved murder case of a leading investigative journalist.

Georgiy Gongadze's decapitated body was found in a forest outside Kiev two weeks after he was abducted in September 2000 while investigating allegations of corruption at the heart of Leonid Kuchma's government. Mr Yushchenko has repeatedly promised to bring the perpetrators to justice and indeed three former policemen are in custody and have apparently confessed to the murder.

But to the public's frustration, the people who ordered the killing remain at large. Earlier this month, the international organisation Reporters Without Borders criticised the Ukrainian authorities for dragging their feet. Mr Yushchenko tried to stem criticism by posthumously awarding Mr Gongadze the title "Hero of Ukraine" but the gesture won him little favour with Lessia, the journalist's mother. "Nobody informs me about anything and nobody contacts me," she said recently. "If it wasn't for journalists the case would have been forgotten long ago. Yushchenko and Kuchma are alike. Nothing has changed. I will not go to Yushchenko. I will not offer him my hand."

To add to Mr Yushchenko's woes, the Ukrainian economy is not doing well. Economic growth has slumped to 2.8 per cent this year compared with 12.1 per cent last year, prices are perceived to have risen unacceptably and there have been problems keeping the country's petrol stations supplied. Mr Yushchenko and his supporters blame the sacked Ms Tymoshenko, who played a large role in managing the economy. She says the figures look bad because in the past all the data was falsified. Mr Yushchenko has also accused his erstwhile ally of trying to use her post to get a $1.5bn tax bill owed by her former firm written off. She denies the claim and has said she would sue him under different circumstances.

It is all a far cry from last December, when the duo stood hand in hand in front of tens of thousands of jubilant supporters and promised to build a new Ukraine. A poll by the Kiev-based think-tank Razumkov last week showed that Mr Yushchenko's personal rating had plummeted to 19.8 per cent in September from 48 per cent in February. Ms Tymoshenko's rating, though a touch higher at 21.4 per cent, was little better. The polling organisation concluded that Ukrainians' overall trust in the government was "rapidly declining, and... is approaching levels characteristic for the final days of ex-president Leonid Kuchma's rule".

Mr Yushchenko may have won the international community's respect but if he is to win back the goodwill he has squandered domestically in just nine months he has some work to do.

 
 Source 
 
 
Terribly disappointing.  
 
 
A merely rational strategic move - or a looming loss of the urgency and agenda of the orange revolution's priorities (democracy, anti-corruption, anti-bureaucracy and economic reform)?

Or both?

 
 Yushchenko Seeks New Power Base in East of Ukraine [article in German] 

Translation of excerpt:

"One doesn't need much luck in life, one just needs to come from Dnipropetrowsk", the Ukrainian proverb says. Indeed, the East-Ukrainian industrial city has always played an important role in Ukrainian politics. Ex-President Leonid Kuchma once ran the local rocket factory, the newly resigned Prime Minister Yulia Timoshenko was born here, and her successor Yuri Yechanurov was until recently the Governor of this city and its region.

The Ukrainian President Viktor Yushtshenko was well aware of the significance of Dnipropetrowsk, when he appointed his ally Yechanurov in a top position here at the beginning of this year. And that he is now taking him to Kiev as his new government chief, has increased the popularity of the President in the city. This is all the more important for Yushtshenko, as he is obviously forced to look for new allies in the east of the former Soviet republic after the falling apart with Timoshenko.

Yushtshenko's orange revolution was mainly carried by the intellectuals and the farmers in the West of the Ukraine. In the industrial workers' regions of the east on the other hand the former Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich [..] had his bulwark. Since the falling apart of Yushtshenko and Timoshenko and the subsequent split in the orange camp, the President is now concerned about acquiring a stronger basis in the east. [..]
 
 
 
Thanks for posting that article, "Democracy in Ukraine: The bitter taste of the orange revolution", by the way Walter.

An amnesty for the election frauders of Yanukovych, a de facto amnesty for Kuchma, refusal to go after those who ordered Gongadze's murder... not good.

I wouldnt trust Tymoshenko even with $10, but she does seem to have a point when she says Yushchenko is betraying the revolution...

Which risks, in the long run, further exacerbating the citizen apathy that marked Ukrainian politics so starkly before.
 
 
A bit different news now - headpages in the tabloids of last week already, now in the  Independent  as well:

 
Ukrainian love story pairs a billionaire's daughter with a Leeds rocker

By Andrew Osborn in Moscow
Published: 03 October 2005

An aspiring heavy metal musician from Yorkshire has married into the closest thing Ukraine has to a royal family, exchanging vows with the daughter of the glamorous former prime minister Julia Tymoshenko.

Sean Carr, 36, who used to run a chain of shoe-repair shops in Leeds and Bradford, married Yevgenia Tymoshenko, 25, in a 16th-century hilltop monastery in Kiev, the Ukrainian capital.

His image and past have caused controversy in Ukraine, where Yevgenia's mother is one of the country's leading politicians and a woman tipped to win back her job as Prime Minister next year.

The Tymoshenkos are a wealthy and powerful family. Julia Tymoshenko is known as the Goddess of the (Orange) Revolution because of the role she played in helping Viktor Yushchenko to overturn the results of a rigged election and win power in December last year.

She went on to become Prime Minister but lost her job last month when President Yushchenko sacked the government over a corruption scandal. Ms Tymoshenko has since vowed to stand against Mr Yushchenko in elections next year.

Yevgenia has lived in the UK since the age of 14 and is in the process of completing her studies at the London School of Economics. She met Mr Carr while on holiday in Egypt last year.

His background is rather different from his new wife's. He sings in a band called the Death Valley Screamers, rides a Harley Davidson motorbike, owns a rottweiler called Salem and has a giant tattoo on his stomach of an alien "escaping".

His band plays in Kiev's local bars and recently released its first CD in Ukraine, which appears to be selling well.

He also has a young daughter by a former partner who has given an interview to a British tabloid newspaper in which she said that Mr Carr regularly beat her up and in 2002 broke her teeth, upper jaw and collarbone.

Mr Carr was found guilty of assault and was sentenced to two years' probation and ordered to take relationship and anger management counselling.

He and his new partner were initially reported to be planning a wedding at Ripley Castle in Yorkshire but to have changed their plans to avoid adverse publicity.

If Julia Tymoshenko has any doubts about her new son-in-law she has not expressed them publicly, saying only that Mr Carr is a "kind, educated and inspired person" who makes Yevgenia, her daughter, very happy and appears to "adore" her.

The wedding ceremony went smoothly yesterday. There was bagpipe music and Ukrainian folk songs and Mr Carr and the Death Valley Screamers were due to perform at the reception afterwards.

Many of the some 150 guests sported colourful tattoos and piercings. The couple briefly posed for photographs but had decided they would not take questions from journalists.

The duo have said they intend to settle in Ukraine and start a family.

Journalists were anxious to see whether Mr Yushchenko would attend the wedding in order to ascertain the state of relations between him and Julia Tymoshenko, but he did not appear to have been invited.

An aspiring heavy metal musician from Yorkshire has married into the closest thing Ukraine has to a royal family, exchanging vows with the daughter of the glamorous former prime minister Julia Tymoshenko.

Sean Carr, 36, who used to run a chain of shoe-repair shops in Leeds and Bradford, married Yevgenia Tymoshenko, 25, in a 16th-century hilltop monastery in Kiev, the Ukrainian capital.

His image and past have caused controversy in Ukraine, where Yevgenia's mother is one of the country's leading politicians and a woman tipped to win back her job as Prime Minister next year.

The Tymoshenkos are a wealthy and powerful family. Julia Tymoshenko is known as the Goddess of the (Orange) Revolution because of the role she played in helping Viktor Yushchenko to overturn the results of a rigged election and win power in December last year.

She went on to become Prime Minister but lost her job last month when President Yushchenko sacked the government over a corruption scandal. Ms Tymoshenko has since vowed to stand against Mr Yushchenko in elections next year.

Yevgenia has lived in the UK since the age of 14 and is in the process of completing her studies at the London School of Economics. She met Mr Carr while on holiday in Egypt last year.

His background is rather different from his new wife's. He sings in a band called the Death Valley Screamers, rides a Harley Davidson motorbike, owns a rottweiler called Salem and has a giant tattoo on his stomach of an alien "escaping".

His band plays in Kiev's local bars and recently released its first CD in Ukraine, which appears to be selling well.
He also has a young daughter by a former partner who has given an interview to a British tabloid newspaper in which she said that Mr Carr regularly beat her up and in 2002 broke her teeth, upper jaw and collarbone.

Mr Carr was found guilty of assault and was sentenced to two years' probation and ordered to take relationship and anger management counselling.

He and his new partner were initially reported to be planning a wedding at Ripley Castle in Yorkshire but to have changed their plans to avoid adverse publicity.

If Julia Tymoshenko has any doubts about her new son-in-law she has not expressed them publicly, saying only that Mr Carr is a "kind, educated and inspired person" who makes Yevgenia, her daughter, very happy and appears to "adore" her.

The wedding ceremony went smoothly yesterday. There was bagpipe music and Ukrainian folk songs and Mr Carr and the Death Valley Screamers were due to perform at the reception afterwards.

Many of the some 150 guests sported colourful tattoos and piercings. The couple briefly posed for photographs but had decided they would not take questions from journalists.

The duo have said they intend to settle in Ukraine and start a family.

Journalists were anxious to see whether Mr Yushchenko would attend the wedding in order to ascertain the state of relations between him and Julia Tymoshenko, but he did not appear to have been invited.
 
 
 
 
a former partner who has given an interview to a British tabloid newspaper in which she said that Mr Carr regularly beat her up and in 2002 broke her teeth, upper jaw and collarbone.
 

Well at least I'm sure if he ever tries to pull something like that on Ms Tymoshenko Jr, he wont get away with it unharmed... Momma is not one to mess with, I'm guessin ;-)
 
 
We doen wat we moet doen?
 
 
Sorry, I want to reneg that.
 
 
 
Uzbekistan Revolt Trial Condemned by U.S.; EU Bans Arms Exports

Nov. 15 (Bloomberg) -- The U.S. condemned as unfair the convictions of alleged leaders of a revolt in Uzbekistan in May as the European Union banned arms sales and imposed travel restrictions over the Uzbek government's response to the uprising.

Uzbekistan's Supreme Court yesterday convicted 15 people of attempting to overthrow the constitution and create an Islamic state, Agence France-Presse cited Chief Justice Bakhtiyor Zhamolov as saying in the capital, Tashkent.

``These convictions are based on evidence that isn't credible and trial that isn't fair,'' State Department spokesman Adam Ereli said yesterday in Washington, according to an e-mailed transcript. ``We and the Europeans have been very outspoken in calling for an independent investigation.''

Uzbekistan's government said in May 187 people were killed when the uprising in the eastern city of Andijan was put down by security forces. Human rights groups said several hundred people, most of them civilians, may have died and the U.S., EU and United Nations led calls for an international probe into the killings.

The Council of the EU yesterday banned travel to EU countries by 12 Uzbek officials, including Interior Minister Zakirjan Almatov and Defense Minister Kadir Gulamov.

Five defendants were sentenced to 20 years in prison and the others to jail terms ranging from 14 years to 17 years, AFP said. The verdicts and sentences cannot be appealed, it said.

``You've got convictions based on a less than transparent process and less than credible evidence,'' Ereli said. The U.S. will maintain its calls on the Uzbek government to ``act consistent with international standards.''

EU Embargo

The EU embargo will apply to exports of arms, military equipment and other equipment that might be used for ``internal repression,'' the Council said in a statement on its Web site.

``The Council decided to adopt these measures in the light of the excessive, disproportionate and indiscriminate use of force by the Uzbek security forces during the Andijan events in May and following the refusal of Uzbek authorities to allow an independent international inquiry into these events,'' it said.

The incident in Andijan began when fighting broke out after armed men protesting a trial of Islamic extremists broke into a jail and freed prisoners.

A clampdown followed as police and soldiers in Andijan and nearby towns fired on protesters, most of them civilians opposed to the regime of President Islam Karimov. The Uzbek government blamed Islamic extremists for the violence.

Demanding Investigation

The North Atlantic Treaty Organization in May called for a UN investigation of the incident and said the military alliance would reassess its relationship with Uzbekistan. Karimov's government rejected demands for an independent probe.

Uzbekistan, a landlocked nation of 26 million people, was the first Central Asian country to allow the U.S. to use a military base in the anti-terrorism war that began in 2001.

The U.S. uses the Karshi-Khanabad airfield in the south of the country in support of operations in Afghanistan. The Uzbek government in July told the U.S. to withdraw its forces from the base by the end of the year.

Karimov yesterday signed a defense treaty with Russian President Vladimir Putin. The accord grants each country the right to use military sites located on their territories ``should it prove necessary,'' Russia's Interfax news agency reported yesterday, citing a clause in the treaty it obtained.

The U.S. has increasingly faulted the human rights practices of the Karimov government.

The U.S. withheld $10.5 million in aid, including $6.87 million in military aid, in the fiscal year 2004 because the State Department couldn't certify that Uzbekistan was moving toward multiparty democracy.

As much as $22 million, including $11.7 million in military aid, is in danger of being withheld this year for the same reason, department spokeswoman Joanne Moore said in June.

The country received $87.4 million in aid from the U.S. in 2003, according to U.S. government data. The former Soviet republic, slightly larger than the U.S. state of California, is the world's second-biggest exporter of cotton and an oil and gold producer. Karimov has led the country since 1991.
 
 Source 
 
 
 
Ukraine's Orange Revolution Leaders May Re-Unite for Elections

Created: 20.11.2005 13:18 MSK (GMT +3)

MosNews

Politicians who spearheaded last year's "Orange Revolution" in Ukraine must unite to bar an election comeback by the administration they ousted, sacked prime minister Yulia Tymoshenko was quoted by Reuters as saying Saturday.

Three days before Ukraine marks the anniversary of the mass protests, Tymoshenko and officials of a party backing President Viktor Yushchenko have pledged to mend a debilitating split which shattered public confidence in the revolution's leaders.

"I think we can unite before the elections or perhaps after them. I will make every effort to unite our forces," a beaming Tymoshenko told a packed news conference. Ukrainians will vote in parliamentary elections in March 2006.

"Revenge headed by (Viktor) Yanukovich as a possible candidate for prime minister is very real. We must not let down our guard."

Yanukovich, then prime minister and backed by Russia, was initially declared the winner of the presidential election over the pro-Western Yushchenko. But weeks of protests led to a Supreme Court decision annulling the vote on grounds of mass fraud and Yushchenko won a re-run.

Tymoshenko was Yushchenko's main ally, rousing crowds in Kiev's Independence Square, and was made premier in January.

Yushchenko fired her in September after months of in-fighting which split the administration into two camps, each accusing the other of corruption.

Tymoshenko proclaimed herself a victim of intrigues and vowed to get her job back by beating the president's allies in poll next March.

The split badly dented the standing of both leaders.

Opinion surveys credit Yanukovich's Regions Party, strongest in Russian-speaking eastern Ukraine, with 20% support.

Tymoshenko's Fatherland party enjoys 15-17% while Our Ukraine, linked to the president, trails with 10-12%. Both derive much support from nationalist western regions and the liberal stronghold of Kiev.

Our Ukraine voted on Friday to start talks on an electoral pact with Tymoshenko's camp.

"I think today we will meet and discuss the best way to pool our efforts," Tymoshenko said. "The election will not be easy. We will have two poles again. But for us it is more difficult this time. We are not united and many voters are disappointed."

As politicians gear up for the anniversary festivities, voters who trudged through snowy streets to the protests now express disillusion.

Prices of staples are on the rise and consumers have faced fuel and meat shortages. Months of rows culminated in a slanging match in September between top aides over alleged corruption.

Tymoshenko said unity could restore voters' confidence.

"The revolution was not in vain. I believe it created a new country, a new nation. We are ready for a political fight. And we are ready to win," Tymoshenko said, pledging to stand alongside Yushchenko at the festivities. "I am sure the square will become another launching pad for victory."
 
 Source 
 
 
Happened across a series of pictures from an anti-Lukashenka demonstration last year.. and since there's no separate thread on Belarus, and these people deserve your wishes and prayers too, I'll post them here.

The rally protested the results of the October 2004 Parliamentary elections and Republican Referendum in Belarus (you'll know that any opposition doesnt stand a ghost of a chance in Belarus... Ukraine under Kuchma was friendly in comparison)... the whole series is  here .

Note the anti-Lukashenka balloon...

 

 

 

Flags flying: the "bison" flag of youth democracy movement Zubr (file under Otpor!, Khmara!, Pora!), and the flag of Belarus - the non-Soviet version, that is, that was also the state flag from 1991 to 1995. In '95, on Lukashenka's initiative, there was a referendum that reinstated, with minor differences, the Soviet-era flag of Belarus, so this red-white one is a symbol of resistance.

 

More flags: the Zubr and Belarus ones, and the EU flag.

 

 

 
 
 
One year after Ukraine's Orange Revolution the shine has worn off. DER SPIEGEL spoke with Ukrainian President Viktor Yushchenko about the difficulties of establishing democracy in Ukraine, the infighting in his government, and his health following the poison attack

 "There Is No Return to Yesterday" 
 
 
Has been quite calm on this thread although things aren't going better in Uzbekistan.

The most recent news:

 
Uzbekistan forces out refugee agency

By Alexander G Higgins
Published: 21 March 2006

The UN refugee agency, which has sought to block the return home of Uzbek refugees, has been given a month to leave Uzbekistan.

The Uzbek authorities have accused the UN High Commissioner for Refugees of protecting criminals and terrorists by opposing deportations of Uzbek asylum-seekers from Kyrgyzstan.

The UNHCR said it regretted the decision, but would comply with the order. " It's very rare that an office gets closed down," said Astrid van Genderen Stort, a spokeswoman.

"Sometimes an employee is told to leave if there is a fight between the individual and the government, but not the entire agency operation," she said. But, she added, "UNHCR works in countries upon the invitation of a country. If a country doesn't want us to work there any more, we can't go and impose ourselves."
At the centre of tensions between the government and the agency have been hundreds of refugees from Uzbekistan who fled to Kyrgyzstan last May following the bloody suppression of an uprising in the eastern Uzbek city of Andijan.

The UNHCR recognised most as refugees and evacuated 439 of the Uzbeks from Kyrgyzstan to Romania. In recent weeks, the dispute has come down to four Uzbek refugees, two of whom were denied asylum by the Kyrgyz Supreme Court in February despite their being granted refugee status by the UN. The UNHCR has urged the Kyrgyz government not to return the four to Uzbekistan, where rights groups say they might be tortured.
 
 Source 
 
 
Meanwhile, a lot more has happened in the Ukraine.

March 28: The Ukrainian president, Viktor Yushchenko, is coming under increasing pressure to form a new union with the leaders of the orange revolution after a preliminary election result put the pro-Moscow opposition leader, Viktor Yanukovich, in the lead.

June 21: Ukraine's president, Viktor Yushchenko, appeared today to have secured an agreement from his former allies in the Orange revolution to form a coalition government, in an attempt to draw a line under 18 months of political instability.

From today's Chicago Tribune (page 5/  online version  ) - a kind of summary of the last xouple of weeks/months:

 
Swift fall of bloc in Ukraine lifts pro-Russia leader
Faction's exit from Orange coalition puts outcast on path to be new prime minister

By Peter Finn
The Washington Post

MOSCOW -- Ukraine's new coalition government of pro-Western democratic parties was predicted to be fragile. It proved so weak that it collapsed Friday before it even got started.

 

And out of the rubble emerged the man who was cast as the villain in Ukraine's democratic triumph known as the Orange Revolution. In a remarkable turnaround, Viktor Yanukovych, the losing, pro-Moscow candidate in the disputed presidential elections that led to massive street protests in 2004, appears set to become prime minister.

This week was supposed to bring the formal reconstruction of the unstable alliance that led the Orange Revolution, named for the color worn by the protesters. Instead, the bloc dissolved into familiar squabbling after its smallest member, the Socialists, broke ranks to get its own man elected to a parliamentary post.

Socialists jump ship

The Socialists then signed on to what they called a new "anti-crisis" coalition with the Communists and Yanukovych's Party of Regions. The agreement was signed Friday evening in front of journalists in Kiev, the Ukrainian capital.

The recent political turmoil and indecision in Ukraine have frustrated the European Union and the United States. They had hoped to see the country well along in restructuring necessary to open it to Western institutions and greater foreign investment.

The White House had considered sending President Bush to Ukraine, hailing it as an outpost of openness and free enterprise. Instead, he went to Hungary last month.

The pro-Moscow Yanukovych opposes or questions many of the goals of President Viktor Yushchenko, notably membership in the NATO alliance and the European Union. Yanukovych is interested in what is called the "single economic space," a concept promoted by the Kremlin to bind Russia, Ukraine, Kazakhstan and Belarus together.

Because of constitutional changes that came into force after Yushchenko assumed the presidency, the post of prime minister is more powerful than it had been. The holder of the office is no longer appointed by the president but independently elected by parliament. The president retains the right to propose candidates for three key ministries, including foreign affairs, but his ability to constrain the prime minister is much reduced.

Coalition's unraveling

The Orange coalition fell apart for the first time last September. Yushchenko dismissed his prime minister, Yulia Tymoshenko, the charismatic crowd-pleaser who galvanized the popular revolt that swept Yushchenko into office. He said corruption was rampant under her stewardship; she accused some of the president's key advisers of corruption.

Elections followed in March. Yanukovych's Party of Regions emerged as the largest single party, but no one party won an overall majority.

The three that had led the Orange Revolution--Yushchenko's Our Ukraine, Tymoshenko's bloc and the Socialists, led by Oleksander Moroz--together had enough seats to form a government. But weeks passed with no agreement on how to overcome the bad feelings between them.

In June, the three parties finally agreed to a new coalition. Tymoshenko would be prime minister, and Petro Poroshenko, a controversial tycoon and member of Yushchenko's party, would be speaker of parliament. The two are fierce rivals.

But on Thursday, Moroz, the Socialist leader, appeared to have had sudden second thoughts about the deal.

`I've got evidence'

"I've got evidence to show, which I am not going to do now, that the election of such charismatic people [as Poroshenko and Tymoshenko] to the country's highest offices will inevitably create an explosive mixture," he said. "It would spell the end of the coalition in the course of several months with all the consequences to follow."

The Socialists then nominated Moroz as speaker. Yanukovych's Party of Regions, joined by the Communists, saw an opening and backed him. He was elected Thursday evening.

His former partners were left to fume. "We consider that the coalition never took place," Tymoshenko said. "Thus, the coalition did not unravel; it never existed in the first place."

"Moroz is a professional betrayer and a greedy, cynical and a mercenary man," David Zhvania, a member of Our Ukraine, told reporters.

Moroz quickly adjourned parliament until Tuesday, when a new coalition led by Yanukovych might be put to a vote.

If Yanukovych becomes prime minister, the stage would be set for persistent confrontation between pro-Russian coalition forces and Yushchenko, further hampering efforts to reverse a slowdown in economic growth and set policy in a nation that has been independent only 15 years.

Copyright © 2006, Chicago Tribune
 
 
 
And another twist and turn yielded yet another constellation in the Ukraine.

Faced with the parliamentary deal of Yanukovich's Regionalists, the Communists, and the Socialist Party (which broke away from the Orange coalition), President Yushchenko was faced with a rough choice. Either suspend parliament and write out new elections - in which his party would surely lose, and which posed the real risk of merely returning a strengthened majority for the same three-party coalition; or strike a deal with his former foe, Yanukovich.

After much wrangling and a long wait, he decided for the latter. Yushchenko around the table with the man whose henchmen had tried to poison him.

The result is a governing agreement between Yushchenko and Yanukovich's Regionalists. It will be more Western of profile than the Regionalist-Communist-Socialist coalition would otherwise have been, but enough of a betrayal to the Orange revolution's principles for scores of Yushchenko's own partisans in Parliament to desert him.

See:  Yanukovich approved by legislators 

Does that mean they're completely back to square one? Not entirely. The US government remains relatively sanguine, and it has a point. Not just because

 
The president, however, retains power over foreign and defense policy. And on Friday, Yushchenko renominated his two current appointees to the Foreign and Defense ministries, Boris Tarasyuk and Anatoly Hrytsenko.

Under the nonbinding coalition agreement signed with Yanukovich and other party leaders Thursday, the new government pledged to pursue Yushchenko's main policy goals, including cooperation with NATO.
 

But also because, as David Kramer, an American deputy assistant secretary of state for the region, said in a telephone interview from Washington:

 
"We've been clear from the beginning that we would be willing to work with any government that emerges from a democratic process," he said.

He noted that the election in March, in which Yanukovich's party won the most seats, though not a majority, had been credited as Ukraine's freest since independence from the Soviet Union. "That is a sign of success from, say, the Orange Revolution," he said.
 

True.

Not that any of this is happy news. Consider, for example, this contrary take on the partial reversal of power in the Ukraine to Yanukovich's East-Ukrainian, pro-Russian interests:

 
 Big bucks behind 'Orange' betrayal 

The romantic notion of Ukraine's Orange Revolution is shoved under the rug as the country returns to 2004 with a little help from oligarchs who must protect their business interests.

Commentary by Jen Alic for ISN Security Watch (04/08/06)

As the Ukrainian parliament prepared to vote Friday on pro-Russian Viktor Yanukovych's nomination to be the country's next prime minister, bringing full circle the dramatic Orange Revolution that saw pro-Western president Viktor Yushchenko assume power, it appears that oligarchic business interests are behind the chain of events.

<snip>

[T]he oligarchs appear to be the real winners in this latest twist of Ukrainian fate, and Tymoshenko's description of the Tuesday agreement as a smoke screen for "insider dealings of dividing posts and distributing businesses" most likely is not far from the truth.

It seems certain that Yanukovych's comeback likely will mean a new redistribution of property.

According to Kommersant, Yanukovych has not been calling the shots these days, rather Rinat Akhmetov, Ukraine's wealthiest man and number seven in the Regional Party election list.

Kommersant said Akhmetov was believed to be the "main instigator" in the Orange coalition split, and that his main goal was to keep Tymoshenko from becoming prime minister, which was looking very likely before 6 July, when Oleksandr Moroz's Socialist Party faction left its Orange allies to form a new coalition with "regionalists" and communists, leading to the most severe parliamentary crisis in Ukraine's history.

It was only three weeks earlier that the allied parties of the Orange Revolution had, after tough negotiations, signed a coalition agreement that should have led to political stability in Ukraine and a path towards Euro-Atlantic integration.

Tymoshenko would have hit the oligarchs hard and ignored Akhmetov's interests, and this time he has proved a more formidable force. She had promised to renationalize 3,000 enterprises who privatizations she considered shady at best. She would have attacked business in Donetsk, and Akhmetov's empire was a key target. As prime minister before she was unceremoniously sacked by Yushchenko, she had opened criminal cases against Akhmetov.

Once Yanukovych's nomination for prime minister is approved, Akhmetov and other oligarchs will be given strong protection, and anyone with business interests left in the Tymoshenko Bloc will likely run scared, giving up ideology for security for their businesses.

The divvying up of posts already has begun, though informally, and Yanukovych's Party of Regions looks set to get most of the economic bloc, including the State Property Fund, which is responsible for privatization.

Still, though big business clearly has won out over the democratic and reform-minded ideals of the Orange Revolution, some say a new government led by Yanukovych (with oligarch Akhmetov pulling the strings) will be more US friendly than at first thought. After all, oligarchs tend to pay little heed to ideology and are happy to ignore east-west ideological boundaries if it creates a more favorable climate for their empires.
 

That commentary also has this on future scenarios:

 
Tymoshenko has pledged to form opposition to the regionalists-led coalition, which could seal the fate of the Orange Coalition once and for all, as part of the Our Ukraine faction, disappointed at Yushchenko's decision, would likely join the opposition, according to Gavrylyuk. In addition, he said, the oligarchic part of the pro-presidential bloc, whom Tymoshenko has accused of ousting her last year from the prime minister's seat and sympathizing with regionalist coal barons, are likely to be co-opted by the winning coalition.

Under the circumstances, Tymoshenko could feel free to run for president in 2009, while Yushchenko, who long has feared her rivalry within the Orange Coalition, might be backed by his former regionalist rivals in what could prove yet another twist to Ukraine's rapidly changing political scene.
 
 
 
A comment from today's  Chicago Tribune  (print version page 14):

 
What revolution?
 
 
 
 
Poverty-hit Ukraine enjoys boom in property prices

The Independent
Published: 06 January 2007

One of Europe's poorest countries, Ukraine, is enjoying an unlikely property boom that has delighted developers but left many ordinary Ukrainians out in the cold.

Some properties have rocketed in value by 600 per cent in the past three years, and prices in Kiev, the capital, reportedly rose by up to 25 per cent in the last two months of 2006 alone.

Property investors and people who already owned their homes have been the big winners. But young Ukrainians and renters now find themselves shut out of the market, with no prospect of buying.

"I'm young and I rent an apartment and make pretty good money, but I can't even afford to get a mortgage," said Anna, a secretary who did not want her surname to be published. Mortgage rates are, she says, as high as 12 per cent. "Even foreigners are surprised by how expensive it has become here."

Kiev now bristles with cranes and building sites that work 24 hours a day, rushing to meet what appears to be an insatiable demand for new housing.

Analysts say that if you bought a decent flat for the going rate in Kiev three years ago (just £15,000), it would now be worth £100,000, an increase of more than six-fold. Small city-centre flats in Kiev are now changing hands for £200,000 and more.

The huge price hikes have made Ukraine one of the most expensive places to buy property in eastern Europe and the former Soviet Union. Yet average monthly salaries range from just £80-£180, depending on the region, and few people have savings.

And, to add insult to injury, many of the buyers are foreigners out to make fast money by renting or reselling. Irina Radko, of estate agents UA Property, says that many of the buyers are British.

"Our clients are mostly from the UK, but we also have customers from the USA, the UAE, Cyprus, New Zealand and Canada."

The most popular area to buy is Kiev, she added, followed by Crimea (a Black Sea holiday destination) and the Carpathian Mountains.

The trigger for Ukraine's property boom appears to have been the country's pro-Western "orange revolution" in 2004. The new President, Viktor Yushchenko, abolished visa requirements for EU and American citizens, and let it be known that his country was open for business.

Although he has since lost much of his influence and been forced to share power with a pro-Russian Prime Minister, Viktor Yanukovych, friendly investment conditions he created remain in place.

But foreign investors' good fortune has been local people's misery. Government buildings in Kiev are frequently picketed by people angry about poor living conditions. "The politicians promise that something will change, but nothing ever does," said Anna.
 
 
 
 
And, to add insult to injury, many of the buyers are foreigners out to make fast money by renting or reselling. Irina Radko, of estate agents UA Property, says that many of the buyers are British.

"Our clients are mostly from the UK, but we also have customers from the USA, the UAE, Cyprus, New Zealand and Canada."

The most popular area to buy is Kiev, she added, followed by Crimea (a Black Sea holiday destination) and the Carpathian Mountains.

The trigger for Ukraine's property boom appears to have been the country's pro-Western "orange revolution" in 2004. The new President, Viktor Yushchenko, abolished visa requirements for EU and American citizens, and let it be known that his country was open for business.

Although he has since lost much of his influence and been forced to share power with a pro-Russian Prime Minister, Viktor Yanukovych, friendly investment conditions he created remain in place.
 

This is very depressing.

As if ordinary Ukrainians need this, on top of the country's other woes!
 
 
Hmm, true..

But it is sort of an half full/half empty thing.

It does mean a lot of outside money being pumped into the Ukrainian economy, after all. (And those who already owned their homes of course are Very Happy Folks now.)

But yes, easy to say from here.. I'm not a young Ukrainian planning a family and not being able to afford renting, let alone buying, any home of my own.
 
 
It's very sad to me that Ukrainians have never really had the chance to get back on their feet, so to speak. Years of trying to extract themselves from the USSR. Followed by the years of economic hardship, then the disappointment of the "orange revolution"..... & now the country is "on the free market" & up for grabs! Ordinary people rarely gain many of the "economic benefits" of circumstances like this, no matter which country. The independence that Ukrainians had so dreamed of looks like it's vanishing... fast. Just another market to be exploited now, it looks like. <sigh>
 
 
In Ukraine, the "Orange" parties of Yushchenko and Tymoshenko have apparently reunited - and are warning that the Ukraine is increasingly sliding back into Russia's orbit.

 
 Leader: Russia's grasp on Ukraine rising 
 
 
 
Meanwhile, in neighbouring Belarus (which doesnt have its own thread, hence posting it here):

 
 Thousands Rally for Change in Belarus 

Washington Post
Monday, March 26, 2007
 

Summary:

 
As many as 10,000 protesters took to the streets of Minsk, the capital of Belarus, on Sunday in one of the largest demonstrations ever staged against the authoritarian rule of President Alexander Lukashenko.

The demonstrators marched in three groups to a meeting away from the city center after riot police prevented them from entering a central square. No injuries were reported, but several activists were arrested, organizers said.

The rally was addressed by Alexander Milinkevich, who ran against Lukashenko for the presidency last year in elections that were widely condemned as flawed.

"We are the majority. We will win," Milinkevich told the protesters, who were marking the anniversary of the establishment in 1918 of an independent republic that was quickly suppressed by Red Army troops. "The authorities will fall under the pressure of their lies."
 
 
 
Ukraine leader calls early poll

 
BBC NEWS
Ukraine leader calls early poll
Ukrainian President Viktor Yushchenko has dissolved parliament and called a snap election, in an escalation of the country's political crisis.

The move comes amid a long-running power struggle between the pro-Western president and pro-Russian Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych.

Lawmakers in parliament said the decree was "a step towards a coup d'etat" and vowed to continue to work.

Mr Yanukovych urged the president to back down on the dissolution.

Analysts say the move could plunge Ukraine into renewed political turmoil.

Thousands of supporters of both sides have been out on the streets in recent days.

'My obligation'

The announcement of the new election - set for 27 May - followed seven hours of failed talks between Mr Yushchenko and parliamentary leaders.

Mr Yushchenko accuses Mr Yanukovych of trying to usurp his power by illegally luring pro-Western lawmakers over to his coalition to increase his parliamentary majority.

Under the constitution, only factions - not individuals - can change sides. But last month 11 lawmakers allied with Mr Yushchenko switched sides.

If Mr Yanukovych gains 300 deputies in the 450-seat house, he would have the power to overturn presidential vetoes and oversee new constitutional change.

"My actions are dictated by the strict necessity to save the state's sovereignty and territorial integrity," the president said in his televised address to the nation. "It is not only my right, it is my obligation."

And he accused rivals of using an "unconstitutional process" to form a parliamentary majority. "Deliberate efforts are being made in parliament to worsen the political crisis, posing a threat to our country and people," he said.

Pro-Western opposition leader Yulia Tymoshenko celebrated the dissolution in an overnight rally in Kiev with about 200 supporters. She said the president had made a "courageous decision".

Rival rallies

Mr Yanukovych said Mr Yushchenko should not publish the decree, which would mean it would not come into force.

Mr Yanukovych said his rival should instead "sit down at the negotiating table" and that a dissolution would "lead to a significant worsening of the situation in the country".

MPs backed a resolution stating that the legislature would continue to function, and that they would refuse funding for the election.

"The people's deputies have enough courage to withstand blackmail, threats and... ultimatums," parliamentary speaker Oleksandr Moroz said in a statement.

Supporters of Mr Yanukovych have also vowed to defy the president's decision, setting up tents in parks outside parliament.

Over the weekend, tens of thousands of supporters of both factions turned out on the streets of Kiev for rival rallies.

Mr Yushchenko became president in January 2005, following the pro-democracy Orange Revolution which overturned a rigged victory for Mr Yanukovych.

But Mr Yushchenko was forced to accept his rival as prime minister after his allies failed to win a majority in the March 2006 parliamentary election, and the two men have repeatedly clashed.

 

 Story from BBC NEWS 
Published: 2007/04/03 03:16:28 GMT
(c) BBC MMVII

I am afraid this move by Mr.Yushchenko is very dubious from the legal point of view. I am not an expert in the Ukranian law but accusations of luring MP's into other factions do not seem to be a lawful reason to dissolve the parliament. I would find here a good reason to apply to the Supreme or Constitutional Court if all negotiations have failed but according to what I know about the Ukrainian political system the president can only dissolve the parliament if they are unable to form the government within a set period of time (2 months or so), which is not the case. Pls check me if I am mistaken.

Unfortunately the Ukraine is now at danger to repeat the way Russia went in the 90's. We also used to have a very pro-Western president who issued a decree to outlaw the parliament, then all the Western governments applauded the massacre in the streets of Moscow and the police state established in 1993 was being repeatedly called 'an emerging democracy' until the Russian government felt that the left-wing opposition presented no more danger and started to be at odds with the corporate.
 
 
SerSo is right - the spectre of a "Russia 1993" kind of situation has gotten to loom uncomfortably large by now. (Does a spectre loom? Anyway.)

Things are going completely wrong.

This sounds like a really dangerous situation. And there's no good guys this time.

 
 Yushchenko orders troops `to secure` govt buildings 

New Europe
26 May 2007

Ukrainian President Viktor Yushchenko on May 25 ordered troops to secure government buildings, escalating a long-running political conflict in the country to unprecedented levels.

The president in a formal statement instructed Alexander Kikhtenko, commander of the Interior Ministry's combat troops division, to "maintain security" at buildings in the capital currently controlled by forces loyal to Yushchenko's opponent, Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovich.

There were no early reports of troop movements as a result of Yushchenko's order, Deutsche-Presse-Agentur (dpa) reported.

Yushchenko's very public order mobilising interior ministry troops came after a day of scuffles and punch-ups between government security guards loyal to Yushchenko and police riot control units loyal to Yanukovich.

Uniformed police supporting Yanukovich broke their way into the Prosecutor General's office building on Thursday, to return to his working desk Sviatoslav Piskun, whom Yushchenko had sacked earlier in the day.

The riot-control officers, members of a paramilitary police unit called Berkut, used boots and fists to force their way past building security and return Piskun to his post.

Violence then broke out between the Berkut troopers and a small group of masked soldiers that, according to media reports, were part of the elite Alpha counterterrorism unit, which belong to the Yushchenko-controlled national spy agency the SBU.

SBU spokesmen, however, flatly denied Alpha participation in the clashes, and identified the masked troopers as members of a police unit loyal to Yushchenko.

Troops from the Titan brigade, yet another paramilitary force loyal to Yanukovich and the national police, clashed with members of the state security service, a ceremonial unit loyal to Yushchenko, in an third punch-up at the Prosecutor General's office.

The Titan soldiers smashed a radio belonging to the security service officers, and choked several into submission before television cameras, as they wrestled the pro-Yushchenko agents out of the building on May 24 evening.

Defence Minister Anatoly Hrytsenko, who is loyal to Yushchenko, on May 24 warned security forces from escalating the conflict. The dispute must be settled by peaceful means, he said.

Yushchenko's instruction to the interior ministry troops commander to "maintain security" at government buildings appeared aimed at escalating the conflict, by planning the employment of proper combat units against the lightly-armed, though reportedly well-trained, Titan brigade and Berkut troopers loyal to Yanukovich.

The key buildings in the stand-off, the constitutional court and the prosecutor general's office, were relatively quiet on May 25 afternoon, although some 1,500 Yushchenko and 6,000 Yanukovich supporters were demonstrating in front the latter building. Some twenty Berkut troopers were reportedly still inside the building, with reinforcements on hand nearby.

Yanukovich, according to news reports, was planning to retaliate against Yushchenko's order to the interior ministry troop command by nominating in parliament Alexander Kuzmiuk, a former defence minister, to the position of Vice Premier for Defence and Security.

Kuzmiuk is a long-serving soldier sacked after a series of deadly Ukrainian military accidents including the accidental shooting down of a civilian aircraft. He nevertheless still commands the loyalty of some army units, observers said.

Yanukovich in a national television address late on May 24 evening blamed Yushchenko for the day's incidents and called on "the international community... to convince the president to return to a policy of following the rule of law." Armed conflict and civil war "will not be permitted," he said.

The conflict between Yushchenko and Yanukovich heated up in early April when the president ordered parliament dissolved and called for new elections. Yanukovich has said the order was unconstitutional. Now the two sides are also arguing over the date for parliamentary elections. Yushchenko wants the elections to take place before the summer break while Yanukovich is pushing for the fall.
 
 
 
Escalation averted. (This time..)

 
 Ukraine Sets Elections for Sept. 30, Defusing Crisis 

May 27
Bloomberg

Ukrainian President Viktor Yushchenko and Prime Minister Viktor Yanukovych set parliamentary elections for Sept. 30, defusing a political crisis that has lasted almost two months, Yushchenko's office said.

The two leaders, joined by parliament speaker Oleksandr Moroz, agreed on the election date after seven hours of talks that ended shortly after 4 a.m. in Kiev. Parliament will meet on May 29 to approve the date, according to a joint statement by the three men.

"Our main concern was to find conditions for elections on a legal basis. We have finally come to that decision,'' Unian news service cited Yanukovych as saying.

The current political standoff was ignited April 2, when Yushchenko, 53, ordered the dissolution of parliament, where Yanukovych's coalition has a majority. The prime minister's supporters responded with a series of measures that whittled away presidential powers. Yanukovych contested the need for a new ballot.

The deal shows that Ukraine has become "an adult democracy,'' the president said at a press conference.

The Council of Europe welcomes the deal and said Ukrainians should feel proud that the agreement was reached without the help of outside arbitrators, according to a statement by secretary general Terry Davis today.
 

More details:

 
Prosecutor Dispute

Interior Minister Vasyl Tsushko raised the prospect that force could be used when he said internal security troops loyal to Yushchenko were heading for Kiev. Television footage showed police vehicles blocking at least one road into the Ukrainian capital to head off the threat of force. Other television tape showed one unit of unarmed troops eating their rations in a forest.

Out of a potential 35,000 internal security forces, only 2,050 of the troops had in fact left their bases to reinforce the security of public buildings in Kiev, Unian said today. The Interior Ministry forces carry only light arms and have no armor or heavy weapons.

In the city, a police officer, who declined to give his identity, said the troops were in any case being sent to Kiev where today is the annual ``Kiev Day,'' a day of rock concerts and dancing on the main Kreshchatyk avenue. Their deployment was routine and resembled that of earlier years, he said.

Taking Control

On May 24, Yushchenko, who has taken personal control of most of Ukraine's security apparatus over the past two months, triggered a new phase in the crisis by firing state Prosecutor- General Svyatoslav Piskun, arguing that Piskun's refusal to stand down as a member of parliament broke the law.

Interior Ministry troops loyal to Yanukovych, 56, then prevented the new acting prosecutor from entering his office, prompting Yushchenko to add the internal security troops to the forces under his direct command. [..]

On Independence Square, or Maidan Nezalezhnosti, where crowds massed in November 2004 until the Supreme Court ordered the repeat presidential election, eastern Ukrainians today began dismantling the tents where they have been camping out to support Yanukovych's earlier refusal to accept a new parliamentary poll.

Small Protest

Their protest, limited to a handful of tents, was never as impressive as the tent city of several hundred that went up along the snow-covered Kreshchatyk in 2004. By noon today, only six tents, three of them large enough to house about 20 people, remained. Some of the easterners wore t-shirts marked "Donbass'' after the coal-mining region where they live and written across a portrait of Yanukovych. [..]

Businessmen in the east of the country, such as Rinat Akhmetov, Ukraine's richest "oligarch,'' though mainly supporters of Yanukovych, had put pressure on him to come to an agreement with Yushchenko out of concern that continuing instability would harm the economy, Pyotr Korenev, a former Soviet Army lieutenant-colonel who lives in Kiev, said.

"Akhmetov and others have a lot of their money tied up in heavy industry in the east of the country and they were getting worried for their investments,'' Korenev said.

In addition to approving the election date, parliament, on May 29, will nominate new members to the Central Election Commission "to secure honest, transparent and democratic'' elections, Yushchenko and Yanukovych said in their statement. It will also vote on laws needed for Ukraine's application to join the World Trade Organization, they said.
 
 
 
No good guys? or no good guys with any power?
 
 
 
No good guys? or no good guys with any power?
 

Well, thats a good question. Neither Yushchenko nor Yanukovich's government has come across as anything like the good guys, anyway.

I guess that leaves Tymoshenko's opposition party, but then this whole mess wouldnt have come about if Tymoshenko and Yushchenko had been able to get over themselves already, set aside their personal enmity, and create that "Orange" government coalition that the people who had demonstrated for weeks for, that winter, had yearned for. The fact that they repeatedly got stuck in personal turf wars and vanity conflicts instead, and together wasted the chance the Orange revolution brought about, leaves both of them guilty too. In my opinion, anyway.
 
 
Thanks Nimh.

I'm continuing to follow this (with interest, but not deep understanding of the personalities).

I appreciate your assessments.
 
 
Following with interest, too, nimh.
Thanks for the updates & your thoughts on what's happening & why. (Not much filtering through to this neck of the woods!)
 
 
Thank you both, but mind you, I'm hardly an expert! Ukraine's not really one of my countries.. falls outside my work field too, so I also just follow it with half an eye.

By the way, for those of you using RSS feeds, the New York Times site has separate RSS/XML feeds by country for the stories they publish -  here's the Ukraine one .
 
 
Well, that didnt hold up long..

 
 
Ukrainian Election Deal Loses Ground 
 
 
 
(and if I understood RSS feeds and what they are/do, we'd be set - maybe a project for the summer)
 
 
Once more the Ukrainians went to the polls.. this time after a lengthy and very tense stand-off between the Western-oriented, reformist President Yushchenko and the Russia-friendly, conservative government of Prime Minister Yanukovich.

But once more, the result is something of a draw. The rival Orange parties of Yushchenko and former Prime Minister Tymoshenko, who had returned to a common, if uneasy, alliance ahead of the elections, had been predicted a comfortable enough majority. But the final tally has the two of them with a parliamentary majority of just 2 seats. In response, Yushchenko has gone back to his previous mode of ambiguity.

 
 Ukraine's Pro-West Bloc Wins Majority 

A full tally of Ukraine's election results confirmed Friday that pro-Western parties loyal to President Viktor Yushchenko and his main Orange Revolution ally won a majority in parliament, but uncertainty loomed over the makeup of the new government.
 

(Sidenote re final sentences of this AP report: 44,9% is "barely ahead" of 34,4%? Odd choice of words.)
 
 
 
 Ukraine: Tymoshenko on top 

Yulia Tymoshenko's wild ride from dismissal as prime minister two years ago to a stunning return in last week's elections makes her the woman of the hour, with speculation that she could be the next president.

By Karl Rahder in Mirgorod and Kiev for ISN Security Watch (08/10/07)

The Ukraine's ongoing political crisis, which began in April when President Viktor Yushchenko dissolved parliament, was inching toward resolution on Friday, 5 October, with nearly 100 percent of the votes counted in the country's general elections, the second since 2006.

As the three main political parties jockey for partners to form a coalition government, the most likely possibility is that former prime minister Yulia Tymoshenko will again form a coalition government with her once and future ally, Yushchenko.

The Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE) monitored the elections under the auspices of its Office for Democratic Institutions and Human Rights (ODIHR), giving the Ukrainian government a passing grade for its conduct of the elections. Tone Tingsgaard, special coordinator of the short-term election observers and vice-president of the OSCE Parliamentary Assembly, characterized the elections as having been "conducted in a positive and professional manner."

This election had been seen as not so much alleviating the years of gridlock and disillusionment after the Orange Revolution of 2004, but as a symptom of Ukraine's systemic political infighting.

Woman of the hour

One underlying cause of the continuing political drama that has plagued this country for so long is the cultural and linguistic cleavage formed roughly by the Dnieper River, bisecting the country from north to south. In the western regions and across the river in the north, Ukrainian is the dominant language, and the residents of such cities as Lviv, Lutsk and the capital Kiev tend to look to Europe as Ukraine's partner. Ukrainians in the west are usually seen as pro-American, and favor deeper integration in European institutions such as the EU.

In the industrial east and the south, including cities such as Donetsk, Dnipropetrovsk and Odessa, Russian is spoken by most people, who view Ukraine's close relationship with Russia as a critical component of Ukrainian identity. These eastern and southern regions comprise the geographic power base of the current prime minister, Viktor Yanukovych, who took office in 2006 after forming a coalition with the Communist Party and the Socialists, former allies of President Yushchenko's Our Ukraine Party.

Immediately after the Orange Revolution, such an outcome was unthinkable, with the new president, fresh from his victory after three elections (the first election resulted in no clear winner, and the second was overturned by the Ukraine's Supreme Court after massive electoral fraud was discovered), leading a liberal, pro-western coalition with his chief ally Tymoshenko. Tymoshenko, a lightning rod for Yushchenko's opponents and even many of his staunchest supporters, would not last long as the new president's prime minister.

One of the major stories since the revolution has been her wild ride from dismissal as prime minister two years ago to her stunning return in Sunday's election as Ukraine's most notable and perhaps most unifying public figure, and quite possibly the country's next president, regardless of the outcome of the negotiations in the coming weeks that will decide the next government.

As of Friday, with nearly 100 percent of votes processed by the country's Central Election Commission, the largest segment of votes went to the Party of Regions (PoR), a pro-Russian party led by Prime Minister Yanukovych, with 34.37 percent of the vote nationwide. This was down slightly from the previous parliamentary election, seventeen months ago.

President Yushchenko's Our Ukraine-People's Self-Defense Bloc - a new coalition known by the acronym NUNS - garnered a bit more than 14 percent, virtually identical to Our Ukraine's performance in 2006.

The real winner was the Bloc of Yulia Tymoshenko, known as ByuT, which took a 30.71 percent share of the vote, up by over eight percentage points over 2006. A coalition with NUNS is expected to give Tymoshenko enough seats in the Rada to make her the next prime minister.

Tymoshenko - who hails from the eastern industrial city of Dnipropetrovsk - made a point of campaigning in Yanukovych's power base in the eastern provinces. And she has benefited from a major image retooling, transforming herself in the minds of many Ukrainians from an intimidating and polarizing figure into what one admirer in the resort city of Mirgorod termed "our Joan of Arc."

As late as Wednesday, it was unclear as to whether Tymoshenko could form a coalition at all, since the Socialist Party of Ukraine - a Yanukovych ally - had hinted that it would challenge the final vote results in court, having failed to make the 3 percent national minimum that would give it seats in parliament. But the next day, Pravda had reported that Socialist Party leader Oleksandr Moroz had surprisingly thrown his support to Tymoshenko.

By Wednesday, Tymoshenko had pledged to form a government with NUNS, but the court challenge by the Socialist Party of Ukraine threatened to drag out the political drama here that was inflamed in May of this year when President Yushchenko sacked his prosecutor general, an ally of Prime Minister Yanukovych.

The crisis has lingered over this and a number of other constitutional issues, and the election had not been expected to bring much in the way of resolution. But the results are now challenging those expectations.

Tymoshenko's strong showing may well transform the political landscape once again, re-assembling the forces that staged the Orange Revolution in 2004 and perhaps reconciling the revolution's two leaders, Yushchenko and Tymoshenko.

The president had sacked Tymoshenko as his prime minister in 2005 after she moved aggressively to break up the financial holdings of a number of Ukrainian oligarchs, violating Yushchenko's preference for a smooth and non-confrontational transition period.

A possible kingmaker

Although it appears that Tymoshenko can form a government, one possible wild card is the Lytvyn bloc, led by the controversial Volodymyr Lytvyn, former speaker of the Verkhovna Rada and long-time ally of former president Leonid Kuchma.

Despite his alleged complicity in the kidnapping and brutal murder of journalist Heorhiy Gongadze in 2000, Lytvyn has proven himself to be a skillful survivor, and the speculation in Kiev has been that his party, with 3.96 percent of the vote, might play the role of kingmaker, siding either with NUNS and ByuT or with the Communists and the PoR to determine the makeup of the next government.

However, with the latest results in as of Friday, a BYuT/NUNS coalition seemed plausible without Lytvyn's participation.

Adding to the confusion were comments on 3 October by President Yushchenko, who stressed on a state visit to Berlin the necessity for compromise and negotiation that included all three major parties, leaving many Ukrainians with the impression that he indeed might consider PoR as a coalition partner.

On the same day, Tymoshenko ventured that the president merely "meant that it is necessary to conduct negotiations with the Party of Regions" rather than meaning to signal a possible coalition government with Yanukovych.

If such a deal were struck, Tymoshenko announced on her website that she would stay with the opposition rather than associate with what she called a "mafia."

Questioning Yushchenko's strength

After the election last week, protesters from a spectrum of pro-Russian parties such as PoR, the Communist Party, and the Socialists had established tent cities in a number of areas in the capital, including perhaps a few hundred protesters camped out in Maiyinsky Park and Independence Square, and a handful setting up tents at both the Central Election Commission and at the Maidan, the site of the vast tent city three years ago that launched the Orange Revolution and changed Ukrainian history.

Reports of protests in eastern cities including Donetsk and Dnipropetrovsk were also filtering in as of Tuesday and Wednesday, although in the last few days these efforts appeared to be running out of steam.

Andrew Berkut, a 19-year old student at Kiev National University, was camped out with friends at the Maidan, and explained to ISN Security Watch on Tuesday that his only aim was to make sure that Yanukovych's voice was heard and to express his support for PoR.

As for Yushchenko, he echoed a view held by many Ukrainians, both pro-US and pro-Russian. "Yushchenko is a nice guy," Berkut acknowledged, "but he doesn't know how to rule, he doesn't have the strength necessary to be president."

Sacking Tymoshenko in 2005 was something he approved of, Berkut said, but since then Yushchenko had failed to take command. "He really shouldn't be president."

A proposed referendum on making Russian the country's official second language - a measure favored by many in the PoR - was, surprisingly, something that Berkut was against. "If you want to speak Russian, then speak Russian. No one is going to stop you. But we are all Ukrainians. We should have one official language, not two."

The ongoing crisis here has also been perpetuated by the deal made by Yushchenko just as the Orange Revolution achieved victory in December of 2004. As negotiations continued with the Verkhovna Rada, Yushchenko made a number of concessions that robbed the office of the president of powers that were placed in the hands of parliament, a decision that has continued to haunt him.

Many analysts agree that with his strong hand at the time, Yushchenko could have refused to make concessions, and this has contributed to the perception that he is perhaps too conciliatory to be an effective president.

Still time for surprises

There is still ample time left for surprises and shifting alliances, with a constitutionally mandated deadline of one month after the first session of the new parliament for the formation of a new government.

In any case, Tymoshenko is being mentioned by Ukrainian media as not just the woman of the hour, but quite possibly the Ukraine's next president. That election is due to take place in January of 2010.

Finally, the Russian state-owned energy monopoly Gazprom threatened two days after the 30 September elections to reduce natural gas shipments to Ukraine if a US$1.3 billion debt were not settled this month.

Gazprom has denied that the warning has any connection with the likely pro-Western government headed by Tymoshenko. Failure to agree on the balance due may well trigger a repeat of the energy crisis of January 2006, when gas supplies were cut off by Gazprom after a payment dispute.
 

Uhhmm.. aside from everything else, it has to be said - Tymoshenko is a babe.
 
 
The "Orange" coalition is back together - the supporters of Tymoshenko and President Yushchenko are working together to establish a reformist government, despite the long-running tensions between the two Orange parties.

At least, that's the theory. Except the two parties have a majority of just 2 seats in parliament - they have 227 of the 450 seats. And when it came to appointing Tymoshenko Prime Minister, something went wrong. She fell one vote short in each of two subsequent votes, getting just 225.

What's up? Could two of Yushchenko's supporters in parliament not stomach the idea of PM Tymoshenko and surreptitiously vote against? Or were the votes, as Tymoshenko claims, tampered with?

For obvious reasons, the Tymoshenko camp was, at the time of these events a couple of days ago (I havent kept up since, sorry) pushing for a vote by the showing of hands - but how such a procedural novelty could be legitimatised is an open question.

It reminds me of the situation in the German state of Schleswig-Holstein after the last state-level elections there. The ruling Social Democrat/Green coalition, headed by a striking, popular and strong-willed female Social Democratic politician, squeaked by in close elections to get a majority of just one (IIRC). But it was never voted back into power; when it came to parliament endorsing the new coalition government in a secret vote, one anonymous Social-Democrat kept voting against, and thus the whole thing fell apart. A "grand coalition" of Social-Democrats and Christian-Democrats was duly voted in by parliament instead.

 
 Ukrainian Loses Her Bid for Premier 
 
 
 
